VOL. I.1
THE
ACTRESS OF PADUA.
PART I.
The Key.
When
Attila, at the head of his barbarous horde,
poured into the Roman empire, many of the poor
inhabitants of upper Italy took refuge among the
islands of the lagoons of the Adriatic, and speedily
Venice arose, as bright and beautiful as the Goddess
of Love from the sea. And she was endued with
both the vices and the ambition of the Paphian Venus.
In the progress of time she assumed, in some
measure
,
the features of that universal robber, ancient
Rome. The fairest cities of Italy were subjugated,
and
Podestas
were placed over them by the Council
of Ten, with full authority to punish, but with no
discretion to pardon. Power obtained by violence
is usually maintained by oppression; and the
historian
remarks, that the ordinary vices of mankind
assumed a tinge of portentous guilt in their palaces.
Their revenge was fratricide, and their lust was
incest
.
The period of our narrative is the middle of the
sixteenth century. Padua, more than a century
before
,
after a feeble resistance, had yielded to the
power of Venice. Angelo Malipieri at this time
exercised the functions of Podesta over Padua.
Descended
from one of the Doges of Venice, he was
proud of his birth, and, invested with power, he would
have gloried in his distinction, but he knew that the
eye of the Council of Ten was upon him, and he
crouched as a slave beneath the lash.His nightly
dream was of the
piombi
, those fatal dungeons under
the leads of the ducal palace, from which few
returned
alive, or of the canals of Venice, where a
heavy splash at midnight was all that denoted that
a life was gone. He felt that they had the power of
ubiquitywere all eye, all ear: that a charge
amounted
to conviction: that the public eye never penetrated
the mystery of their proceedings: the accused was
sometimes not heardnever confronted with
witnesses
:
the condemnation was secret as the inquiry;
the punishment undivulged like both.
Still there were enjoyments under a rule like this.
True, nothing was so cheap as human life, and their
dungeons were shaded with a deeper horror, but
their palaces were brilliant in proportion. Where
happiness is equally divided among a people, the
share of each is limited and restrained; but where
the oppressed are punished with undue rigour, their
rulers run riot in their enjoyments, and even in their
pleasures assume the aspect of devils.
It was now three hours after midnight, and still
the palace resounded with enlivening music and glad
voices. The chandeliers and torches made the gloom
of night even more gorgeous than day. The drapery,
mirrors, and furniture, betrayed that the wealth of
princes had been lavished to surpass, if possible, the
handywork of the fabulous magicians. The gay, the
noble, and the beautiful of Padua were there,
weaving
the mazy dance with masked faces and masked
hearts. The garden was also illuminated with
variegated
lamps, suspended from the trees and wrought
into fantastic devices; and here and there might be
seen a guest, weary of the amusements, who had
sought for refreshment in the pure air beneath an
Italian sky. And who was the master-spirit of the
fete?Thisbe, the actress of Padua, entertained the
nobles.
The guests were about departing, but still the
sounds of revelry continued. In a dark recess in
the garden, there was a man seated in a gloomy
mood, clad in a stole of gold. He was younghe
was handsome; still anxiety and passion had already
wrought deep lines in his effeminate face. It was
Angelo Malipieri, the Podesta of Padua. Beside
him stood an angelic beingtall, and sylph-like.
The raven locks and eagle eye, the rosy lips and
teeth of pearl that lovers dream of, had united here
to form one of nature's most beautiful works. Her
eye and lip were full of intellect, and every
movement
denoted that she was rather an embodying of
the most brilliant creations of the poets of the age,
than a being that had received its form and pressure
from the sphere in which she moved. She had
created
an ideal world of her own, and though from
bitter experience she well knew the nature of the lot
to which fate had destined her, she strove to put the
thought aside, and carelessly revelled in her ideal
world. It was Thisbe, the actress, who stood beside
the Podesta, dressed in her princely theatrical robes.
She had performed Rosamund that night, and her
ears were still deafened with the plaudits of an
admiring
multitude.
On a green bank, beneath the shade of an olive
tree, a short distance from the Podesta, and
unperceived
by him, lay a man sleeping. He was clad in
a long robe of brown wool, which was closed before.
He was apparently a musician, for his guitar lay
beside him. He slept on, careless of the
amusements
,
and undisturbed by the sounds of revelry.
Thisbe stood gazing on the moody Podesta in
silence
for some time, and then addressed him, while
her features and tone of voice nearly betrayed the
feelings of contempt that it was her interest to
conceal
.
Yesyou are the master here, my lord. You
are the powerful ruler who control life, death, liberty:
The envoy of Venice! Whoever beholds you looks
upon the majesty of that republic. As you pass along
the streets, the windows are closed, the passengers
steal away, and even those within their dwellings
tremble. Alas! these poor Paduans do not maintain
an attitude more encouraging than if they were
dwellers
in Constantinople, and you the Grand Turk.
Yes, it is even so. Ah! I have been in Brescia.
There it is otherwise. Venice dare not treat Brescia
as she treats Padua, for when she smote, Brescia bit
the hand, while Padua crouched and licked it.
Shame to manhood! Well, since you are looked
upon here as the master of the world, and you
pretend
to be mine also, hear me, my lord, for I would
speak the truth to you; not on state affairsdo not
fearbut on your own. I would tell you that you
are a strange being, and I understand you not. You
are in love with me, and yet you are jealous of your
own wife.
And I am jealous of you also, Thisbe.
Ah! you have little cause to say that of me.
Still you have not the right, for I do not belong to
you. True, I am here looked upon as your
mistress
,your
powerful mistressbut that I am not
such, full well you know.
She spoke with earnestness, and a slight flush of
indignation suffused her countenance. Angelo
raised
his head, and carelessly observed
This fete is really magnificent, madam.
Ah! I am nothing more than a poor comedian,
graciously permitted to give entertainments to the
senators. I strive to amuse our master, but I now
succeed but badly. Your face is even more sombre
than the mask I wear. I have been prodigal in
lamps and flambeaux, but darkness rests upon your
brow. The cheering music I have afforded has not
been returned by gaiety. Come, come, smile if
possible
,
smile!
Well, I do smile.Did you not tell me that the
1*
young man who came with you to Padua is your
brother?
I did. What then?
You have been speaking with him for a full hour.
Who is the other who accompanied him?
His friend. A Vicentine named Anafesto
Galeofa
.
And what is the name of your brother?
Rodolpho, my lord, Rodolpho. I have already
explained that to you twenty times. Have you then
nothing more pleasant to say to me?
Pardon me, Thisbe, I will not trouble you with
more questions. Are you aware that you played
the part of Rosamund to-day to a miracle; that the
whole city is delighted with having seen you; that
all Italy admires you, Thisbe, and envies these poor
Paduans whose fate you deplore.Ah! even the
crowd that applauds you troubles me. I burn with
jealousy when I behold you, so beautiful, exposed to
the gaze of the multitude.Ah! Thisbe! He
paused
,
and gazed fondly in her face, but suddenly his
countenance became overshadowed, and he
continued
:Who
then was that man in the mask with
whom you were speaking this evening between those
doors?
Pardon me, Thisbe, I will not trouble you with
more questions, she exclaimed laughing.This
is admirable! That man, my lord, was Virgelio
Tasca.
My Lieutenant.
Your
Sbire
.
[1]
[1]
Sbirri
. In Italy, particularly in the States of the Church,
there were formerly certain police officers, with a military
organization, who were called by this name. They were
abolished in 1809.
And what did he want with you?
She replied playfullyYou would be finely
caught now, if it did not please me to tell you.
Thisbe!
Be not impatient. Hear my history.Do you
know what I am?Nothinga child of the
populace
,
a comedian, a thing that you caress to-day and
hurl to destruction to-morrow. Still, of little
moment
as I am, I had a mother. Do you know what
it is to have a mother? Have you a mother? Do
you know what it is to be a child, a poor, helpless,
naked, miserable, famished child, alone in the world,
and to feel that you have near you, about you, beside
you, going where you go, resting when you rest,
weeping when you weep, a woman,NoI should
not call her woman!an angel who is there
watching
over you; who teaches you to speak, to smile,
to love!who warms your little fingers in her hands,
your shivering body in her lap, your soul within her
heart's core; who yields you her milk in your
infancy
,
her bread, her life through life. To whom
you cry mother! and who replies
my child!
in a
tone so sweet as makes even the angels rejoice.
Well, well, I had such a mother; she was a poor lone
woman, who sang her ballads in the streets of
Brescia
.
I wandered with her, and we lived on charity.
It was even thus I began. My mother was in the
habit of standing at the foot of the statue of
Gatta-Melata
.
One day it appears that in the ballad she
was singing without understanding its purport, there
were some verses offensive to the Seignory of
Venice
,
which excited the laughter of the people of an
ambassador who were standing around us. A
Senator
was passing at the time, he paused, looked at us,
understood the jest, and cried to a guard who
followed
him, to the gibbet with that woman. In
the state of Venice this was soon done. My mother
was seized on the spot; she said nothing, for what
would that have availed? She embraced me in
silence, tears rolling down her cheeks; then grasped
her crucifix and permitted herself to be bound. I
still see that crucifixit was of polished brass, and
my name, Thisbe, is rudely scratched at the bottom,
with some sharp instrument. I was then sixteen
years old. I beheld them bind my mother, without
the power of speech;no cry was uttered, no tear
immoveable, wounded, dying, as if it were a dream.
The crowd was also silentsilent as death. But
there was with the senator a girl, whom he held by
the hand,his daughter, doubtless,who was
suddenly
moved to pity. A beautiful young creature, my
lord. The poor child threw herself at her father's feet,
wept, implored; and her suppliant tears obtained
mercy for my mother. God bless that child! When
my mother was released she took her crucifix and
gave it to her preserver, saying, Madame, take this
crucifix, it will bring you good. Since that time
my mother died. I have become rich, and wish to
discover the angel who saved my mother. Who
knows? She is now a woman, and consequently
unhappy: possibly stands in need of my assistance
in her turn. In all the cities in which I have been,
I have gone to the
sbirri
, the
barigel
, the head of
police, and recounted the adventure, and promised
a reward of ten thousand sequins of gold to
whoever
should discover her. This is the reason why I
spoke for a whole hour between those doors to your
lieutenant, Virgilio Tasca. Are you satisfied?
Ten thousand sequins of gold! But what will
you give to the woman herself, when you have found
her?
My life, should she require it.
But by what means will you recognise her?
By my mother's crucifix. O! I shall never
forget
that crucifix, nor the last time I saw it.
Bah! She has lost it.
Oh, no! She could not lose a gift obtained in
such a manner.
Angelo turned, and perceiving, for the first time,
the man reposing on the bank near him, he
exclaimed
,
in a hurried manner
Madame, madame, there is a man there. Do
you know that there is a man there? Who is that
man?
Ha! Good Heavens! exclaimed Thisbe, with
difficulty restraining her laughter at the alarm of the
Podesta. Yes, I perceive that there is a man there,
and that he still sleepsa good sleep. Were you
not about to be alarmed at him also? It is poor
Homodei.
Homodei! And who is that Homodei?
A man, my lord, such as Thisbe is a woman.
Homodei is a performer on the guitar, whom the
prior of St. Mark, a firm friend of mine, lately sent
to me with a letter, which I will show to you, thou
jealous one! And with the letter came a present.
How! A present!
O! a true Venetian present. A box containing
simply two little flasks; one white and the other
black. In the white there is a powerful narcotic,
which will create sleep, for twelve hours, as sound
as death: in the black there is a poisonthat
terrible
poison which Malaspina, as you know, would
have administered to the Pope in a pill of aloes. The
prior wrote to me that it might serve on an occasion.
An act of gallantry, as you see. For the rest, the
holy father informed me that the poor fellow who
brought the present is an idiot. He is still here,
and you may have seen him, for the last five days,
eating at the servants' office, crouching in the first
corner that presented itself, and at times playing
and singing after his fashion. He came from Venice.
Alas! my mother wandered there also! I have
watched him closelymore than he wished. He
has at times diverted the company this evening; but
our fete did not amuse him, and he slept. He is as
simple as that.
Do you speak to me of that man? he demanded,
in a tone of evident alarm.
Come, come, you should laugh. A pretty
occasion
this, to assume a troubled air! A player upon
the guitar, an idiot, a sleeping man! Ah! Signor
Podesta, what is it you would have then? You pass
your life in making doubts of this and that, and take
umbrage at things as light as air. Tell me, is this
jealousy, or is it fear?
Both jealousy and fear.
JealousyI understand that, for you believe
yourself obliged to please two women. But as to
fear! Are you not the master here, and inspire all
with dread? That is beyond my comprehension.
The greater reason have I to tremble. He
approached her, his eye still fixed upon the sleeping
man, and proceeded in a subdued voice. Listen,
Thisbe. Yes, I am the ruler, despot, sovereign of
this city. The Podesta that Venice has placed over
Padua; the claw of the tiger on the lamb. But,
absolute as I am, there is still over me, Thisbe,
something
grand, terrible, and full of darknessit is at
Venice. The Council of Ten! Let us speak low,
my Thisbe, for it is possible that even here we may
be overheard. Men whom no one knows, and yet
whom we all know; men who are not visible in any
ceremony, and who may be seen on all the scaffolds,
when reeking with blood; men who hold in their
hands the heads of all,yours, mine, that of the
Doge himself,and who possess neither simarre, nor
stole, nor crown, nothing to designate them, save a
mysterious sign beneath their robes at most; whose
faces are identified by the people of Venice with the
grim mouths of brass, forever open beneath the
porches of St. Markmouths thought to be mute,
and yet speak in a manner loud and terrible,
shrieking
denunciation to all who pass. Once denounced,
the victim is seizedonce seized, all is said. At
Venice all is done secretly, mysteriously, but surely.
Condemnedexecutedno one to witness it, no
one to hear it. Neither shriek nor look will avail.
The sufferer gagged, the executioner masked. But
why do I talk of scaffolds all this time! In Venice
they do not die on scaffoldsthey disappear. A
man is suddenly missed from his family. What
has become of him? The leads, the wells, or the canal
Orfano, alone know his fate. At times the sound of
something falling heavily in the water is heard at
night. Pass quickly then! As for the rest, balls,
feasts, flambeaux, music, gondolas, theatres, and a
carnival of five months, and this is Venice. You,
Thisbe, my beautiful beloved, have only seen this
side of the picture; I, a senator, understand the
other. In all the palaces, in that of the Doge, in mine,
there is a secret passage, unknown to him who
dwells there, the door of which is familiar to others,
who serpent-like approach you without your
knowledge
.
Thus a mysterious undermining is
perpetually
carried on against men ignorant of their offence,
and personal vengeance is mingled with public
persecution
,
and walks in darkness. Often at midnight,
when I prepare for bed, I listen and hear the steps
of the betrayer within my walls. Such is the anxiety
under which I exist! True, I am over Padua, but
this
is over me! Send a workman alone into a
cavern, and let him there make a lock, and even
before the lock shall be finished the Council of Ten
will have the key in their pocket. The valet who
serves me is a spy upon me; the friend who salutes
me is a spy upon me; the priest who confesses me
is a spy; and the woman who says to me `I love
you,' yes, Thisbe, even she is a spy upon me.
Ah! my lord.
You have never told me that you loved me. I
do not speak of you, my Thisbe.Yes, I repeat,
that all who look upon me, is but one eye of the
Council of Ten; all who hear me, one ear of the
Council of Ten; all who touch me, one hand of the
Council of Ten.Tyrant of Padua, but slave of
Venice!I am not sure but that before to-morrow,
some miserable sbire may enter my chamber, and
command me to follow him, and I must obey.But
whither? Into some place of darkness, whence he
will return without me.To be a Venetian, is to
cling to an only child!Mine is a gloomy and
painful
condition; bent down upon that burning furnace,
called Padua, my face in a mask, doing my work of
tyranny, surrounded by dangers, and dreading every
moment lest I be destroyed by some explosion, like
the alchemist by his own poison!Pity me, and
cease to ask why I tremble.
I do pity you. God knows your condition is a
fearful one, replied Thisbe, in a tone of sympathy.
Yes, continued the Podesta, I feel that I am
nothing more than the instrument with which one
people think proper to torture another; and I also
know that such instruments are used but for a short
time, Thisbe, and are broken often. I am wretched.
There is but one thing sweet in this bitter world,
and it is you. However, I well know that you do
not love methat is evident;still, you do not love
another, Thisbe?
No, no, be calm.
You deceive me in saying no.
In truth, I speak as it is.
Ah! I can bear to think that you do not love
me; but do not think of another, Thisbe, O! do not
think of another!
Do you imagine you look handsome when you
gaze upon me in that manner? she demanded,
playfully
.
Ah! when will you love me?
She paused for an instant, and then replied in a
more earnest toneWhen every body loves you
here. Angelo shrunk.
Alas!Well, well, remain in Padua. I do not
wish you to leave Padua; do you hear?If you go,
my life will be wretched, very wretched!Heavens!
some one approaches!We have been speaking long
togetherthat would have created suspicion in
Venice
.
I leave you As he was going, his
attention
was suddenly arrested by the man who was
still sleeping on the bank near them. Can you
answer for that man?
There is no more to fear from him than if an
infant had been reposing there.
It is your brother who comes. I leave you with
him.
The Podesta slowly withdrew, and Thisbe
followed
him with her eyes until he disappeared in the
palace, when her feelings burst forth in a strain of
exultation:
No, imbecile tyrant! it is not my brother, but
the beloved and cherished of my soul! Come, O!
come, Rodolpho, my brave, my noble, my proscribed.
Look steadily in my facethou art beautiful; I
adore thee!
Rodolpho approached the spot where Thisbe was
standing. His bearing was proud and manly; his
mind was absorbed in thought, and a thick cluster
of black plumes partially concealed the face which
Thisbe had pronounced so beautiful. He was clad
in deep black, but both the fashion and the texture
of his costume betrayed that the proscribed had
moved in no humble sphere. He did not perceive
Thisbe until he stood beside her, when, in a low
tone, he ejaculated her name. Homodei still slept
on.
I would you had not come to Padua, exclaimed
the devoted girl, for you well know there is a snare
for us, and it is out of our power to escape from this
place. The Podesta is enamoured of your poor
Thisbe, and he will not allow us to escape.I
tremble
lest he should discover who you are, and that
you are not my brother. Ah! what torments! But
the tyrant shall never be any thing to me! You are
well assured of that Rodolpho!I would relieve
you from all anxiety on that score, for I would not
have you jealous of me for an instant.
You are a noble and charming creature.
Jealous of me!It is I who am jealous of you,
Rodolpho. Jealous!Even this Angelo, the
Venetian
,
speaks of jealousy, but then he mingles other
matters with it. Ah! when one is jealous, he does
not see Venice, the Council of Ten, the sbirri, the
spies, the canal Orfanothere is nothing before his
eyes but jealousyconsuming jealousy. Rodolpho,
I cannot behold you speaking to other women
barely speakingit is hell to me!What right have
they to word of thine! In my rage I could kill
them!O! God! how I
do
love you!You are the
only man I ever loved! My life has been a sad one
for a long timestill some bright beams have shone
upon it.But thou art my lightthy love is the sun
that yields me warmth and vitality;all other men
VOL. I.2
chill me. It seems that every pulse of my heart
that had been frozen to death in your absence lives
again. What joy there is in being able to converse
with you alone for an instant!But what folly in
coming to Padua! We shall live here under
constant
constraint, my Rodolphoyes, mine, by
heavens
!thou
art mine! Lover or brother, thou art
mine! Hold, I am mad with joy when I speak to
you freely.You see plainly that I am mad! O,
Rodolpho, do you love me?
Who does not love you, Thisbe? he replied, in
a cold tone, that strangely contrasted with the ardour
of the enamoured girl.
If you speak thus you will vex me. Who does
not love me? I care for the love of none on earth
but youyou only! The music in the palace had
ceased, and the wearied revellers were departing.
Thisbe continuedGood God! I ought to go and
show myself to my guests. But, tell me, you appear
sad. It is not so?you are not sad?
No, Thisbe.
Nothing distresses you?
No, Thisbe.
You are not jealous?
Oh! no!
I wish that you were jealous, otherwise you do
not love me, she responded, in a melancholy tone.
But away with sadness. Ah! here I am in constant
alarm: Are you not also uneasy? Does no one here
know that you are not my brother?
No one but Anafesto.
Your friend. Then all is safe. See, he is
coming
towards usI will confide you with him for a
moment! A gallant was seen emerging from the
crowd, and he approached the spot where the lovers
were conversing. Thisbe ran to him and said
playfully
,
Signor Anafesto, have a care that he does
not speak with any woman.
Never fear, madam, he replied, smiling, and
she ran off with a step as light as that of Camilla,
and in an instant was lost in the crowd. Anafesto,
as he gazed after her in admiration, exclaimed, O!
charming creature! Rodolpho, you are happyshe
loves you.
Anafesto, I am not happy. I do not love her.
How! What say you?
Who is that man sleeping there? exclaimed
Rodolpho, perceiving the sleeper.
It is the poor musician. You know him?
Ah! yes, the idiot.
You do not love Thisbe, you say! Is it possible!
The fascinating, adorable Thisbe!
Truly so; but I do not love her.
How!
Do not question me.
Thisbe again appeared. She ran to Rodolpho,
her angelic features illuminated with the sudden
gush of joy that had awakened her slumbering spirits.
She said smiling, I return to say but a single word
to you; but you will think me a silly girl.
O no! say on, my gentle Thisbe.
I love you. God bless you! She threw her
white arms around his neck, and imprinted a
burning
kiss upon his cheek, then breaking from him,
disappeared as suddenly as she had appeared.
Anafesto
followed her with his eyes, and sighed Poor
Thisbe!
I echo thee, poor Thisbe! There is a secret of
my life unknown to all but myself.
Which you would confide to me; is it not so?
You are gloomy to-day, Rodolpho.
I am. Leave me for the presentI will see you
again by and bye.
Anafesto withdrew, and Rodolpho seated himself
upon an artificial mound of rock near at hand. The
gray light of morn appeared, and the lamps that had
shone so brilliantly throughout the night, turned pale
and sickened in the blaze of the glorious sun.
Homodei
the sleeper awoke and arose. He beheld
Rodolpho seated, lost in thought, and supporting his
head on his hand. He approached him, and stood
beside him in silence for some time, then touched
him on the shoulder. Rodolpho raised his head and
gazed upon him with a vacant stare.
You call yourself Rodolpho, said the man of
mystery
,
in a cold unearthly voice, and yet the priest
christened you at the baptismal font, Ezzelino da
Romana, the noble scion of that ancient stock that
once reigned in Padua, but which was cut down and
cast out two centuries ago.Such are the changes in
this world, that at times we see the beggar mount
the throne, and the heir of kings, wandering from
city to city, a mendicant, under a false name. You
perceive that you are known.
He proceeded to relate the circumstances of
Rodolpho's
life, minutely, for years. It seemed that
nothing had escaped him. He stated that seven
years before, the proscribed had been at Venice.
One day he entered the chapel of St. George the
Great, and there beheld a beautiful young woman
at her devotions. He was struck with her beauty,
but did not follow her, for he knew that at Venice,
to follow a woman was to search for a blow from a
stiletto. Rodolpho returned the next day to the
church, and the young woman was there also. They
became mutually enamoured. That he only knew
her by the name of Catharina, but he found means
to write to her, and she to answer him. They
finally
obtained an interview at the house of a woman
called the devout Cecilia, which led to a fatal
passion
,
but Catharina remained unspotted. She was
of noble birth, and this was all that he knew of her.
A noble Venetian should not espouse other than a
noble Venetian, or a king, and Rodolpho was not a
Venetian, and his family had long ceased to be kings,
and being a banished man he could not aspire to
her hand. One day Catharina failed to appear at
the rendezvous, and Cecilia apprised him that she
was married, but the name of both husband and
father were cautiously concealed from Rodolpho.
He quit Venice, and wandered over Italy, but love
still followed in his footsteps. He had devoted his
life to pleasure, folly, madness, vice, but in vain.
He had endeavoured to love other women, and
imagined
that he loved them, as in the case of Thisbe,
still it was fruitless, the first love invariably
surmounted
the new.
One nightthe 16th of February, continued
Homodei, a woman, veiled, passed near you on the
bridge Molinoshe took your hand and led you to
the ruins of the ancient palace Magaruffi,
demolishby
your ancestor Ezzelin III. Among these ruins
stands a cottage, and in the cottage you discovered
the Venetian, whom you have so fondly loved and
deplored for seven years. After that day you met
frequently in that cottage, and though she is
faithful
to her love, she is true to her husband's honour.
Her name is still unknown to youCatharina,
nothing
more. One month passed thus happily, but
five weeks have already elapsed since you last
beheld
her. Her husband suspected her, and has
imprisoned
heryou perhaps made search for her, but
did not find her, and you can never find herwould
you see her to-night?
Rodolpho listened in utter amazement, at the
accuracy
of the information of the mysterious being
who stood before himinformation on transactions
that he had imagined as hidden as the secrets of the
grave, and it was some time before he collected his
wandering senses, when riveting his eyes upon the
stranger, he demanded Who are you?
I answer no questions, replied the mysterious
man, coldlyI have said, do you not wish to see
that woman again to-night? It is your business to
answer me.
See her! do I wish to see her! In the name of
heaven! To see her again for an instant, and die,
is all I ask on earth!
To see her and die!Well, you shall see her!
Where?
In the place where she is confined.
But tell me who is she? Her name?
No matterI will conduct you to her myself.
Ah! you came from heaven!
2*
I know not that. To-night, at the rising of the
moon, at midnight, find your way to the corner of
the palace of Albert de Baon. I will be there to
conduct you to happiness. At midnight, you
understand
.
Perfectly. But tell me who and what you
are?
An idiot! exclaimed Homodei, and hastily
disappeared
.
What is that man! exclaimed Rodolpho,
looking
towards the place whence he departedno
matter! It will be an age until midnight. O!
Catharina
,
for the hour he has promised me, I would
cheerfully lay down my life.
Thisbe again came running to him, evidently
impatient
that her guests had separated her from the
idol of her soul for a few moments. Thou art
mine once more, Rodolpho, she exclaimed with a
voice as musical as that of the birds in spring time.
Thou art mine againI cannot exist long without
seeing you. I am wretched when we are separated,
for thou art all on earth to me, RodolphoI think
and breathe for you alone. I am the shadow of thy
body; thou art the soul of mine!
Have a care Thisbe, my family is a fatal one.
There is a prediction over us, a destiny that must
inevitably be fulfilled from father to son. We
destroy
those whom we love.
Wellyou will kill me. I care not, provided
you love me.
Thisbe!
And you will weep for me when I am in the
grave. I wish for nothing more.
Thisbe, you merit the love of an angel!
exclaimed
Rodolpho, and pressing her hand to his lips
with fervour, slowly withdrew. Thisbe called after
him, Rodolpho do not leave me yet, Rodolpho
Ah! he is gone! what can be the matter with him!
She turned to the mound upon which Homodei had
been reposingAh! the sleeper has awakened and
I am alone!
How desolate appears the scene of our
enjoyments
after a festival!The spot that had been
redolent
with life, made joyous by the smiles of the
gay, the jest of the mirthful, the laughter of the
thoughtless, suddenly becomes as silent as the grave,
and that heart must be strung with chords of iron
that is not affected by the striking transition. Thisbe
stood musing on the change, when she was abruptly
awakened from her reverie by a voice near her:
Rodolpho is called Ezzelinothe adventurer is
a princethe idiot a genius. The man who sleeps
is a cat that watches. Eye closed, ear open.
She turned and perceiving Homodei at her side,
ejaculated What does he say! The mysterious
being continued, showing his guitarThis
instrument
has strings that will send forth any sounds a
skilful hand may require. The heart of man and
woman has also strings that may be played upon.
You speak in parables.
I would say, madam, he continued in a
monotonous
tone, his cold eye fixed upon herIf by
chance you miss a handsome man with a black plume
in his hat, I know the place where you may find him
the coming night.
With a woman? she demanded eagerly.
A fair woman.
How! what say you!what art thou?
exclaimed
Thisbe with an energy that betrayed that her
suspicions
were awakened.
I know not, responded the other with a vacant
look and the tone of an idiot.
You are not what I thought you, wretch that I
am! Ah! from the Podesta doubtless! Thou art a
man of terrors! who art thou, O! speak, who art
thou! Rodolpho with a woman the coming night!
Is it that you would say? speak, is it not so?
I know not, he replied with the same vacant
look.
Ah! it is false! It is impossible! Rodolpho loves
me, and me only!
I know not, still responded the idiot.
Ah! wretch thou liest! How! he deceive me!
Thou art bribed to slander. My God! I then have
enemies! But Rodolpho loves me. Go, go, you
have failed to alarm me. I do not believe you.
You should be enraged to see how little effect all
you have said has produced upon me.
Still her agitation betrayed that the shaft he had
thrown had hit the mark; but Homodei proceeded
as if he neither perceived her excitement nor
understood
the nature of her rebuke.
You have doubtless observed that the Podesta
carries a bijou of gold, attached to a chain around
his neck. That jewel is a key. Pretend that you
desire such a jewel, and demand it of him, without
telling what you would do with it.
A key say you! But I will not ask it of him.
I will ask nothing. It is infamous to attempt to
make me suspicious of Rodolpho. I do not wish the
keyBegone, I will not hear you.
Behold, the Podesta is approaching, continued
the strange being without heeding her. When
you have possession of the key I will explain how it
may serve you the approaching night. Within a
quarter of an hour I will return.
Wretch, you do not hear me then! I tell you I
do not wish the keyI have full confidence in
Rodolpho
I
will not touch that keyI will not speak
a word to the Podesta. So do not return, it is
useless
,
for I do not believe a word that you have said.
He still heeded her not, but coldly replied,
Within a quarter of an hour I will return, and
slowly walked away, leaving the fair Thisbe
bewildered
,
her mind racked with doubts and fears. Her
faith in him whom she so devotedly, so exclusively
loved, was shaken; and he whom she had looked
upon as an idiot, had thrown off the garb, and
assumed
an aspect as appalling as mystery could
depict
on a heated imagination, in an age of darkness
and crime, when every thing mysterious was to be
dreaded. She was familiar with the frightful
features
of the times. She knew that from the prince
to the beggar, there was no immunity from the stroke
of the assassinthat palaces had groaned with secret
murder,and she had witnessed her poor mendicant
mother's sufferings in the street. These thoughts
flashed like lightning through her mind when she
discovered that Homodei was no longer the idiot he
had been represented. But they passed as quickly,
and left no trace. Still there was one absorbing
thought, that clung to her soul like the poisoned
vestment, and turned her blood to liquid fire.
Rodolpho
was false! Her brain had not space for any
thought save thisRodolpho is false!As Angelo
approached her, she made a violent effort to control
the tempest of her feelings, and said: You are in
search of some one, my lord?
Yes, Virgilio Tasca, to whom I have a word to
say. He still remembered that she had conversed
with him for a whole hour that night.
What, are you still jealous? demanded Thisbe.
I am, madam.
You are a fool. What good comes of being
jealous
?I
know not what it is to be jealous. If I loved
a man myself, I would certainly not be jealous.
The flashing eye and deep hectic spot on her pale
cheek, gave the lie to her rosy lips.
It is because you love no one, said Angelo.
But I do love some one, she replied, with an
earnestness that startled the Podesta.
Ah! whom do you love?
She perceived that his jealousy was roused, that
her passion had nigh betrayed the secret of her heart,
and suddenly changing her manner, she replied in a
low toneYou.
You love me!Is it possible! O, do not trifle
with me, my God!Repeat to me what you have
said, Thisbe, my angel Thisbe!
I love you, Angelo. He seized her hand with
rapture and pressed it to his lips. She touched the
chain about his neck and said,
What is this trinket? I never before remarked
it. It is pretty;well executed. No doubt it was
carved by Benvenuto. But what is it?It would
be a beautiful ornament for a woman.
Ah! Thisbe, you have filled my heart with joy
by a single word! and he again pressed her hand
with fervour to his burning lips.
Well, well, do not devour my hand.But tell
me now what is this?
It is a key.
A key.But holdlet me examine it, that I
may not doubt. Ah! yes, I see nowit is with this
that you open the lock. It is indeed a key.
Yes, my Thisbe.
Ah, well!since it is only a key I do not wish
it; keep it.
What! did you desire it, Thisbe?
I did, as a trinket of beautiful workmanship.
O! take it, he replied, and detached it from
the chain.
No.If I had known that it was a key, I should
not have spoken to you about it. I do not wish it,
I tell you.It is perhaps the key to your own
apartment
.
True, it will admit me there, but I use it rarely.
Besides, I have another. Take it, I beseech you.
No, I no longer desire it. But how can you
open doors with such a key?It is very' small.
That is nothing. These keys are made for secret
locks.This opens many doors, and, among others,
that of a bed-chamber. Thisbe started.
Truly.Well, since you insist, I will accept
it. She took the key.
What happiness! exclaimed Angelo. You
have at length accepted a trifle from me.Thanks,
my Thisbe!
I think I see Virgilio Tasca looking for you at
the end of the gallery. Have you not spoken to
him?
O! cursed chance, he will tear me from you at
such a time as this!
That way, continued Thisbe, pointing to the
extremity of the gallery.
Ah! Thisbe, you love me, then?
That way, that way, my lord, Tasca awaits you.
Angelo approached the spot where Tasca was
standing
,
and immediately after Homodei appeared at the
extremity of the garden. Thisbe ran to him, and
in a voice of exultation cried, I have the key.
Show it me, responded the other, coldly. He
took it, and, after examining it, returned it to her,
and continued, Yes, it is right. There is a
gallery
in the palace of the Podesta that overlooks the
Molino Bridge. Conceal yourself there to-night,
behind the furniture, tapestry, or where you please.
Two hours after midnight I will seek you there
I shall compensate you better; for the present
take this, said Thisbe, handing him a purse.
As you please, was the cold reply. But let
me finish. Two hours after midnight I shall seek
you, and point out the first door that you must
open with that key. After that I will leave you, for
the rest can be performed without me. You will
have nothing to do but go straight forward.
What shall I find after the first door?
A second, which that key will also open.
And after the second?
A third.That key opens all.
And after the third?
You will learn.The man of mystery abruptly
departed. The morning sun gilded the spires of
Padua, and like bees from their hives the multitude
poured forth into the streets of the full peopled city.
Thisbe retired to her couch, worn down with fatigue,
but not to sleep.The jealous do not sleep.
PART II.
The Crucifix.
The
day dragged slowly on, and it appeared to
Thisbe that night would never come; for time has
leaden wings and feet of iron when he travels over
the hearts of the anxious and impatient. She moved
through her splendid apartments, like some
condemned
spirit that had gained access to Paradise,
but could not tear off the curse that burnt even more
fiercely in the scene of bliss. She gazed upon the
trappings of the stage, the mask, the diadem, the
princely robe, that had ministered to her vanity, and
made her the admiration of all beholders; but their
attractions had now vanished, and she turned away
with loathing and disdain. What was the homage
of the world to her, since she had failed to gain the
love of the only one whose love appeared worth
possessing
?
That thought hurled her from the proud
pinnacle upon which the applause of others had
placed her, and she fell even in her own esteem, for
his
eyes were the only optics through which she
contemplated herself. God! He despises me!
was a thought like molten lead on her haughty
spirit.
The day passed as sluggishly with Rodolpho. He
wandered from one place of amusement to another,
but his thoughts were still fixed on midnight, and it
was impossible to divert them. But he
contemplated
the coming hour with different feelings from
those that tortured the gentle bosom of poor Thisbe.
The one looked forward with joy and hope; the
other anticipated anguish and despair.
Angelo, the trembling Podesta, dreamt throughout
the day of the
piombi
, the canal Orfano, spies, and
jealousy of both his wife and Thisbe. He had
married from interest and not for love, and he was
well aware that his conduct was not calculated to
secure the affections of the timid being whose
destiny
had been linked to his against her will.
Indifference
was succeeded by neglect, neglect by
aversion
,
and aversion by cruelty. The vicious usually
adjudge the motives and actions of others by their
own standard; and thus Angelo adjudged his wife.
His suspicions had been awakened, and, without
going to the trouble of ascertaining their truth or
falsity, he confined her to a room in his palace, from
which escape was impossible. In that age tyranny
was a prerogative of the powerful, and suffering the
badge of the feeble.
Time pursues the same even and steady course,
whether he brings forth weal or woe. The breath
of joy will not hasten his flight, nor will the tears
of sorrow retard his swooping wing. The hour of
midnight, looked for so impatiently by both Rodolpho
and Thisbe, at length arrived. The Podesta had
retired to his lonely couch, and sleep pervaded the
whole palace, save in the chamber of Catharina, and
she was doomed to weep and pray.
This chamber was richly decorated with scarlet
and gold, after the luxurious fashion of the age. In
an angle of the room stood a magnificent bed, in an
alcove, which was surmounted by a canopy supported
by columns, upon which the workman had bestowed
his utmost skill. From the corners of the canopy
descended crimson curtains, which, when closed,
entirely concealed the bed. Near the bed, and
against the wall was a desk and cushion for the
purpose
of prayer, over which was suspended a rude
crucifix of polished brass. There was a massive
door, the columns of which were richly carved, and
which led to the chamber of the Podesta. Near this
VOL. I.3
was a smaller door, of similar workmanship. There
were two windows; one grated, and the other open,
leading to a balcony, through which were seen in the
clear moonlight the gardens and spires of Padua. In
the centre of the room stood a table, upon which were
scattered books, music, and a guitar. It was after
midnight, lights were still burning, and Daphne and
Reginella, two of the attendants upon the Podesta's
wife, were awaiting her return from her oratory,
which adjoined the apartment, and whither she had
withdrawn to offer up her prayers before retiring to
rest.
Yes, Daphne, it is certain, said Reginella. I
had it from Troilo, the night guard. It occurred
during the last voyage that my lady made to Venice.
An infamous sbire became enamoured of herdared
to write to herendeavoured to see her. That he
should think of such a thing! But my lady made
enquiry, and has done well.
Well, well, Reginella; but my lady wishes her
prayer book, you know.
Reginella approached the table, turned over the
books, and continuedAs to the other adventure,
she is more fearful, and I am also. I advise you to
exercise prudence. One must be careful what one
says in this palace, for there is always some one
within the walls, who overhears every thing.
Well, well, despatch. We will talk another
time. My lady waits.
Since you are so urgent, go then, said Reginella,
handing her a book; but without raising her eyes
from the table, she proceeded to arrange it. Daphne
withdrew by the small door, and Reginella continued
talking, without being conscious that she was alone.
But mind, Daphne, I recommend silence in this
cursed place. This is the only chamber where one
may speak in safety. Ah! here at least there is
tranquillity. We may here talk without trembling.
This is the only place where one may speak, certain
of not being overheard.
While pronouncing the last words, a sliding door
in the wall opened, and Homodei silently entered,
and closed the pannel without her perceiving him.
He stood for a moment, and then said, in a cold
sepulchral tone:
This is the only place where one may speak,
certain of not being overheard.
Heavens!
Silence! exclaimed the mysterious visiter; and
throwing open his cloak, discovered the letters
C. D. X. embroidered in gold upon his doublet of
black velvet. Reginella regarded him with terror,
for she was aware that she stood in the presence of
a spy of the Council of Ten. Homodei continued:
Whoever has seen one of us, and allows another
to discover it by any sign, before the close of the
day, his lips will be closed for ever. It is thus the
people speak of us, and they speak truly.
Holy Virgin! by what door did he enter!
ejaculated
the trembling girl.
By none!She stood mute with terror, her
hands clasped. He continuedAnswer all my
questions, and deceive me in nothing. On your life
answer. Whence leads that door? he demanded,
pointing to the large one.
To the bed-chamber of the Podesta.
And that one? pointing to the small door
adjoining
.
To a secret staircase that communicates with
the galleries of the palace. The Podesta alone has
the key.
It is well. Here is another door!
That leads to the oratory of my lady.
Is there a passage from the oratory?
No, it is built in a turret. There is a grated
window in it to admit the light.
I see, said Homodei, looking out of the
chamber
windowIt is on a level with this.
Twenty-four
feet of wall and the Brenta at the baseThat
is well. But there is a small staircase in the
oratory
,
whither does it lead?
To my chamber, which is also that of Daphne.
Is there a passage from that chamber?
No, signor; there is a grated window but no
door, except that which descends to the oratory.
When your mistress returns, you must go to
your chamber, and remain there without listening
and without breathing a word.
I shall obey.
Where is your mistress?
In the oratory, at her prayers.
She will return here presently.
Yes, signor.
Not before half an hour?
No.
It is well. Begone. Above all, silence. See
nothing that passes here; allow all to be done and
say nothing. Remember; you have not seen me;
you know not that I exist. If a word escapes you
I shall overhear it; a wink, I shall see it; a pressure
of the hand, I shall feel it. Go nowgo.
O God! who then is to die here?
Yourself, if you speak. On a signal from
Homodei
,
she tottered through the small door that led to
the oratory, and when she had disappeared, he
approached
and again opened the secret pannel, and
said in a low voice, Signor Rodolpho, you can
come forththere are nine steps to ascend.
Footsteps
were heard on the stairs behind the pannel,
and Homodei counted every treadEight, nine
enter. Rodolpho appeared enveloped in a cloak.
Where am I? he demanded, looking around.
Perhaps on the plank of your scaffold, replied
the other.
What say you?
Did it never occur to you that there is in Padua
a chamber, full of flowers and perfumes, and love,
perhaps, where no man dare to enter, noble nor
subject
,
young nor old; for to enter there, even to open
the door, is a crime punished by death?
Yes, the chamber of the Podesta.
Right; you are right.
Ha! that chamber
You are in it.
And the wife of the Podesta?
Is Catharina Bragadini, she whom you love.
Is it possible! Catharina, the wife of Malipieri!
If you are fearful, there is still time to escape.
Behold, the door is openyou can depart.
I fear not for myself, but for her. How can I
depend on you?
Depend on me?I will explain: Eight days
ago, an hour after nightfall, you were passing along
the street of San-ProdocimoYou were aloneYou
heard a clashing of swords and a cry behind the
church, and hastened to the spot.
Yes, and put to flight three assassins who
attempted
to kill a man in a mask.
Who left you without telling his name or
thanking
you. That man in the mask was me, and since
that night signor, I wished you well. You did not
know me, but I knew you, and from motives of
gratitude, have sought you out to bring you to the
woman you love. Will you trust me now?
O yes! Thanks, thanks! I apprehended
treachery
on her account, only, but you have relieved me.
Ah! you are my friend, and have tenfold repaid the
favour I conferred on you. I only saved your life,
but you would restore to me all that makes life
happy.
You will remain, then?
Remain! I trust in you, I tell you. O, to see
her again! one hour, one minute to behold her!
you know not how much is contained in those words,
to see her again! But where is she?
In her oratory.
And where shall I see her?
Here. In this room, within a quarter of an hour.
He proceeded to communicate the information he
had received from Reginella, touching the various
passages in the palace. Pointed out the position of
the Podesta's chamber, and informed him that he
was asleep at that hour; showed him the window,
but advised him to use it in no extremity, as it was
3*
twenty-four feet from the ground, and the river
flowing beneath. He concluded with saying,I
will leave you for the present.
You have said she will be here within a quarter
of an hour. Will she come alone?
Perhaps not. Conceal yourself for a time.
Where?
Behind the bedNo, on the balcony. You can
return when you think proper. Hark!they are
removing the chairs in the oratoryCatharina is
about to return. It is time for us to separate.
Adieu.
My wealthmy life are at your disposal for this
service, said Rodolpho, and hastily concealed
himself
on the balcony.
She is not yet yours, signor, muttered
Homodei
to himself, and watching until Rodolpho had
disappeared
,
he drew a letter from his bosom which he
placed on the table, and then cautiously withdrew
by the secret door which he closed after him.
Catharina
and Daphne came from the oratory, the former
dressed in the gorgeous robes of a noble Venetian,
though like the flower in the desert, condemned to
blossom and to fade unseen.
She was truly what Homodei had pronounced her
to Thisbea fair woman. Her figure was
delicately
framed, but with perfect symmetry, and her tread
was so light and airy that the fall of her footstep
was not heard. Her golden hair was luxuriant.
Her face pallid, serious, calm, but the expression was
so mild and beautiful, that it would have served as
a model for the skilful artist, when portraying his
ideas of the first most perfect work of the master
hand, immediately after the deep shadows of this
world had mingled in her angel face with the
radiant
beams of heaven. When the fearful contest
in her gentle bosom, was earth or Eden, her husband
or her God?Still, though the shadows of this world
had darkened the fair brow of Catharina, it was but
a shadowthere was no stain of earth there. The
limpid stream will appear turbid when a cloud
passes over it, but withdrawn, it again sparkles and
dimples in the sunshine.
Catharina seated herself by the table and
demanded
,
Where is Reginella?
She has gone to her chamber, and thrown
herself
upon her knees in prayer, replied Daphne;
shall I call her to serve you, my lady.
No, let her serve Godlet her pray. Alas! I
do nothing but pray!
Shall I close this window, madam?
Five weeksalready five eternal weeks have
passed, and I have not seen him! murmured
Catharina
,
while her attendant approached the window
to close itNo, no, do not close the window, the
night-breeze refreshes me. How my temples burn!
Feel, Daphne. And I shall never see him again!
Guarded and imprisoned hereyes, all is over! To
penetrate this chamber is a deadly crime. I do not
wish to see him myselfnot hereI tremble at the
thought!Good God! then is my affection criminal!
Why did he return to Padua!and why do I seek
for happiness who am condemned to find so little!
The only light that cheered my life was the few
brief interviews I had with him; but alas! I shall
never again behold the face whence day shone upon
meall is darkness now. O Rodolpho! Tell me,
Daphne, do you really think I shall ever see him
again?
My lady.
For seven years I have had in my heart but one
thoughtlove! but one sentimentlove! but one
nameRodolpho! My very soul is formed from
his image, and how could it be otherwiseI was
young when first I loved him. They marry us
without
pityhusband, father, were both merciless! O
that I had still my mother!
Banish these melancholy thoughts, madam.
But am I culpable!O no!Retire, my grief
afflicts you, and I would not give you pain. Go to
rest; return to Reginella.
And you, my lady?
I will submit alone. Sleep sweetly, my good
Daphne; but for me, I cannot sleep. Go nowgo.
Daphne retired through the oratory, and Catharina,
musing at the table, continuedThere was a song
he used to sing at my feet in a tone so impassioned,
she seized the guitar and played a melancholy air.
I wish to recall the words. I would give my life
to hear him sing them but once again, even though
I could not behold him. But his voiceto hear his
voice.
Rodolpho sang a plaintive air in a low voice, from
the balcony. Heavens, shrieked Catharina,
starting
from her seat, and the next instant her lover
appeared
,
and disengaging himself from his cloak, which
he let fall near the balcony, he uttered her name and
threw himself at her feet.
You are here! she said, how came you here?
O God! I die with joy and terror. Rodolpho, know
you where you are, and the danger of entering this
chamber?you risk your life.
What is that to me? I should have died had I
not seen you again, and death will be less painful
after this.
You have done well. My life is also in danger;
but I see you again, and care not what follows. One
hour of bliss with you, then let the canopy of heaven
darken over us if it will.
Heaven will rather protect us. All are asleep
in the palace, and there is no reason that I may not
escape by the way I entered.
How did you gain admittance?
A man whose life I saved, aided me. I am sure
of the means I employed.
O, if you are sure, that is sufficient. But, look
at me that I may see you.
Catharina!
You find me much changed, is it not so? I will
tell you the reason. For five weeks I have done
nothing but weep and pray; and what have you done
all that time?Have you been very sad or not?
What effect has our separation had upon you? Speak
to me, I wish to hear the sound of your voice again.
O! Catharina, to be separated from you is to
feel the pangs of death daily. Life has been as a
dungeon where no ray of hope can entermidnight
without a star. It was no longer life but death,
without an exemption from those sufferings which
death affords. What I have done, I know not;
what I have felt I have told you.
It has been even thus with meI see that our
hearts cannot be separated. I have many things to
say to you; but where to begin? They have
imprisoned
meI have endured much. But let us not
think of that nowYou will remain until morning,
when Daphne will enable you to escape. What
moments
of bliss!well I no longer fear any thing,
your presence has encouraged meHow happy I am
in seeing you! Had I the choice of Paradise or you,
I would choose you, Rodolpho. Ask Daphne how I
have wept! She has had much trouble with me, poor
girl, but you shall thank her, and Reginella also.
But tell me, have you the means of returning here?
How else could I exist!Fear nothing for the
future. Behold how calm the night is!all is love
with us, all repose around us. The angels love as
we love, and blend their ethereal essence. O!
Catharina
,
our passion is so pure and sacred, that God
will not disturb it. I love youyou me, and his eye
is upon us; I recoil not even at that conviction. There
are but us three awake at this hour. Fear nothing.
There are moments when one may forget every
thing, and forgetfulness is happiness to the
unfortunate
.
When separated, I am no more than a poor
prisoner; you a banished man; but when together,
we draw down the envy of angels, for sure they have
less of heaven than we have. But they will not kill
me with joy, for I wish to dieall is confusion in
my brain. I have asked a thousand questions, and
do not recollect a word I have said. I recollect you
you only!Is it not all a dream? Art thou
indeed
there?
My beloved.
Nay, do not speak, but let me collect my ideas.
Let me look at you again, my life, my soul, and think
that you are there. There are moments, such as
this, when one would gaze upon the man one
loves, and say to himPeace, peace, I gaze on you!
Peace, I love you! Peace, I am happy! He seized
her trembling hand, and pressed it to his lips with
fervour. She turned, and perceiving the letter which
Homodei had placed on the table, exclaimed, What
is that lying there? A letter! Speak, did you place
it there?
No. But doubtless the man who came with me.
The man who came with you? Who? That
paper fills me with terror. She opened the letter,
and eagerly read as follows:
There are men who will drink no other than
Cyprus wine; there are others who delight alone in
refined vengeance. Madam, though the love of a
humble sbire may be despised, his vengeance is to
be dreaded.
Good Heavens! What say you?
I know the writing. It is from a wretch who
dared to love me; who told me so, and approached
me one day at Venice. I had him driven away.
His name?
He was called Homodei, a spy of the Council of
Ten.
We are lost.
Yes, we are lost. A snare has been spread for
us, and we are taken. She approached the
balcony
,
and looking out of the window, exclaimed,
Ah! put out the lights, quickly.
What alarms you, demanded Rodolpho, as he
extinguished the lamps.
A light appeared on the gallery that overhangs
the Molino bridge, and suddenly vanished.
Miserable madman that I am! Catharina, I am
the cause of your destruction!
Say not so. I would have come to you had it
been in my power. The fear of death would not
have deterred me. She placed her ear to the small
door that lead to the secret stairway. Silence! I
think I hear footsteps in the corridor. Yesa door
opens! Some one approaches! Which way did you
enter?
By a secret door, which the demon has closed.
What's to be done?
That door?
Leads to my husband's chamber.
The window?
An abyss beneath.
That door there. Whither will that conduct
me?
To my oratory, from which there is no passage.
No means of flight. No matter; enter there.
She opened the door, and Rodolpho entered
precipitately
.
She closed it after him, locked it, and
put the key in her bosom, then drew the hangings
over the door. It was a moment of fearful suspense.
She listened, as if she were breathless, motionless.
Footsteps were still heard, cautiously approaching.
Then a pause. He had stopped doubtless to listen
also, fearful of being surprised. But who could it
be? At such an hour! Perhaps some one who came
to her assistance. If so, he need not expect that
mercy he entertained for her. The steps drew
nigherthe hand was on the door. Catharina, more
dead than alive, hastily tore off her upper garment,
threw herself upon the bed, and closed the curtains.
All, for a moment, was silent as the grave. She
heard the key applied to the lockthe door open
footsteps within the chamber. She sank upon the
pillow, her senses benumbed with terror. Thisbe
entered, a lamp in her hand. Her features were
haggard and pale. She advanced, looking wildly
around, and approaching the table, examined the
lamp that had been extinguished. So, the lamp
still smokes! She turned, and perceiving the bed,
hastened to it and drew open the curtains, and raised
the light so that it shone on Catharina's face. She
is alone, and feigns to sleep. She then walked
around the chamber, and examined the doors and the
wall minutely. That door leads to the Podesta.
She then knocked with the back of her hand against
the door of the oratory, which was concealed by the
hangings. There should be a door here. She
knocked again. Yes, it is right. His cold eye is
a quick one. Catharina raised herself in the bed,
and looked at Thisbe, stupified with fear and
amazement
,
and in a faint voice demanded, What means
all this?
So, you are awake! said Thisbe, in a tone of
derision. I will tell you what it means. The
mistress
of the Podesta, has the wife of the Podesta in
her power. You slept; but this is no dream.
Heavens!
Yes, a comedian, a ballad singer, as you call us,
has in her power a haughty dame, who prides herself
on her virtue, and is respected as a wife; and yet
the poor worm she despises can hold up this
renowned
and gilded thing to public scorn, and tear her to
shreds and tatters. Ah! the proud dames! Haughty
and scornful hypocrites, I know you well! And I
also know that I have one of you under my feet
now, and she shall not escape me! And she would
appear tranquil! Come, tell me, madam, how it is
that you have the hardihood to gaze upon me when
you have a lover near you? Shame! Crouch and
hide yourself.
You are deceived.
Deny it not. Those chairs still mark your
position
.
You should have arranged them better. But
why deny it? A thousand tender things were said,
doubtless, such as, I love you, I adore you, I am
thine! Ah! touch me nottouch me not.
Catharina arose from the bed, and scarcely
articulated
,
I cannot comprehend you.
Must I speak more plainly? That which I say
aloud, in open day, you whisper to your lover
blushingly
at midnight. The hour is the only difference
between us. No, there is another. I deceive no
one! You cheat the world, your family, your
husband
,
and would deceive your God himself, if it
were possible. Such are the virtuous women who
pass along the streets in veilstoo pure and timid
for the eye of man to rest upon. They go to church,
kneel and fall prostrate there, with heaven on their
lips, but hell in their hearts. But this is idle. I lose
time. Where is he?
Who?
He!he!The man whose kisses are still warm
upon your lips.
I am alone here, all alone, responded
Catharina
,
meekly. I understand you notI know you
notbut your words fill me with terror. I am not
aware that I have ever wronged you, and cannot
imagine what interest you have in treating me thus.
What interest have I!a deep and abiding one!
Do you doubt it?These virtuous women are
incredulous
!Would
I have sought you out, and
spoken to you as I have, if there was not frenzy in
my brain, hatred in my heart!You ask what wrong
you have done me?You are one of those haughty
ones who mercilessly scorn and trample on the fallen
of their own sex, though your only virtue is to keep
concealed from the eye of man the shame that
Heaven
has recorded. For this I hate you, and will
tear off the mask, the veil, and exhibit the proud
immaculate in her native deformity.Scorn for
scorn!Come, where is that man?speakthe
name of that man?show him to me, for I will see
that man.
God, my God! what will become of me?
exclaimed
Catharina, clasping her hands. In the
name of heaven, madam, if you know
I know allthat there is a door behind that
curtain
,
and that
he
is there.
It is my oratory, madam,nothing else. There
is no one there. If you have heard any thing, you
have been deceived. I lead an isolated life
imprisoned
hereconcealed from the eyes of all.
Let me see.
It is my oratory, I assure you; and there is
nothing
VOL. I.4
there except a desk and my books of
devotion
.
Subterfuge!
Shall I swear to you that no one is concealed
there?
Fair lips can tell foul lies.
Madam! exclaimed Catharina, in a tone of
indignation
,
which was suddenly checked by shame
and fear.
That is well, said Thisbe, her dark eye fixed
upon her. But are you the fool to crouch as a
trembling criminal, if innocent?Deny with more
assurance, if you would be believed. Come,
vindicate
yourself, and assume that anger that becomes
one wrongfully accused. Thisbe perceived the
cloak that Rodolpho had dropped near the balcony;
she ran and picked it up, and continued, Ah!
hold; it is no longer possible! behold this cloak!
Heavens!
But this is not a cloak, is it?It is not a man's
cloak, you would say. Away with subterfuge, it
will no longer avail. Tell me, I say, the name of
that man.
I know not what you would have me say.
Thisbe paused, slowly glancing her eye from the
head to the foot of her humbled and trembling
victim
,
and then said calmly, but firmlyThat is
your oratory?open it.
Wherefore?
I would pray to God also.I have need to pray.
Open it.
I have lost the key.
Open it, I say.
I know not where the key is.
Ah!your husband has it, said Thisbe, with a
smile of triumph; and raising her voice cried
Angelo
!
Angelo!Then darted towards the door
leading to the Podesta's chamber. Catharina threw
herself before her, and endeavoured to restrain her.
Noyou shall not approach that door, she
excaimed
,
clinging to Thisbe. You shall not.I
never wronged youI know not what you have
against me,and yet you would destroy me.You
should pity me. Thisbe endeavoured to disengage
herself from her grasp. Catharina continued, in an
earnest and hurried mannerStay an instant
you shall seeI will explain all to you. A single
instant. Since you came, I have been bewildered,
stupified. Of all you have said, I only recollect
that you told me you are a comedian, and that I am
a haughty woman. That you hate me. You have
not yet spoken of the
Sbire
, and I am certain that
he has occasioned all.He is a fearful man, and has
deceived you. A spy!one should not credit a
spy! Thisbe manifested impatience. O! hear
me an instant longer.If I prayed to a man, he
would turn from me, but you have more pity. You
are too beautiful to be cruel.Say, was it not that
spy?shun him;it is frightful even to know him.
You will speedily regret having caused my death.
Hold! hold! do not awake my husband. He will
kill me!If you knew my situation, you would
weep for meweep with me. I am not culpable
not very culpable. I have perhaps been imprudent,
but not guilty. It is because I have lost my mother.
She would have directed me better. I tell you, I
have no longer a mother. O! have pity on me. Do
not go to that door, I beseech you, I beseech you, I
beseech you!
I will hear no more. My lord, Angelo! cried
Thisbe, elevating her voice.
Hold, for God's sake, hold! continued
Catharina
.
I have told you that he will kill me. Since
you are resolved, grant me one minute more to pray
to Heaven. Thisbe pointed to the oratory. No,
no, I will not go there. I will throw myself upon
my knees here, before this crucifix. She knelt
upon the cushion, and pointed at the crucifix
suspended
against the wall. Thisbe started as she fixed
her eyes upon it. Catharina continuedO! for
mercy's sake, pray beside mewill you?Kneel
and pray with me. And then, if you seek my life,
if God will allow you to entertain such thoughts,
while gazing on His image who opened the gates of
mercy to mankind, do with me as you please.
Thisbe grasped the crucifix and tore it from the
wall, and eagerly demandedWhere did it come
from?How did you obtain it?Who gave it you?
What!that crucifix?O! you will gain
nothing
by asking me questions concerning that.
Answer me. How came it in your possession?
Speak quickly. Thisbe hastened to the lamp, and
examined the crucifix minutely. Catharina arose
and followed her.
You gaze on the name at the footit is the name
of a person I know not.Thisbe, I think. She
proceeded briefly to relate the manner in which the
crucifix had come into her possession, which
corresponded
with the account given by Thisbe to the
Podesta
.
Heavens! my mother! muttered Thisbe. This
then is the angel who interceded for thee in thy
extremity
!
Angelo, who had been awakened by the outcries
of Thisbe, now entered the chamber, dressed in his
night robe. Catharina, on perceiving him, scarcely
articulated My husband! I am lost!and sank
upon a chair beside the table. The actress was
concealed
in an angle leading to the balcony.
What does this mean, madam? demanded
Angelo
.
I thought I heard a noise here.
My lord! said Catharina, in a faltering voice.
How comes it that you are not in bed at this
hour? continued AngeloAndgood heavens!
you are trembling! Is there any one with you?
Yes, my lord, I am here, responded the actress,
advancing from the recess.
You, Thisbe!
Yes,Thisbe. She stood beside him calm
and collected. The wild and impassioned creature,
whose feelings had been so recently lashed to
madness
,
had on the instant cast off the fearful garb in
which her soul had been arrayed, and she appeared
a cold and passive thing, but that the eye betrayed
the volcano still raging within.
You here, in the middle of the night, said the
Podesta. How comes it that you are hereand
at such an hour;and shebehold her.
Is trembling like an aspen, continued Thisbe.
I will explain that to you, my lord. Listen to me:
but it will give you pain.
Well, it is all over! sighed Catherina.
Go on.
In two words then. You are to be assassinated
to-morrow morning, said the actress, keeping her
unwavering eye fixed upon the Podesta.
I assassinated!
Would that be strange in Padua?The attempt
will be made in going out of your palace to mine.
It is known that in the morning you usually go out
alone. I received information late this night, and
came here in haste to inform my lady that she might
prevent your going out to-morrow. This is the
reason
why I am here at such an hour, and why my lady
trembles.
Great God! what is this woman? said
Catharina
,
mentally.
Is it possible! exclaimed Angelo. But why
should I be astonished?You know I told you of
the dangers that surround me?But who gave you
the information?
An unknown man, who first exacted a promise
that I would enable you to escape.I have kept my
my promise.
You have done wrong. They promise in such
cases, but fail to perform.How did you gain
entrance
into the palace?
The man assisted me. He found means to open
a small door which is under the bridge Molino.
Say you so!But how did you manage to
penetrate
so far as this?
By means of the key which you gave me
yourself
,
replied Thisbe, promptly.
4*
I think I did not tell you that it opened this
chamber.
Yes, in truth. But you forget.
The Podesta perceived the cloak lying on the
floor, and demanded To whom belongs this cloak?
Catharina, who had listened with amazement to
the foregoing, now trembled with terror. She felt
that her fate was in the hands of an inexplicable
being, who but a few moments before would have
hurled her to destruction, and now interposed as her
guardian angel.But by what motive was she
actuated
?Was
it to save Rodolpho or Catharina from
the impending blow?Would she have the presence
of mind to escape the dilemma in which the
question
of the Podesta involved them?These doubts
flashed like lightning across the brain of Catharina,
and her amazement was increased, when she heard
the actress promptly and calmly reply
That cloak belongs to the man who conducted
me. He lent it me to enter the palace. Her eyes
wandered around the room as if in search of
something
,
and as they met those of Catharina, she added,
I have his hat also, but I know not what I have
done with it.
Her voice was steady, her eye unwaveringthere
was truth in her tone and look, and the doubts of
the Podesta were dissipated.
To think that such men can approach me when
they please! What a life is mine!A skirt of my
robe is always in one snare or another!But tell
me, Thisbe?
O forbear further questions until to-morrow, I
beseech you. For this night your life is safe; you
should be content.You do not even thank my lady
and myself.
Pardon, Thisbe.
My litter awaits me below. Will you not give
me your hand and conduct me to it?Come, let my
lady sleep for the present. She requires rest.
I am at your commands, Thisbe.Allow me to
go to my apartment and get my sword. Ho! there,
lights.
He passed from the apartment into his own.
Thisbe approached Catharina and said in a hurried
voice
Lose no time in letting
him
escape; you know
whom I mean.By the passage I entered. Here is
the key. She placed the small key she had
received
from Angelo in the palsied hand of
Catharina
,
who sat mute and motionless, then turning her
face towards the oratory continuedO! that door!
I shall suffocate! I know it can be no other than
he! Angelo returned.
I attend you, madam.
Thisbe stood gazing at the door of the oratory,
and sighedO! if I could but see him pass!In
safety once again!But some way he must escape!
After a struggle of intense agony, she collected
herself
,
and turning to Angelo, said
Come, my lord, let us go.
He took her hand, and conducted her out.
Catharina
sat gazing after them vacantly until she heard
the door close, when, starting from her seat, she
clasped her forehead with her hands, and exclaimed
It is a dream!
PART III.
The White for the Black.
The
day succeeding the events just related was
a solemn yet busy day in the chapel of St. Antonio
of Padua. The shrine of the saint was uncovered;
workmen were busily employed in hanging the choir
and great altar with black; three hundred candles
of white wax were arranged, ready to be lighted;
no orders were issued above a whisper; the priests
stalked silently to and fro, with arms folded and
heads bent to their bosoms. And for whose
obsequies
were these unusual preparations? What
kindred
dust were they to assist in rendering up its last
account! No one knew; no one could divine. The
black hangings were ornamented with the arms of
the family of Malipieri and those of Bragadini. This
was the only clue that led to the conjecture that a
person of distinction was dead or about to die, but
which was unknown.
In the dark vaults of the ducal palace were the
tombs of the Romana. Here reposed the illustrious
dead in their marble sepulchres. Power, and wealth,
and pride were mouldering here, and by their union
could purchase nothing more than a gorgeous
monument
,
to mark the receptacle of their decay. Two
men were in the vault, and had just finished digging
a grave. But who was to rot there, they knew not,
cared not. Our entrance into this world is heeded
by few, our passage through it attended with pain
and anxiety in which few sympathize, and our exit
is noted by few and soon forgotten. Such is life
made up of hopes seldom realizedanxiety never
allayed. Beside the grave was a slab of newly
polished
marble; but no inscription was on itno
trace that would betray for whom that narrow house
was built.
We must now return to the chamber of Catharina.
Every thing appeared as on the night preceding, but
that the chamber was vacant. Its unfortunate inmate
was in her oratory, on her knees, weeping and
praying
.
Angelo entered from his own apartment, where
he had been in conversation with the prior of Saint
Antoine and another priest. He spoke as he entered:
You say, holy prior, that the church has been
decorated as I ordered? The Prior bowed assent.
It is well. Within two hours perform there the
solemn service for the eternal repose of an illustrious
one who is at that time to die. You will assist at
that service with all the chapter. Distribute alms
to six hundred poor, and give each a ducat of silver
and a sequin of gold.
Powerful Podesta, you shall be obeyed.
After that, descend with all your clergy, cross
and banner at your head, into the vault of the ducal
palacethe tombs of the Romana. You will there
see a grave newly dugyou will bless that grave.
Lose no time, and in your prayers pray for me also.
It is then, my lord, one of your parents.
Gogo The prior bowed profoundly, and
withdrew to perform the solemn duties required of
him. The other priest was about to follow, when
Angelo stopped him. You, arch-pretor, stay. There
is in that oratory a person that you must go and
confess forthwith.
A condemned man, my lord?
A woman.
Am I to prepare her for death?
Yes, for death. Come, I will introduce you.
As they approached the oratory, an usher
appeared
at the principal door, and saidYour
excellency
sent for Donna Thisbe. She is without.
Let her enter, and await my coming here.
The usher withdrew. Angelo opened the door of
the oratory, and motioned the priest to enter, but
staying him at the threshold said
On your life, when you go hence, be careful that
you mention to no one the name of the woman you
have seen. The priest laid his hands upon his
bosom, and bowed his head in silence. They entered
the oratory together. In a few moments the usher
again appeared, accompanied by Thisbe.
Do you know what he wishes with me?
I do not, madam, he replied, and retired,
leaving
the actress alone. Her mind was in a tumult,
racked by contending feelings, as she found herself
in that chamber again. For what purpose had the
Podesta sent for her? There was a sinister and
gloomy air pervading the whole palace, that did not
escape her notice, but which it was impossible to
penetrate; still it concerned not her, for at that
moment there was nothing she would so freely have
parted with as life. She fixed her eyes upon the door
of the oratory, and passion agitated her whole frame.
It was behind that door that
he
was concealed. Who?
Her heart answered that it was
he
alone. Still there
was room to doubt. But if she were sure it was
Rodolphovery sureample proof in her hands
the startling thought occurred for an instant that she
would destroy him, denounce him, consign him to a
bloody death! No! Revenge was unequal to a task
like that. Still she could avenge herself on that
woman! A flash of triumph kindled her dark eye
at the thought; but she suddenly perceived the rude
brass crucifix, and the fearful light was extinguished.
What was to be done! She could kill herself! O yes!
Rodolpho no longer loved her; he had deceived her;
his heart was devoted to another! Then what had
she to do with life! Death would be preferable. But
to die without avenging herself, when vengeance,
ample and fearful, was in her hands! Would she
have the fortitude, the self denial, to dash away the
most tempting cup that could be held to the feverish
lips of the injured! All was confusion in her brain.
One idea alone was terribly distinct. Either they
or she must die!
Angelo returned to the apartment during this war
of conflicting feelings. The priest was in the
oratory
with Catharina. She collected her wandering
thoughts, and there was no outward appearance of
emotion as she calmly saidYou sent for me, my
lord?
I did, Thisbe. I have much to say to you of
matters of moment. You are aware that every day
of my life presents a snare to be avoided, treason to
be discovered, a blow from a poniard to be received,
or a stroke from the axe to be given. In a word,
my wife is false. She has a lover.
What is his name? demanded Thisbe, and a
slight flush tinged her pale countenance.
He was with her last night when we were here.
What is his name?
I will tell you how the discovery was made,
continued Angelo, without heeding her question
A spy of the Council of Ten, was found this
morning
,
poniarded, on the brink of the river, near the
bridge Altina. Two of the night-watch discovered
him, but whether he fell in a duel, or by the blow of
an assassin, is unknown. The wounded man could
pronounce but a few words ere he died. At the
time when he was stabbed, he had the presence of
mind to conceal about his person a letter, which he
no doubt had intercepted, and which he sent to me
by the night-watch. It proves to be a letter to my
wife from a lover.
What is his name? again demanded Thisbe.
The letter is not signed. The murdered man
mentioned his name to the night-watch, but the
imbeciles
have forgotten it. They could not recall it
one said it was Roderigo, the other Pandolfo.
And the letter, have you that?
I have. It was to show it to you that I sent
for youPossibly you may know the hand-writing,
and may direct me. Behold!
Give it me.
He took the letter from his bosom and crushed it
passionately in his hand.
I am in a fearful suspense, Thisbe!There is a
man who has dared to raise his eyes upon the wife
of a Malipieri!Has dared to make a blot on the
most brilliant page of the golden book of Venice
on that page where my name is written. That man
was last night in this chamber, and perhaps walked
upon the spot where now I stand. He wrote this
letter, and yet I cannot lay hold upon him, and nail
my vengeance on the affront. O! that I could make
him cross a sea of blood upon this floor! To know
that man, I would give ten years of my life! my
right hand! the shroud of my father!
Show me the letter.He handed it to her, she
tore it open, and on the first glance recognised the
hand-writing of Rodolpho, so long familiar to her.
The shock was startling, but she suppressed all
outward
appearance of concern.
Do you know the writing? demanded Angelo.
Let me read, she calmly replied, and
proceeded
as follows:Catharina, my best beloved one,
you see plainly that heaven protects us. It was a
miracle that saved us last night from your husband
and that woman.That woman!I love you my
Catharinayou are the only one I ever loved. Fear
nothing for me, I am in safety.
Well, do you know the writing?
No, my lord, she replied, and leisurely folding
the letter again, returned it to him.
What think you of it? It cannot have been
written by a man who has been but a short time in
PaduaIt is the language of passion of older date.
O! I will rake the city but I will find that man!
What do you counsel, Thisbe?
Seek for him.
I have given orders that no one shall have free
access to the palace this day, except yourself and
brother; with you this precaution is unnecessary.
All others shall be arrested and brought before me,
that I may interrogate them myself. In the
meantime
I have one half of my vengeance in my hands,
and speedily shall glut it.
What mean you?
To kill that woman.
Your wife!
All is prepared; and before one hour, Catharina
Bragadini will be decapitated.
Decapitated!
Yes. In this chambershe exchanges the bed
she has defiled, for the grave. That woman must
dieI have decided dispassionately that there is but
one thing to be done, and prayers cannot move me.
Were my best friend, if I have a friend, to intercede
for her, I should distrust him. Hear all, and talk
of it if you pleaseThisbe, I have long disliked that
womanI married her for family reasons, not for
love. Her countenance is always sad, and her spirit
oppressed, when in my presence. She has never
borne me childrenand then there is hatred in the
bloodthe traditions of our family. A Malipieri
always hated some one. My grandfather hated the
marquis Azzo, and he had him drowned in the sinks
of Venice. My father hated the procurator Badoer,
and he had him poisoned at a regalia of the queen
Cornaro. For myself, I hate this woman!I would
not have done her wrong, but she is guilty and must
be punished. She shall die. Her fate is sealed.
There is no hope for mercywere the bones of my
mother to plead for her, I would turn a deaf ear,
even to the prayer of my mother.
Will the seignory of Venice allow you?
To pardon no one; to punish all, is my charter.
But the family of Bragadiniyour wife's
family
?
They will thank me.
Your resolution is fixed, you say; then let her
die. She pausedher countenance became more
deeply overcast, and a slight heaving of her fair
bosom
betrayed an inward struggle, as she continued
I approve of your resolution. But since all is still
secret, since no name has been pronounced, it would
VOL. I.5
be well to save her a torment, the palace from the
stain of blood, and yourself from public shame. The
executioner will be a witness, and one witness is too
many.
True, poison would do better. But it should
be sure and speedy, and I have none such here.
I have, replied Thisbe, in a low husky voice
that almost choked her utterance.
Where?
In my chamber.
What poison is it?
The poison Malaspina. You remember the
bottle
that was sent to me by the prior of St. Marc?
True, I rememberthat is a speedy and certain
poisonwell, you are right. It is better that the
deed should be between ourselves. Thisbe, I have
every confidence in you, and would have you
understand
that I am justified in the course I have
adopted. It is to avenge my honour, and every
man thus injured would do the same; still it is a
gloomy task in which I am engaged. I have here
no other friend than youI can trust no one but
you, and I require your aid. Will you assist me?
I will.
She will disappear without any one knowing
how or wherefore. The grave is dug, the service
will be sung, but no one knows for whom, and the
body shall be carried in secret to the grave, by the
night guards who brought this letterI still have
them in custody. You are right; let darkness
envelope
the whole transaction. Send for the poison.
I alone know where to find it, and will go
myself
.
Gobe speedy. I shall await you. Thisbe
withdrew to procure the fatal drug. Yes, it is
better as she says!I have been grossly wronged!
still the deed partakes more of the gloom of crime
than should rest upon chastisement!
The door of the oratory opened and the priest
came forth, his eyes bent down and his arms crossed
over his bosom. He walked slowly across the
chamber
,
in silence, and as he was about to go out,
Angelo
turned to him, and said
Is she prepared?
She is, my lord, replied the priest, and went
out. Catharina appeared at the door of the oratory,
and overheard the question and the answer.
Prepared for what? she demanded.
To die!
To die!Is it then true!Is it then possible!
O! I cannot realize that idea! To die! No, no, I
am not prepared; I am not prepared for that!
How long would it require to prepare yourself?
O! I know notmuch time!To die so
suddenly
!But
I have done nothing to deserve death.
My lord, my lord! still grant me one day!No, not
one day only! I know that I shall not have more
courage to-morrow. Spare my life?Let me live!
a cloister! you will not be so cruel, but that you
will let me live there?
Yeson one condition.
Name it. I wish for nothing more. Nothing
but life.
Who wrote this letter?name the man
Deliver
him to my vengeance.
My God! she exclaimed, wringing her hands
in agony.
Do this, and you shall live. The scaffold for
him, for you a conventthat will satisfy me
Decide
.
She stood statue-like, her hands clenched
together, and her eyes raised towards heaven. Well,
you do not answer me.
Yes, I will answer youmy God! a shudder
ran through her whole frame.
Decide, madam.
It was cold, very cold in that oratory.
Hear me, he continued, after a pause, in a
voice that froze her blood: I would be merciful
to you, madam. You have still one hour before you,
during which I leave you alone; no one shall
interrupt
you. Employ that hour in reflection; I place
this letter on the table. Write that man's name at
the bottom, and you are saved. Catharina
Bragadini
,
it is a mouth of marble that commands you to
deliver that man to me, or die. Make your
selection
,
you have one hour.
O! one day!
One hour, was the stern reply, and he left the
room, and locked the door after him. She
hastened
to the door, it was barredshe looked out of the
windowto escape by that means was to leap into
the arms of death. She turned away in despair, and
sank upon a sofa, overpowered by her feelings.
To die! O God! It is a terrible idea when it
comes upon one so suddenly and unexpectedly. To
have no more than one hour to live! But one hour!
O! that such a fate awaited him, that he might know
how horrible it is! I am exhausted. I cannot rest
heremy bed will refresh me better. If I could
obtain but one moment's repose!
She arose, tottered towards the bed and drew
the curtains open. She stood paralyzed for a
moment
,
then convulsively closed the curtains, and
recoiled with terror, for in the place of the bed she
beheld a block covered with a black cloth, and an
axe resting on it.
O! I can no longer look at that! Heavens it is
for me, and I am alone with it here! She
returned
to the sofa, fell upon it, and concealed her face
in her hands. Behind me! It is behind me! O!
I dare not turn my head!mercy, mercy! The
fearful preparations behind that curtain convince
me that all is reality that passes here!
The small door already alluded to, was now
cautiously opened, but not so gently but that the
sound startled Catharina, she raised her head and
beheld her lover.
Heavens! Rodolpho! In a moment he was
beside her.
Yes, Catharina, I have come to see you for an
instant. You are alone, how fortunate! But, you
are very pale, and appear distressed?
I have reason to be so. Your imprudence in
coming here in open day at present.
Ah! I was alarmedvery uneasy, and could not
stay away.
Uneasy, at what?
I will tell you presently, I am too happy in
finding you here so tranquil.
How did you enter?
With the key that you gave me yourself. He
referred to the private key which Thisbe had
obtained
from the Podesta, and which she handed to
Catharina
to give to Rodolpho.
I know that; but I mean into the palace?
That gives me some concern. I entered
without
difficulty, but I cannot go out again.
How?
The guard at the palace gate mentioned to me
that no one could pass out before night. Those are
his orders.
No one before night! Escape is then impossible!
sighed Catharina, inaudibly.
There are
sbires
traversing all the passages.
The palace is guarded as if it were a prison. I
succeeded
in gliding into the large gallery, and I am
here. You say that nothing has transpired since I
left you?
Nothing, nothing. Be at ease, Rodolpho.All
is as usual here. Look around you. You see that
nothing is deranged in this chamber. But you must
go soon. I tremble lest the Podesta should enter.
Fear nothing from that quarter. He is at this
time on the bridge Molino,there below,
questioning
those who are brought under arrest. O! I was
uneasy Catharina!a strange air pervades the whole
city to-day, as well as the palace. Bands of archers
and Venetian soldiers hurry along the streets. The
chapel of Saint Antoine is hung with black, and the
priests are now chanting a requiem for the dead.
But for whom, they are ignorant. Do you know?
Nono.
I could not enter the chapel. The city is struck
5*
with amazement. Every one speaks low. There
is something terrible going forward. Where, I know
not. It is not here, and that is all that concerns
me. My poor friend, you do not doubt all this in
your solitude?
NoO, no!
But what does it concern us!Tell me, are you
recovered from the emotion of last night? O! what
an adventure! I understand nothing yet.
Catharina
,
I have freed you from that wretch Homodei.
He will do you no more mischief.
Do you think so?
He is dead.But positively there is something!
Your countenance is sad. Catharina, conceal
nothing
from me. Has any thing occurred?O, they
shall sooner take my life than injure thee.
No, there is nothing.Only I wish you were
out of the palace. I tremble for you.
What were you doing when I entered?
Ah!Rest satisfied Rodolpho, I was not sad;
on the contrary, I was endeavouring to recall the air
that you sing so sweetly. See, I have still my
guitar
there.
I wrote to you this morning. I met Reginella,
to whom I gave the letter. It has not been
intercepted
,
I hope.It has arrived safely?
The letter has come to hand, as you perceive,
she replied, pointing to it lying on the table.
Ah! you have it! That is well. One is always
uneasy when one writes.
Reginella, after receiving the letter from
Rodolpho
,
was hastening to the palace, when she was met
by Homodei. He had seen them together, suspected
what was going forward, and by working upon the
poor girl's fears, finally became possessed of that
evidence, which would ultimately gratify his revenge,
should it fail to terrify Catharina into submission to
his passion. He was exulting in his triumph, and
still undetermined which course to adopt, when
Rodolpho
crossed his path near the bridge Altina.
Inflamed
with rage at the treachery that had been
practised
upon him the preceding night, and feeling that
the life of Catharina and his own were in the hands
of a wretch, influenced by no principle of humanity,
he attacked and slew him, viewing it as an act
justified
by the laws of self-preservation. The deed was
no sooner done than Rodolpho was alarmed by the
approach of the guards. He fled. What followed
has been made known.
All the passages from the palace are guarded,
you say? continued Catharina, And no one can
go out before night?
No one. Such is the order.
Leave me now, she continued. You have
spoken to mehave seen mehave satisfied
yourself
,
that though the city is in confusion, all is tranquil
here. Go, my Rodolpho, in the name of Heaven,
go!If the Podesta should enter!Quick! Depart!
Since you are obliged to remain in the palace
until
night, I will close your cloak myselfthat way!
Your hat on your headso!And when in the
presence of the
sbires
, assume your natural air
be at your easeno affectation to avoid themno
precaution. Precaution would denounce you. And
if by chance they should ask you to write
something
a
spywho perhaps would spread a snare
for youfind some pretext not to write.
Why that caution, Catharina?
Why?I would not have any one see your
writing. It is an idea that I have, and you well
know that women have strange ideas at times. I
thank you for having comefor having remained
I feel joyful at seeing you. You see plainly that I
am tranquil, cheerful, content,that I have my
guitar
there, and your letter. However, go quickly.
I wish you were gone. Still, one word more. You
know that I have never yet granted you any liberty
you know it well.
I do.
Notwithstanding, I would now demand
something
of you, Rodolphoone kiss!
O! it is heaven! he exclaimed, clasping her
rapturously in his arms.
I see that heaven opens to receive me.
What ecstacy!
You are happy?
Yes, very, very happy.
Retire then for the present, my Rodolpho.
Thanks! Angels watch over you!
Farewell, Rodolpho. I love you.
He hastily retired through the secret passage by
which he entered. The first impulse of Catharina,
when left alone, was to follow and fly with him.
It was but a momentary thought. The act would
bring down destruction on his head, and avail
nothing
.
Then burst forth from her trembling lips a
fervent prayer that no ill might befall himthat the
sbires
might not arrest himno one prevent his
escape at night. But what reason was there that
suspicion should fall on him?Thought succeeded
thought in rapid succession. Hope and fear were
blended. She hastened to the door of the corridor,
and listened in breathless suspense to his receding
footsteps. When no longer heard, she raised her
bended form, clasped her hands, and she
exclaimed
,
in a tone of exultation, Thank God! he is
safe!
The hour had already elapsed, and Angelo again
entered the chamber, accompanied by Thisbe. There
was no trace of mercy yet to be seen in his
countenance
,
and his fair companion was pale, stern, and
to outward appearance, calm. Still there was an
occasional muscular movement of the lips, that
betrayed
that all was not quiet within. Her mind
was labouring with some fearful birth, but whether
good or ill, the trembling victim could not discover.
She dreaded the worst; and, while gazing on the
statue-like form of her supposed executioner, she
involuntarily exclaimed: What is that woman!
The same who was here last night?
Have you reflected, madam? demanded Angelo.
I have.
And you have resolved to deliver up the author
of that letter to punishment?
I have not entertained such a thought for a single
instant, she replied, with an unfaltering voice.
Courageous woman! murmured Thisbe.
Catharina was aware that she had pronounced her
own doom; but there is no sacrifice too great in the
eyes of woman to make for the man she truly loves.
There is an integrity in her affection, such as man
is incapable of feeling; for even when he imagines
that his heart is full of one object alone, there is still
room for other thoughts and feelings; but with woman
it is otherwise. She loves entirely, solely
disregards
this world, and at times her thoughts of the
next become vague, indistinct, undefined.
Angelo made a sign to Thisbe, who produced a
small golden vial, and placed it on the table.
Come, will you drink this? said the Podesta.
Is it poison?
It is, madam.
Catharine clasped her hands, and murmured in
a low voiceO! God! You will one day adjudge
this man. Have mercy on him! Have mercy on
him!
Madam, the Proveditor Urseleo, one of the
Bragadini
one
of your ancestorsdestroyed Marcella
Galbai, his wife, in the same manner, and for the
same crime.
The faults of my ancestors will not mitigate
your guilt, replied Catharina. Let us speak
plainly. You come in cold blood, with poison in
your hands! Culpable? No, I am not the slightest,
the way you imagine. But I will not descend to
justify myself, for he whose life has been one lie,
would not believe me. I know you. You married
me for my wealth; because my family had a right in
the waters of the cisterns of Venice. You said,
That brings one hundred thousand ducats a year,
and I will have that woman. And what a life have
I passed with you for five years! You never loved
me; still you are jealous, and keep me in prison.
Your life is one scene of debaucherybut that is
winked at: every thing is allowed to man. You are
always cruel, always gloomy towards me. Never a
kind word; but forever speaking of the doges that
have been in your family, and endeavouring to
humiliate
me in mine. Say, do you think this is the way
to render a woman happy? O! he should suffer what
I have endured, that he might know what is the lot
of woman! Well, I confess I loved a man before I
knew you, and I love him still. You would kill me
for that: if you have the right, the times are fearful
indeed. You are happy in having that letter for a
pretext. Well, well; adjudge, condemn, and
execute
!
In darkness, in secret, by poison! You have
the power. She turned abruptly to Thisbe, and
demandedWhat think you of that man?
Be guarded, exclaimed Angelo, flushed with
passion. Catharina continued, addressing Thisbe:
And you, who are you? What is it you would
with me? It is a noble deed you are doing here!
The notorious mistress of that man seeks the
destruction
of his wife! You have been a spy upon
me, until you have magnified a fault that enables
you to place your foot upon my head. You assist
my husband in the execrable deed he contemplates,
and possibly have furnished him with the means to
execute it. She turned to Angelo, and added
What think you of this woman, my lord?
Come, madam, finish, exclaimed the Podesta,
seizing her by the arm, and leading her to the
table.
Well, since it must be done, I will accomplish
your wishes, said Catharina, taking the vial; but,
gazing on it for a moment, she recoiledNoit
is frightful! I will not! I have not fortitude! O!
reflect on what you are doing, while there is time.
A feeble, defenceless woman, who has no parents
near her; no family; no friends; no living creature
to breathe a word in her behalf! Would you
assassinate
her! Poison her miserably in a corner of
your palace! Man, man! is there not one spark of
human feeling in your bosom?Perceiving, from
the countenance of the Podesta, that her appeal had
failed to awaken mercy, she burst into tears, and,
clasping her hands in an agony of despair, sobbed:
My mother, my mother, my mother!
The actress, who had remained a silent spectator
of the foregoing scene, now turned to wipe away the
starting tear, and sighed in a tone almost inaudible,
Poor woman! Still it was not so low but that it
reached the ear of the victim. Compassion need not
speak trumpet-tongued to be heard. Catharina
turned
to Thisbe, and seizing her hand, continued in a
hurried and tremulous voice:
You exclaimed, `poor woman!' You said so! I
heard it plainly. O! do not deny having said it.
You pity me. O, yes! Allow compassion to soften
your heart. You see that he would assassinate me.
But you would not have it so? It is impossible!
Hear me. I will explain to youtell all to you.
You will then talk to him;tell him that what he
would do is horrible. It is useless for me to say
that; but from you it will have more weight.
Sometimes
a single word from a stranger will recall a man
to reason. If I have offended you ever, pardon me.
I have never yet done any thing eviltruly evil. I
am still innocent. You understand me; but I cannot
say that to him. Men will never believe us, you
know. Do not tell me to have courage, I beseech
you. I am not ashamed at being a feeble woman,
and he ought to have compassion for me. I weep,
because I fear death. It is not my fault.
I can wait no longer, cried Angelo.
Catharina
Bragadini, your crime calls for chastisement,
the open grave for a coffin, the outraged husband
for the death of his guilty wife. Supplication for
mercy is in vain. Will you drink this? he added,
holding up the poison.
Never!
Then I return to my first intention. The sword!
the sword!Troilo! he exclaimed, and violently
left the chamber to go in pursuit of a fit creature to
execute his savage purpose.
Hear me, said Thisbe, when they were alone.
We have but an instant. Do what is required of
you, or you are lost. I cannot explain myself more
clearly, lest you commit some imprudence. Just
now you nearly awakened the suspicions of the
Podesta
,
that I sympathized with you. What
madness
.The
sword will not pardon.Drink.Resist
no longer.Since it is you whom
he
loves, there is
nothing beside yourself, at this time, to be thought
of. I tell you
that
has already broken my heart.
Catharina attempted to interrupt her, but she
continued
in the same earnest and hurried manner.
Do as you are directed. No resistancenot a
word. Above all, shake not the confidence that
your husband has in me. Do you understand? I
dare not say more:in your madness all would be
betrayed. Yes, in this chamber there is a wretch
who must dieit is so decreed; but it is not you,
not you!
I will do as you wish, replied Catharina.
Hark! I hear him returning! Thisbe hastened
to the door, and as it was thrown open, she cried
to the Podesta, Alone, alone! enter alone!
Catharina
caught a glimpse of an executioner with a
naked sword in the adjoining apartment. Angelo
entered, and the doors closing, shut out from her
view the appalling object. Thisbe continued: She
is resigned to take the poison.
Do it, and quickly, madam, said the Podesta,
addressing his wife. She took the vial, and turning
to Thisbe, said, in a subdued tone, I know that
you are the mistress of my husband. If in your
inmost
heart there lurks one thought of treachery, from
necessity to destroy me or ambition to take my
place, which no one need envy, may heaven forgive
you. And though it is hard to die so young, I
would rather do what I am about to do than that
which you have done. Saying which, she
swallowed
the potion. Thisbe replied not, betrayed no
emotion, but kept her eyes intently fixed upon her.
Angelo hastened to the door, where his minions
awaited his orders, and cried, Begone! and then
returned to gaze upon his victim.
There was a pause of fearful suspense. The
guilty and the innocent gazed in breathless silence
upon each other, communing with their own thoughts.
The deed was done, and the passion of Angelo
subsided
,
and gave place to other feelings. Rage was
succeeded by fear, and a sense of self abasement,
and he felt that Thisbe must contemplate him with
abhorrence, though her hands were of as deep a
die as his own. She stood like one heart-sick of
this world:a world that she had commenced with
shame and contumely as her heritage, and in her
progress through life, she found no one disposed
to deprive her of one jot of her birthright. It had
been paid with interest. Still she contemplated
Catharina with an interest that manifested that all
human ties were not severed. The silence was at
length broken by the dying woman:Ah! that
drink freezes my blood! Are you now satisfied, my
lord?I know well that I am about to die, and no
longer fear you. Still I must say to you, who have
been my demon here, as I shall say to my God
hereafter, I am innocent of the charge alleged against
me.
I do not believe you, replied Angelo.
I
do
believe her, murmured Thisbe.
My senses fail me, continued Catharina,
struggling
with the effects of the potion. Nonot on
that sofa. Do not touch me! she cried to Angelo,
who approached to assist her. I have already told
you that you are an infamous man!She tottered
towards the door of the oratory. I wish to die on
my knees.Before the altar.To die alone.
Without
VOL. I.6
having you two gazing on me. Having
reached
the door, she sustained herself against it for a
moment, and continued in a voice scarcely
articulate
:I
would die in prayer to Godfor you, my
lord, for you
She entered the oratory, and closed the door after
her. Angelo called one of his minions, and directed
him where to find the key of his secret hallthat in
that hall he would find two men, whom he was to
conduct to the Podesta without exchanging words
with them. The man withdrew, and Angelo turned
to Thisbe, and told her that after giving some
instructions
to the two night guards, he would confide
to her the care of superintending the completion of
the gloomy work. The night guards were shown
in, and he turned to them and said:
You have often been employed in executions at
night in this palace. You know the vault where
the tombs are?
We do, my lord.
The palace is full of soldiers. Can you descend
into that vault, and go out from the palace without
being seen?
We can. The secret passages are familiar to
us, my lord.
It is well. He opened the door of the oratory
but looked not in. There lies a woman who is
dead. Go and carry her secretly into the vault.
You will there find a slab that has been displaced,
and a grave with a coffin. Deposit the woman in
the grave and replace the slab. You understand?
Perfectly, my lord.
You are compelled to pass through my
apartment
.
I will go and see that it is cleared. He
turned to ThisbeBe careful that all may remain
secret.
Thisbe no sooner found herself alone with the
night guards, than she drew a purse from her bosom,
and saidTwo hundred sequins of gold are in this
purse.For you!And to-morrow morning double
the amount if you perform faithfully all that I shall
direct.
It is a bargain, madam, replied the guard,
taking
the purse. Where shall she go?
First to the vault, she answered, and they
entered
the oratory for the purpose of carrying the
body to the grave.
PART IV.
The Conclusion.
It
was now past the hour of midnight. Silence and
darkness reigned throughout the city. Angelo had
retired to his widowed bed, and endeavoured to sleep;
but his restless mind was delving among the tombs
where his murdered wife was deposited, and there
was no power on earth could tear it from the grave.
She stood before him, palpable to sight, in all the
freshness, beauty, and buoyancy of youth; but
suddenly
the vision changed, and his heart sickened, as
he beheld the bloated corsethe process of decay
the ghastly fragments of mortality. And yet his
mind clung to that which most appalled it. Strange
it is, that the most beautiful work of creation,whose
presence is heaven, man's greatest good, and without
whom this world had remained one chaos,when
stripped of its earthly vestment, and resolving itself
into its original elements, should become the most
revolting spectacle that man can contemplate, and
he shrinks with horror from the object he once
clasped
with ecstacy to his bosom. And yet the source
of all his joysthe beautiful exterior, that his soul
doated onwhen redolent with life contained but
this!
We must now visit the chamber of Thisbe, the
actress. But two nights before, her palace
resounded
with the revelry of the gay and noble; but now
all was dark and silent. On the tables and
fauteuils
in her chamber were scattered masks, fans, jewel
boxes half open, and various articles of theatrical
costume, in such confusion as betrayed that they had
ceased to excite her pride or ambition. With what
feelings of exultation did she not at one time
contemplate
them! They were as a talisman to recall
her hopes, her fears, her trials, her triumphs through
life. With these she had elicited the applause of
admiring thousands, until her young heart swelled
with more pride at her success in the mimic scene,
than had ever been experienced in real life by those
whose characters she counterfeited. But now the
trappings were neglected and despised. The
withering
hand of grief soon opens our eyes as to the ideal
value of the gewgaws of this world.
While the Podesta was dreaming of the grave of
his wife, Thisbe was there, with the two men whom
she had bribed to do her bidding. She held a small
lamp, and screened its rays with her cloak, while
they in silence removed the marble slab. The grave
was opened, the body taken from the coffin and
placed upon a litter. She carefully covered the
body with a sheet, placing the cross on Catharina's
bosom. The coffin was closed again, the marble slab
replaced, and the men took up the litter and
followed
the actress in silence. They entered her
chamber
,
bearing their precious burthen. There was
no one there but a little black page, belonging to
Thisbe.
Catharina was taken from the litter, and placed
on a bed behind an alcove, which was surrounded
by curtains. All passed in silence. The actress
took a small mirror from her toilet, and going to the
bed uncovered the face of Catharina; then said to
the pageApproach with your light.
[2]
[2]
Victor Hugo is said to be a warm admirer of the writings
of Shakspeare, and that he views him in the same light that
all do who understand his worksas the greatest dramatic
genius the world has produced. This scene will remind the
intelligent reader of Romeo and Juliet, and the incident of
the mirror occurs in King Lear. After the death of
Cordelia
,
the heart-broken father says:
She placed
6*
the mirror before Catharina's lipsI am satisfied.
She closed the curtains of the alcove, and turning
to the guards, addedYou are sure that no one
has seen us in our passage from the palace here?
The night is very dark, replied one of the
guards. The city is deserted at this hour, and
you know that we encountered no one, madam. You
saw us deposit the coffin in the grave, and cover it
with the slab. Fear nothing. We know not whether
this woman is dead; but this is certain, to the whole
world she is sealed up in the tomb. You may do as
you please in the matter.
It is well. She turned to the page. Where
are the male habits that I ordered you to have
ready?
They are there, madam, he replied, pointing to
a bundle in a dark corner of the room.
And the two horses I told you to order. Are
they in the court?
Saddled and bridled.
Good horses?
I will answer for them, replied the page.
She turned to the night guard. Tell me, how
long will it require, with good horses, to get beyond
the state of Venice?
'Tis as it happens. The most speedy route is
to go straight to Montibacco, which belongs to the
Pope. That may be done in three hours, with good
roads.
That will do. Now go. Silence as to all that
has passed here, and return to-morrow morning for
the promised reward. The men withdrew, and
Thisbe continued, addressing the pageGo thou
and close the door of the house. Under no pretext
whatever allow any one to enter.
Lend me a looking glass.
If that her breath will moist or stain the stone,
Why then she lives
Signor Rodolpho has his private entrance,
madam
.
Must that be closed also?
Noleave that open. If he comes, let him enter;
but he alone;no otherespecially if Rodolpho
comes. For yourself, do not approach this chamber
unless I call you. For the present leave me.
The page retired, and Thisbe was alone with the
body. For three nights she had not slept, during
which time her mind had been in one constant state
of excitement, little short of frenzy. But the
tempest
of her feelings had now subsided, her action
was subdued and calm, and she moved the spectacle
of despair. Life had lost its charm; still there was
one object to be fulfilled, the completion of which
bound her to this world. All other thoughts had
been banished, that remained alone, and she clung
to it as to the last frail tie upon life. She continued,
talking to herself:
There is not much longer time to wait. She did
not wish to die. I understand thatshe knew she
was beloved! But otherwise, death is preferable to
life! She turned to the bed. O! you will die
with joy! My brain's on fire! For three nights I
have not slept! No matterthe eternal night is
near, and I shall sleep!
Her eyes rested upon her theatrical robes and
trinkets for a moment, and she rapidly contrasted
her present feelings with those they at one period
were calculated to inspire. The contrast was
appalling
;
they now filled her mind with loathing, and
she was astounded as she recalled the magic
influence
they once possessed over her. In our moments
of sadness and sorrow, how trivial appear the sources
of departed joys!
O, yes, we are happyvery happy! They
applaud
us on the stage, follow us, admire us, flatter
us, and cover us with garlands of flowers, but the
heart bleeds beneath! You played Rosamond
admirably
,
madam! The imbeciles! And this is the
extent of our happiness. O! Rodolpho! to believe
in thy love is an idea necessary to my life! While
I indulged in that delusion, I have often thought that
if I were to die, it would be near him; and to die
in that manner would render it impossible ever after
to tear my memory from his soul; my shade would
remain always by his side, between him and all other
women. Even in death he would be mine. I would
not have him forget me. Alas! whither am I going!
Where am I falling! See what the world has done
for me! See what love has done for me!
She approached the bed, drew open the curtains,
and gazed steadfastly on the pale countenance of
Catharina
for a few moments, then took up the brass
cross that was lying on her bosom, looked at it and
burst into tears.
O! if this crucifix has brought good to any one
in this world, it is not to your child, my mother!
She placed the crucifix on the table. A door
concealed
in the hangings opened, and Rodolpho
entered
the apartmentshe continued,
It is you, Rodolpho! So much the better. I
would speak to you. Hear me.
And I would also speak to you, madam, and it
is you who must hear me, he replied, in a tone of
voice that froze her blood, while his eyes and cheeks
were flushed with passion.
Rodolpho!
Are you alone, madam?
Alone.
Give orders that no one shall enter here.
I have already done so.
Permit me to close these doors. He went to
the several doors of the apartment and carefully
fastened them with the bolts, then returned to Thisbe,
and stood silent for a time, mingled feelings of rage
and grief impeding his utterance.
I await what you have to say to me, she
calmly
remarked, though she plainly read what was
passing
in his mind. At length he commenced in a
stern husky voice, which strangely contrasted with
the gentle tone that was wont to proceed from his
lips, when addressing her:
Whence come you? Wherefore art thou pale!
What have you done this day, speak? Where have
you passed the execrable hours of this day, speak?
No, I will tell you. Do not answerdo not deny,
do not equivocate. I know allall that you would
say to me. Daphne was there, but two steps from
you; separated only by a door, in the oratory; she
witnessed all; overheard all. Your fearful
conference
.
The Podesta said I have no poison, you
answered, I have, I have! Ah! you had poison;
well, I have a dagger! saying which he drew a
poniard from his bosom.
Rodolpho!
He continued sternlyYou have one quarter of
an hour to prepare yourself for death.
Ah! you will kill me! Is that then the first idea
that brought you here? You would kill me;
yourself
also, without delay, without being certain.
Can you form so fearful a resolution so easily? Is
the tie between us so lightly broken? You would
kill me for the love of another! O! Rodolpho, is it
then truelet me hear it from your own lips; you
then have never loved me?
Never!
Well, that word kills me! Unhappy wretch! I
care not how soon thy poniard completes the work.
Love for thee! Never the slightest! Thank God
I can boast of that!Pity, nothing more.
Ingrate! one word more; tell me; she, you then
loved her much?
Did I love her! a being so pure, chaste and
saint-like! an altar where the holiest thoughts
reposed
!
Did I love her! she was my life, my pride,
my consolation! I had no thought but she was
mingled
with it; no wish but for her welfare, no joy on
earth but in beholding her! she was all to me! Even
thus I loved her!
Then I have done well.
You have done well?
Yes, I repeat, I have done well. But are you
certain what it is I have done?
Am I certain! must I tell you a second time
that Daphne was there; that she saw and heard all!
has told me all; and her fearful story still pierces
my brain. You and the Podesta were alone with
your victim. For two hours you kept her there in
mortal agony, weeping, praying, supplicating
mercy
,
demanding life; you prayed for life, my
Catharina
!
on your knees, your hands clenched in despair,
and dragging yourself at their feet, you prayed for
life, and they mercilessly denied you even that! O!
God! and the poison! it was you who went for it!
it was you who forced her to drink it! and when the
poor victim was dead, it was you who carried the
body away! supervising to the last! Monster, where
have you placed it? This you have done, and yet
ask if I am certain!
He drew a handkerchief from his bosom. This
handkerchief which I found in Catharina's chamber,
to whom does it belong? To you! That crucifix!
pointing at it lying on the table, which I find in your
possession, to whom does it belong? To her! and
yet you ask if I am certain! Come, pray, weep, and
in your turn, ask for mercy; do quickly what you
have to do, and let us make an end!
Rodolpho!
What have you to say to justify yourself? speak
quickly.
Nothing. All that you have said is true.
Believe
all. You have come in time, for I wish to die,
near you, at your feet. To die by your hands, is
more than I ever dared to hope! To die by your
hands! O! I shall fall perhaps in your arms, and
shall then be sure that you will hear my last words;
my last sigh will not escape you. I have no longer
a wish to live. You do not love me, kill me, it is
the only service you can render me now.
Come, make an end of this.
Hear me for an instant, she continued: I
have been destined to a life of sorrow. These are
not mere words, but a swelling heart that overflows.
The world has little compassion for such as me, and
yet we are often possessed of both virtue and
courage
.
Why should I cling to life! a beggar in my
infancy, and from the age of sixteen destitute of
bread. The street my home, I have fallen from one
slough to anothermy only choice famine or shame.
I know well what you would say:Die of famine,
but I have endured much. But all your pity is for
the great and noble. If they weep you console
them. If they do wrong, you excuse them; but for
us, all is too good for us. You overwhelm us;
wonder
why we complainall are against us, we were
born to suffer. Rodolpho, in my situation, do you
know that I have sought for a heart to understand
mine? If there had been no one, whom I supposed
loved me, what would have become of me! I do
not say that to move youto what purpose! There
is nothing left me on earth. But I love you. O!
how fervently, devotedly, Rodolpho, you will not
know until I am dead! you do not hear me. Do I
fatigue you with what I say? Ah! I am truly
wretched
;
no one on earth has any pity for me!
Rodolpho was too much engrossed with his own
feelings to hear her. He could not disengage his
mind from the account Daphne had given him of the
fate of Catharina; and he continued in a terrific
tone:
Am I certain!The Podesta went in search of
four sbires, and during that time you persuaded her
to take the poison. My senses are wandering!
Where is she?Speak, is it then true that you have
killed herthat you have poisoned her?Where is
she?Speak, where is she?The only woman I
ever loved! the only one! hear me! the only one!
The only one!It is cruel to use so many blows.
For pity's sake, strike the last with this, said
Thisbe, pointing to the dagger in his hand.
Answer me, where is Catharina?I repeatthe
only one I ever loved!
You have no mercy!You break my heart!
Her manner suddenly changed, her saddened
countenance
became animated, and she exclaimed, with
her usual energy, and with an air of triumph.
Well, then, I hate that woman. Do you hear; I
hate her!Yes, you have heard the truth,I am
avenged! I poisoned her, killed her, and did not
lose sight of her until I placed her in the grave, and
closed the tomb.
Ah! you confess it then!Are you aware of
what you say?By Heaven, I believe you boast of
it, wretch!
Yes, and what I have done I would do again.
Strike!I am avenged?
Monster!
I killed her, I tell you! O! had you witnessed
her last agonies! Strike!I hated, but even in
death I triumph!
Die, wretch!He stabbed her in the bosom,
and she fell at his feet.
Ah! to the heart! sighed the poor girl. You
have smote me to the heart. It is well. Thanks,
my Rodolpho! She seized his hand, which was
hanging powerless beside him, and kissed it.
Thanks, you have freed me. Let me have your
handI would do you no ill. My Rodolpho, best
beloved, you could not see yourself when you
entered
,but
the manner in which you exclaimedYou
have one quarter of an hourraising that dagger!
I had no longer any wish to live. Thank God, I
am about to die. Speak one word of pity!You
have done well. I forgive you.
Thisbe!
One word of pity. Look kindly on me. Will
you? He made no reply, but was horror-struck at
the sight of the blood streaming from the bosom that
still fondly loved him.
Where am I? Rodolpho! exclaimed
Catharina
,
behind the curtains of the alcove. The sound
awakened him from his stupor, and he turned with
amazement towards the place whence the voice
proceeded
.
What is that I hear?whose voice is that?
Catharina, who had outslept the effects of the
narcotic
,
raised herself in the bed, threw open the
curtains
,
and came forward. On perceiving him, she
uttered his name; he hastened to her, and took her
in his arms.
Catharina! Great God! You are here! Alive!
How is this?Just Heaven! He turned to Thisbe,
who was writhing on the floor. Ah! what have I
done!
Nothing! sighed the dying girl, dragging herself
to him. You have done nothing. It is I who have
done all. I wished to die. I thrust your hand.
Catharina! you are alive!Great God! by whom
have you been saved?
By me, for thee! sighed Thisbe.
Heavens!
For theeall, for thee!
Thisbe!Help!Wretch that I am.
Noall aid is useless, continued Thisbe, in a
feeble tone. I know that well. Give yourselves
up to joy as if I were not here. I would not restrain
you. I deceived the Podesta, and gave a narcotic
in the place of poison. There are horses ready
the dress of a man for herdepart quickly. In
three hours you will pass the boundary of the state
of Venice. Be happy. She is absolved from her
vows. Dead to the Podesta, she lives for you.
Rodolpho kneeled down beside Thisbe, took her
palsied hand, and gazed on her in speechless agony.
She continued, in a faint voice, which was
occasionally
interrupted from exhaustion
I am dying. You will think of me sometimes,
will you not?And you will say, Well, after all,
she was a good girl, that poor Thisbe. O! that
will make me start up in the grave! Reach me my
poor mother's crucifix. Catharina took it from the
table and handed it to her. You saved my mother
I 've repaid the debt. Farewell. Permit me,
madam, to call him once again my Rodolpho.
Farewell
,
my Rodolpho. Depart quickly from thisI
die. Live.Be happy.I bless you!
She raised the crucifix before her flickering eyes
VOL. I.7
gazed on it for a few moments, then pressed it to
her lips, and faintly sighedMother, I come.
She sank upon the floor and expired.
But little remains to be told. The lovers escaped
to Rome, were united, lived long and happily;the
only cloud that darkened their pathway arose from
the recollection of the devotion and magnanimity of
poor Thisbe, and the ill requital she had received.
Angelo, whose life was one scene of fear and
trembling
,
before one year had elapsed, for something
or for nothing, found himself in the presence of
the dreaded Council of Ten. He was confined in
the
piombi
, of which he had dreamt so often; but he
soon discovered that the reality was worse than his
dream. From the
piombi
he was conducted at the
dead of night to the canal Orfanoanother of the
spectres that had haunted him through life. There
was but one plunge and his dream was over. He
slept, but did not dream.
THE
CAMPAIGNER'S TALE.
I knew his worth; he had a valiant heart.
How did he die?
As ill became a soldier.
Old Play
.
Man
at his birth is unquestionably a free agent,
and is at liberty to exercise to the fullest extent his
natural privileges by becoming a savage; but if he
avail himself of the advantages conferred by social
life, it is incumbent on him to conform with the
regulations
by which that society is kept together.
We must all make some sacrifice for the public
good; or, in other words, make a deposit in the
public
stock, for which we receive an incalculable
interest
.
True, there are many who do not view the
sacrifice in this light, but consider the existing
organization
of society as having introduced more and
heavier afflictions than it has removed. I had a
friend who entertained this opinion, and acted upon
the principle of free agency until the close of life.
I served in the west of Pennsylvania during the
Indian wars of Braddock's times. A soldier's life,
when in actual service, is full of cares and dangers;
but he has moments of enjoyment, unknown to those
whose current flows smoothly on, and encounters
no obstruction. Attached to my mess was a little
Frenchman who had seen much of the world, and
became a man of the world from what he had seen.
He was about fifty years old, possessing all the
animation
peculiar to his countrymen, and all the
philosophy
,
or, in other words, the phlegmatic
indifference
which adversity teaches. He was a musician;
sang sweetly, and played well on various
instruments
.
There are some to whom music appears to be their
natural language. If they open their lips their words
are full of melody, and if they but breathe into an
instrument, it discourses most excellent music.
Such was the little Frenchman, and many a time
over the watch-fire have the tedious hours of night
been enlivened by the sweetness of his voice, or his
skill upon his instrument, as he performed some
exquisite
little air of his native land. He was the
favourite
of the garrison, and literally the creature of
circumstance. In one scale of fortune he would
have been a godlike being, but thrown into the other,
weeds grew rank in the soil where the most delicate
flowers would otherwise have blossomed. How many
are similarly constituted, and how many owe a life
of virtue or vice to circumstances beyond their
immediate
control!
Pierre de Luce, for such was the little
Frenchman's
name, was completely an isolated being. He
partook of the joys of others, but mourned over the
sorrows of none, for he had learned from his rugged
path through life, that he who has a tear for the
griefs of all, will have little to do in this world beside
weeping. He was himself invulnerable to sorrow.
The sharpest arrow in the quiver could not wound
him, for he was ignorant of those domestic ties which,
when broken, leave the heart desolate, but as long
as they exist, fortify the mind against a sea of
troubles. He had never experienced a parent's
care, the sacred love of a wife, nor the affection of a
child. He had struggled alone through the world
from infancy; had gone from clime to clime, and in
the rough encounter, the better feelings of his heart
were crushed. Self became the sole motive of
action
;
and as virtue and vice too frequently depend
upon the optics by which they are viewed, he had
prescribed to himself a straight course, without
caring
by what appellation his conduct might be defined.
Self was his polar star.
Though the better feelings of his heart had been
chilled by the atmosphere of the world, when
budding
,
they were not totally destroyed, and those
affections
which might have made the hearts of others
glad were now lavished on a favourite dog. This
dog was his constant companion: had travelled with
him for years, and many a time did he divide his
scanty rations, rather than his favourite should suffer
from hunger.
Our little garrison was literally in the midst of a
wilderness, surrounded by a savage enemy, from
whom we were daily liable to attack, from which we
apprehended the most melancholy result. The
soldiers
were worn out with fatigue and privation: we had
not drawn full rations for some time, and the militia,
of which the garrison was partially composed, were
in a complete state of insubordination, which
increased
as the expiration of their term of service
approached.
Many deserted, and Pierre, who called me his
friend, urged me to the same measure. He contended
for the principle of free agency in our conduct both
towards man and God, and that, as soon as we cease
to enjoy this birthright to the fullest extent, we
approach
a state of subjection which no one of God's
creatures has a right to exercise over another. I
listened lo him, but a sense of right and a dread of
the consequences of a departure from my duty,
countervailed
his sophistry. Not so with Pierre; he
thought not of consequences, but acted as if the
whole world were his own, and he were alone in the
world. When the roll was called on the morning
following this conversation, the little Frenchman
and several others were missing.
7*
A detachment was ordered out in pursuit of the
deserters. I was among the number. We soon got
upon their track, and pursued them into the recesses
of the wilderness. They concealed themselves in
caverns in order to elude our search. Following
the course of a winding stream, we came into a wild
dell where we halted to refresh ourselves. The
soldiers
were seated on the ground, taking their hasty
meal, when the low growl of a dog was indistinctly
heard. It awakened our attention. It was repeated,
and we approached the spot whence it proceeded,
which was a cavern formed by huge projecting rocks.
We entered and discovered Pierre and another
deserter
at the extremity. When brought into the
open air the latter appeared an altered being from
what he was. He also belonged to the same mess
with myself: a young man, a good soldier, and full
of animal spirits. He had hitherto viewed life as a
May-day upon the green where the villagers are
assembled
for a festival; but now the storm had
lowered
;
a full sense of his situation flashed across his
mind, and he stood before his companions
crestfallen
,
dejected and silent.
Pierre was not in the least abashed. He stood
erect as usual, and maintained his customary placid
expression of countenance. I stood beside him, and
of the two, might well have been mistaken for the
offender. I loved the man, and my heart bled for
him. He looked at me and then upon his dog, and
said:
I have fed and caressed that creature for years.
He has been my travelling companion throughout
Europe, and on this side of the Atlantic, and if I
were weak enough to permit the conduct of others to
wound my feelings, I should certainly experience a
pang at being thus betrayed by him I considered my
fastest friend. He patted the dog and added: But
it was unconsciously done. He might have read
as much in the eyes of the dog.
We returned to the garrison, and the prisoners
were confined in the guard-house. A court-martial
was held, they were tried and sentenced to be shot.
After the sentence I visited Pierre in his prison, to
condole with him on his approaching fate. He
smiled at my distress and exclaimed:
Why should I be distressed at the prospect of
dying! What is this world to me, or I to the world,
since there is no one to shed a tear for my sufferings.
By death I escape from an order of things marked
for injustice, ignorance and superstition. I was born
where the light of the gospel shed its holy influence,
and where the blessings of your social compact were
acknowledged and enjoyed, and yet I have been an
object of persecution from the cradle to the grave.
I have been stationed here, patiently to endure
unavailing
wretchedness, and pass through existence
without performing one single act that goes to
answer
the question, `for what great end was I created?'
My nature is as frail as the reed upon the margin of
the stream, and yet it is an offence if I bend when
the tempest passes over me. I am filled with
passions
,
not for my gratification, and to throw a ray of
light across the cheerless path I am condemned to
travel, but to increase my torments by abstinence.
What am I to think! How am I to act! I see the
parricide rolling in luxury: blest with a heart of
flint he scoffs at the ties that bind man to man, and
while he spits at the face of heaven, he seems to be
the choicest care of an ever-watchful Providence:
and the lowly pauper who crawls through the world
in meekness and humility, who in the benevolence
of his heart shares his last crust with his faithful
dog, steeped in tears of gratitude for the bounties of
heaven, is suffered to perish by the way-side begging
charity. Such is the equity of your system! I have
visited the couch of sickness, where he who had
coined his gold from the tears and blood of his
fellow
mortals, lay in state, with luxury around him,
while all the restoratives in nature were sought for
to prolong his useless life; and I have been in the
miserable hovel, where he whose life had been one
unvaried scene of abstinence and self mortification,
whose every act had been to exalt his nature, and
leave some glorious monument behind, that he had
not lived in vain: but I have seen him stretched on
his pallet of straw; comfortlesswith burning brain
broken heartfeverishdying! and no other
moisture
on his parched lips than that which his eyes
distilled at being obliged to leave the few he loved
to the cold charity of an unfeeling world. These
are among the benefits conferred on man by his
social
compact; then why should I deplore being about
to escape from such an incomprehensible and
inequitable
order of things?
The morning fixed for the execution of the
deserters
arrived. At day-break we were roused from
our beds of straw by the beat of drum. There
was an unusual stillness observed throughout the
fort; every word was spoken in an under tone, and
scarcely a sound was heard except that which
proceeded
from the band. Even the music seemed to
partake of the prevailing melancholy; for never
before
had the reveille fallen on my ear like notes of
sadness.
The morning was intensely cold. A heavy sleet
had fallen during the night, and every object that
the eye beheld was covered with ice. The trees
glistened brilliantly and bent beneath their weighty
encasement. The piercing wind moaned through
the desolate forest, and I thought to myself that the
melancholy sound was well adapted to the
sorrowful
occasion. As I looked around and beheld all
nature, as it were, in her hour of adversity, I for a
moment questioned whether I was still in that world
so bright, luxuriant, and joyous in spring time. But
when the sun arose in cloudless splendour, and his
rich beams gave colouring to every glittering object,
well might I have questioned the identity of the orb
I trod upon. The scene indeed was brilliant
beyond
description, and all around was fairy land.
On my way from my quarters to the parade ground,
I had to pass the small log cabin in which the
prisoners
were confined. A sentinel was stationed at the
door. There was a crevice between the logs, which
had been rudely piled in building the hut. I could
see its inmates from where I stood. I drew nigh
and asked permission of the sentinel to speak to
Pierre.
Impossible, he replied.
But one word.
Not a syllable.
He dies in less than an hour.
True.
And lone as he is in the world, there may be
something that he would have a friend do for him
after his death.
Perhaps so; approach and speak to him for a
moment
,
but no longer.
I drew nigh the crevice. Pierre was seated in a
corner of the hut fondling with his dog, with as little
concern as if he had a life of joy before him, instead
of a death of terror. I called to him, he raised his
head, and on recognising me, came to the spot where
I stood.
Is there any thing, I asked, that I can do for
you before you die? Any wish you would have
fulfilled
afterwards?
Nothing, he replied; I have always confined
my wishes in this world, within my own powers of
performance; and beyond it, man can do little that
will afford me either pleasure or pain.
Is there no one to whom you would have your
dying blessing conveyed?
Ay: to all mankind, if it will avail them any
thing, but if not, convert it all to your own especial
use.
He smiled and stretched forth his hand; I grasped
it and he returned the pressure. The sentinel
called
to me that the line was forming; I again pressed
the prisoner's hand, and was hurrying away when
he called me back.
Stay, said he, I had forgot, I have one
request
to makeWill you fulfil it?
Unquestionably!
On the honour of a soldier.
And the sincerity of an honest man; be it what
it may, I pledge myself to perform it.
It is not much, said Pierre, no more than this:
should it fall to your lot to be one of my executioners,
remember I have a heart. He perceived that I did
not comprehend his meaning, and continued: Let
your musket ball find the way to it, for though I am
a soldier, I would avoid unnecessary pain in dying.
Having arrived at the place of parade, the line
was formed and a guard of six chosen to do the work
of death. It fell to my lot to be one of the number.
When my name was called, my heart leaped as it
were to my throat; respiration was suspended and I
nearly fell to the ground. Pierre was my friend.
God only knows what I endured at that moment!
My feelings were not to be envied even by him
whose life I had been called upon to destroy: but I
knew that the painful duty must be performed, though
it snapped my heart-strings in the execution.
We were stationed in front of the line; the band
commenced the dead march, and on turning my
eyes towards the hut in which the deserters were
confined, I beheld them approaching under a guard.
The step of the little Frenchman was firm and steady,
and he kept time with the solemn beat of the drum.
He appeared as cheerful as if he had been going to
parade, and never looked more like a soldier than on
that occasion.
Not so his companion. All his senses appeared
to be alive to the terror of his situation. As they
marched in front of the garrison, a dead silence was
observed; the soldiers were as fixed as statues, and
deep sorrow was depicted in every countenance.
The solemn beat of the drum, and the mournful note
of the piercing fife, were re-echoed by the most
distant
hills. Various and indescribable feelings
rushed
in rapid succession on me. As I gazed on the
extended and unpeopled waste around, and heard
the only sound that proceeded from the garrison
lazily booming over the ice-clad plain, I felt to the
fullest extent the fact that we were in the midst of
the wilderness. I gazed on my sorrow-stricken
comrades until I almost fancied we were beings of
another region, and when my eyes fell upon those
destined to die, the execution seemed to me even
more terrible than deliberate and cold-blooded
murder
.
The responsibility was appalling. It was the
act of a few isolated beings, and not the act of the
world. It was the slaying of a sharer in our
dangers
;
one who was bound to us by every social tie;
nay, by the indissoluble link of privation and misery.
It struck me as being more horrible than fratricide.
The prisoners moved on in front of the line
towards
the spot appointed for the execution. It was
beneath an old oak in the eastern corner of the
garrison
.
Every eye was turned towards them; and
sadness dimmed every eye. When they came to the
spot where the guard of six was stationed, they paused
for a moment; Pierre gave me a look full of
meaning
and smiled. It was not in pride or affectation,
nor yet in scorn of mankind, but it was a smile of
general benevolence; one in which the brightness of
his soul shone forth, like the beams of the sun when
setting. Not so his companion. Terror and
distress
were depicted in his countenance. He looked
at us as if supplicating our mercy, and the look was
mingled with the thought that we were to execute
and not to weigh the deed our hands were about to
perpetrate. It was agony to behold him, and
terrible
as was the thought that I was about to shed the
blood of my friend, it was not half so painful as the
idea of violently taking the life of one who
manifested
such terror at dying. Pierre marked the
agitation
of his companion; he seemed to read my
feelings
too, and as they moved on he pronounced the
word, remember; his dog followed at his side, and
even to that hour he was not unmindful of the
affection
of his dog.
They approached the old oak, beneath which the
graves were dug and two rough coffins placed. We
marched behind the prisoners to the solemn beat of
the drum, and I could not shake from my mind the
recollection that we had often marched side by side
to more spirit-stirring music.
We arrived at the spot and a brief prayer was
offered, when Pierre's companion was led to the
grave and desired to kneel upon the coffin. His
animal functions had forsaken him; he shook like
an aspen leaf, and wept like a child. There are
some men who remain children in their feelings to
the close of life; whose minds have not grown in
proportion with the body, and whose nervous
systems
are controlled by the feebleness of the mind.
He knelt, and the cap was drawn over his eyes.
The music ceased, the sergeant gave the word of
command, and the poor wretch sobbed audibly.
Pierre stood hard by with his arms folded, a mute
spectator of the painful scene. Not a sound
proceeded
from the soldiers, arrayed to witness the fatal
consequence of insubordination. We passed through
the preparatory evolutions, the word
fire!
was
given, and the deserter fell dead across the coffin,
perforated by three wounds, each of which would
have been mortal. Pierre looked upon the corpse, but
betrayed no emotion. He stepped forward and stood
beside the grave destined to receive his own mortal
remains. The sergeant would have had him kneel:
No, he replied, I have always met my enemies
face to face, when they assumed the most
threatening
attitude, and can I do less to my friends? The
officer again urged him: No, if I must die you
shall shoot me down and let me die as a soldier, and
not as a criminal. He stood erect with his face
towards us, and his faithful dog at his feet. I never
beheld him more calm and indifferent than he
appeared
to be at that moment. He caught my eye,
and placed his right hand upon his heart. I
understood
the motion. My brain was on fire. Thought
succeeded thought in rapid succession, but nothing
was distinct, for they passed off without leaving an
impression, even more rapidly than a flash of
lightning
.
All was confusion. I felt not what was
passing
.
I saw nothing but the figure standing before
me, and was so completely bewildered that I was
unconscious of his being my friend. The word was
given. Every muscle was braced with
determination
.
I raised the musket deliberately to my
shoulder
;
the only thought, the only wish that entered
my mind at that moment, was to hit the mark. It
seemed like an age between the words,
take aim
,
and
fire
. At length it was given. I heard the
report of the muskets, saw Pierre fall, but nothing
more. Darkness came over me; I sank to the earth,
and when I awoke I found myself on the straw in
my tent and one of the mess bathing my temples.
I inquired for Pierre.
He is in his grave, said the soldier.
Did he die in agony?
No: on the spot. There was a ball right through
his heart.
I felt as if a ball had struck my own, and laughed
wildly. The man thought me mad, and I was so.
I knew who had inflicted the wound; the thought
was hell to me, and I cursed the hand that had
inflicted it. The curse fell on me, and to this day
I feel as if I were unabsolved. The deed was done
in mercy, in compliance with his dying wish, but
even that reflection cannot assuage the poignancy
of my feelings. I did my duty as a soldier, but
destroyed
myself as a man. A thousand times I have
wished myself in the grave.
I was seized with a raging fever, succeeded by
delirium, which confined me to my tent in a
hopeless
condition. During my illness Pierre's dog was
a faithful attendant at my side. I felt reproached
by his presence, though his looks were those of sorrow
and affection. At night he slept on the grave of his
master, and by day-light he would crawl to my tent.
I never beheld a poor animal so stricken. When
his master was buried, I was told that the whining
of the dog touched the heart of the roughest soldier.
He did not mourn long. I had been confined about
two weeks when the faithful creature neglected to
VOL. I.8
pay his accustomed visit, and on inquiring for him,
he had not been seen.
I was at this time convalescent, and on leaving
my tent I considered it my first duty to visit the
grave of my friend. I did so, and on it lay the dead
body of the dog. I dropped a tear on discovering
the stiff and frozen carcass of the affectionate
animal
.
How few are mourned so sincerely by those
whom God has endued with reason, and who
acknowledge
the force of natural and factitious ties! A
plain man would say, he died of a broken heart,
but metaphysicians may give the cause of his death
some more learned appllation: what, I know not,
but assuredly one that would not be as generally
understood, and, perhaps, not as near the truth as
that which I have assigned. I had the dog buried
at the feet of his master. The garrison was broken
up shortly afterwards, and the worn out soldiers
returned to the haunts of man. Many had fallen
victims to the hardships they endured, but none
were so long and generally deplored as poor Pierre
de Luce. How wonderfully and inexplicably is the
mind of man organized! My friend died cheerfully,
the victim of a departure from the line of duty, and
I live in wretchedness for having fulfilled what my
duty enjoined. His was a life free from anxiety,
though he acknowledged no earthly power paramount
to his will; whereas mine has been a pilgrimage of
daily solicitude, notwithstanding I have fulfilled, to
the utmost of my strength, every obligation enjoined
by my country and my God.
THE
LAST OF HIS TRIBE.
The
forests of North America are now
unceasingly
groaning under the axe of the backwoodsman;
and it is no uncommon spectacle to behold a village
smiling on the spot which a few months before was
an almost impracticable forest, or the haunt alone of
the wild beast and the savage.
Great changes! I exclaimed, as I alighted at
the door of a log building, in front of which hung a
rude sign to arrest the steps of the traveller. A
few years ago, there was scarcely the trace of a
white man to be seen, where I now behold a
flourishing
town and a numerous colony of inhabitants
a large tract of forest land enclosed, and corn
shooting
up amid the dying trunks of its aboriginal trees.
Our village thrives, was the laconic remark of
a tall slender personage, who was lounging against
the sign post of the village inn, around which half
a dozen idlers were assembled.
True; civilization has made rapid strides, but
the red men, I perceive, have not yet disappeared
from among you. (Four or five Indians were lying
stretched upon a bank at a short distance from the
inn door, basking in the rays of the setting sun.)
Not yet, was the reply. They come into the
village to sell their peltries; but at present they are
not very well satisfied with the intercourse we have
had together.
How so; do you take advantage of their
ignorance
of the value of their merchandise?
Possibly we do; but that is not their chief cause
of dissatisfaction. They still prefer their council
grove and summary punishment, to our court-house
and prison.
Court-house and prison! Cannot so small a
community as this be kept together without the aid
of such establishments?
I know not; but few communities, however small,
are willing to try the experiment. As yet our prison
has had but one tenant, and to his fate may be
attributed
the surly deportment of yonder savages. They
belong to the same tribe.
I expressed a curiosity to hear the particulars of
his story. My communicative friend led the way
into the tavern, where, as soon as we were seated,
he commenced his account in nearly the following
words:
Tangoras was the chief of a neighbouring tribe
of Indians. He is now advanced in years, but still
retains much of the vigour of youth. Brave, expert
in the chase, patient of fatigue, and beloved by his
people; his voice is a law, for he is looked upon as
the sole remaining example of what the tribe was
before the whites appeared among them.
He seems to have beheld the progress of
civilization
with the same feelings as the shipwrecked
mariner watches the approach of the wave that is to
wash him from the rock on which he has attained a
foothold. The land of his fathers had been wrested
from him. He defended it bravely until resistance
was found to be fruitless; and when he became
subject
to the laws of the pale faces, he viewed their
proceedings as tyrannical, and himself as little
better
than a slave.
They told him that his condition would be
ameliorated
,
but they would not suffer him to be happy
in his own way; and, unluckily for the old chief, no
one can define happiness in such a manner as will
accord with the conception of another. All imagine
they comprehend its meaning, and all differ. From
the cradle to the grave we are struggling to grasp
it; but, like the delusive vessel formed of mists, it
vanishes when considered nearest, and leaves us
hopeless and alone in the midst of a turbulent sea.
When he complained of the injustice done him,
they urged that the earth was given to man to
cultivate
,
and that he who refuses to fulfil the condition,
loses his title to it. In vain did the old Indian argue
from the same authority, that the fowls of the air
and the beasts of the field were also given to man's
use, and that he therefore preserved his hunting
grounds inviolate; that he cultivated as much as his
wants required; and that he who does more, brings
a curse rather than a blessing upon his fellows, by
introducing among them luxury and its attendant
evils.
They also told him that the Christian religion
confers upon its professors, who are the immediate
heirs of heaven, a right to the soil paramount to any
human claim. The old chief, as he bowed to this
decision
,
calmly replied, `While you who profess
superior
knowledge are taught to pursue a line of action
as perfect as can come within the comprehension
of human intellect, wherever the cross has appeared,
instead of awakening the best feelings of your
nature
,
the demon of destruction seems to have been
roused within you, and death and desolation have
followed. Though you tell me it is the emblem of
peace to all mankind, to us, at least, it has been the
signal of war, of exterminating and merciless war.'
But to proceed with my story:
Tangoras seldom entered the villages of the
whites, and refused to make use of our
manufactures
.
He dressed himself in skins instead of the
blankets, which his people had adopted; for he said,
he would live as his fathers had lived, and die as
they had died. About a year ago, at the head of
a dozen of his tribe, he descended yonder hill by the
narrow path which winds over it. His followers
were laden with peltries; but the old chief marched
8*
erect, with his tomax only in his hand, and his
hunting-knife
stuck in his girdle, for he scorned to be a
pack-horse for the pale faces.
As he entered the village, his countenance was
stamped with more than usual austerity. I spoke
to him, but he made no reply. He refused to enter
our cabins, and turned away from food when it was
proffered him. He stretched himself beneath the
shade of the cypress tree at the big spring, while
his followers proceeded to dispose of their
merchandise
.
It so happened that four or five Indians
belonging
to a tribe inhabiting a tract of country
somewhat
lower down the river, were in the village at
the same time. They had made their sales and
purchases
,
and were about to depart as Tangoras and
his people appeared. They soon mingled together,
and a low guttural conversation ensued. From the
violence of their gesticulations, we concluded that
the subject was of deep interest. A tall handsome
savage of about five-and-twenty years of age, active
and athletic, kept aloof from the crowd, and
appeared
to be the subject of conversation, from the
ferocious
glances cast at him by the tribe of Tangoras.
He was evidently uneasy; and as he slowly receded,
as if intending to leave the village, he kept his dark
eye lowering suspiciously upon the crowd. He had
already passed the furthermost house, and drew
nigh to the spot where Tangoras lay, too much
wrapped in his own reflections to attend to what
was going forward.
The sound of footsteps awakened his attention:
he slowly turned his Herculean frame, and,
appearing
to recognise the young savage, sprung in an
instant
upon his feet. A fierce yell succeeded, which
the distant hills re-echoed, and the next instant we
beheld the stranger flying, like the affrighted deer
from the famished wolf, towards the mountains.
Tangoras followed close behind. They crossed the
plain with the rapidity of an arrow from a bow, and
at intervals the fiend-like yell of the old chief startled
the eagle as he enjoyed his circling flight in the
upper air.
While crossing the plain, the youthful activity
of the fugitive Indian enabled him to exceed the
speed of his pursuer; but, in ascending the opposite
ridge, it was evident that he was losing ground
sensibly
.
A shout of triumph, which the evening breeze
carried from mountain to mountain, proclaimed that
Tangoras was aware of his advantage. The rest of
the savages watched the chase with intense interest,
and preserved a dead silence. They scarcely
breathed
as they leaned forward with their eyes fixed upon
the parties ascending the rugged and winding path.
The young Indian now stood upon a bare rock on
the brow of the ridge. He paused for a moment to
breathe. The motion of his body did not escape us
as he drew a deep inspiration. He cast a look
downwards
upon his pursuer, who followed close after
him. It was but a momentary glance, and the young
man disappeared on the opposite side of the
mountain
.
Tangoras sprang upon the rock, sent forth a
yell, and the next moment was out of sight also.
He did not pause to breathe, nor did he slacken his
pace as he ascended the ridge; he could have kept
on from the rising to the setting of the sun without
fatigue or without abating his speed, for he united
with the strength of the rugged bear the activity of
the deer; nor did he fear to wrestle with the one
without a weapon, or to hunt down the other
without
a dog to keep him on the trail.
They were no sooner out of sight, than the
savages in the village started in pursuit of them.
As they sprang over the plain, they yelled and
leaped
like a herd of famished wolves on the scent of
their prey. It was indeed a wild sight to behold
them rushing along the narrow path over the
mountain
.
The fugitive pursued his course down the
western
declivity with increased swiftness. It was the
race of a maniac. He leaped from rock to rock at
the hazard of his life, and had gained considerably
upon Tangoras, who followed with his eye fixed upon
his victim, and without slackening his speed. At
intervals he sent forth the piercing war whoop, and
the fearful sound increased the speed of the fugitive.
At the base of the mountain was a river deep
and rapid. The fugitive came rushing down with
the ungoverned velocity of a thing inanimate. He
reached the green bank of the river, and, without
pausing, sprang into its waves. The current bore
him rapidly along, and the cool water refreshed his
burning body. He had not swam far before
Tangoras
stood upon the bank, and immediately with a
heavy plunge dashed into the river: he beat aside
the waves with his sinewy arms; his head was
elevated
,
and his broad chest parted the water, even
as the prow of a vessel. He glided upon the
surface
as though he had been a creature of the element,
and the small waves leaped about his brawny neck
in playful wantonness. By this time the rest of the
savages appeared on the brow of the mountain, and
they rushed down the rugged path like fiends at
their sport, leaping from crag to crag, as reckless
of danger as though they had been immortal. As
they threw their reeking bodies into the water, the
fugitive was about ascending the bank on the
opposite
side. Tangoras was close behind him, for he
had gained considerably upon him in the passage of
the river. The race was now resumed. The
fugitive
darted off with renewed vigour, and the old
chief followed at a steady pace across the verdant
plain through which the river pursues its way.
The Indian once more outstripped his pursuer;
but as they entered upon the high lands, his speed
diminished. The old chief perceived it, and as he
kept on his even course, sent forth the war whoop
as if in derision. The race continued over ridges
and plains, and through streams, until they arrived
at the foot of the next spur of the mountain. As
they entered upon the steep ascent, the pursued
strained every nerve to keep up his speed, while
Tangoras followed with as much ease in his motions,
as if it had been but a race of amusement.
The fugitive now deviated from the narrow path,
and entered upon the most dangerous and rugged
ground, in hopes that his pursuer through fatigue
would desist from the chase; but the hope was vain,
for he still followed with the same fixedness of
purpose
as at the outset. They soon found themselves
in the depth of the wilderness. Higher and higher
they clambered up in silence, assisting their ascent
by clinging to stunted shrubs and the jutting pieces
of rock. The other savages followed at a distance,
yelling like fiends, and were guided by the echoes
occasioned by the fragments of rocks, which,
yielding
to the tread, rolled down the side of the
mountain
.
The young Indian had been hunted to
desperation
,
when an ascent almost inaccessible presented
itself. He braced every nerve, and leaping up, seized
hold of the branch of a tree that grew from the
declivity
.
Fortunately it sustained his weight, and
he drew himself beyond the obstruction. He sprang
from the tree to a jutting rock, which yielded
beneath
the pressure, and as he felt it moving, he threw
himself forward flat upon the earth as the only means
of preservation. The stone rolled from under him
down the mountain, and a fearful yell was mingled
with the crashing that it made in its passage. He
turned and beheld Tangoras prostrate on the ground.
A second look disclosed that he was bleeding. A
laugh of joy and derision burst from the lips of the
fugitive, who was still stretched upon the earth, but
his triumph was of short duration. Tangoras soon
sprang upon his feet again; his rage augmented by
the smarting of his wounds, and leaping up with the
elasticity of the panther, he readily achieved the
ascent which had nearly exhausted the remaining
strength of his victim, who slowly arose and again
exerted himself to escape his determined pursuer.
They had now almost reached the summit of the
mountain. Tangoras pressed closely upon the young
Indian, who with difficulty dragged along his
wounded
and exhausted frame. At length he attained the
highest point, and as he cast a look down the western
declivity he started back, for it was too precipitous
for mortal to descend and live. His deadly foe
was within a few paces, and a savage smile of triumph
was on his countenance. The fugitive was
unarmed
,
and hope forsook him when he beheld the
other draw his hunting-knife as he leisurely
ascended
,
confident that his victim could not now escape.
The young man stood erect, and facing his foe, tore
off the slight covering from his broad bosom, which
heaved as he drew his shortened breath. They
were now face to face on the same rocka pause
ensuedtheir eyes glared upon each other
Tangoras
raised his arm. Strike! cried the fugitive, and
the next moment was heard the sound of his colossal
body as it fell from rock to rock down the deep chasm,
startling the birds of prey from their eyries. Tangoras
stood alone on the rock, and the rays of the setting
sun shone full upon him. The affrighted birds were
screaming and flying in a circle over the spot where
the body had fallen. When the rest of the savages
had ascended the mountain, the old chief was still
standing on the same spot, with the bloody knife in
his hand, his mind absorbed by his feelings. They
asked for the fugitive; he made no reply, but held
up the blood-stained weapon, smiled, and pointed
down the abyss. The friends of the deceased
silently
withdrew to search for the body, while
Tangoras
and his people returned to their village.
And what cause had he for the perpetration of
so merciless a deed?
The young Indian had a short time-before
assassinated
his only son; and as his tribe refused to
deliver
up the murderer to punishment, the father, in
conformity to their custom, took justice into his own
hands, not dreaming that the whites would pronounce
that a capital offence, which both the laws of the red
men and their religious creed imperatively called
upon him to perform. He was, however,
apprehended
,
tried and convicted of murder. He did not speak
during his trial, but looked in scorn upon our grave
deliberations; and sat in the prisoner's bar with the
dignity of a hero rather than the compunctuous
bearing of a criminal. He heard the sentence of
death pronounced upon him without moving a
muscle
;
and as he was led forth from the court-house to
the prison, he moved on with a firm step and haughty
demeanour, which showed that though he had been
condemned by others, he was not self-condemned.
The miserable remnant of his tribe had assembled
to await the issue of his trial. They fell back as he
appeared, and he moved through them in silence,
without bestowing even a look upon them, and they
followed him to prison, gazing at him in stupid
wonder.
Did they witness his incarceration without an
attempt to set him free?
Certainly; what else could you expect from those
who have taken no more than the first step towards
civilization? There is no condition in life so abject
as theirs. They view the laws of society as being
at constant variance with natural privilege; and
while they dread and groan beneath the former,
they have not the hardihood to assert the latter.
They look upon the restrictions as intended for their
abasement, and not to elevate them to an equality;
and while you strive to teach them the superiority
of their nature, you only convince them that they
were born free, and that the social compact has
made them slaves.
And what was the fate of old Tangoras?
That will be decided to-morrow. Look out of
the window towards the prison, and you may see
the gallows tree prepared for his execution.
I did so, and beheld that the limb of a stout oak
tree near the prison had been trimmed for the
purpose
:
a ladder was reared against it, and three
Indians
were lounging beneath it. At this moment
two Indian women passed the window; their
countenances
denoted deep affliction, and their heads
were bent downwards.
Those women, continued my informant, are
the wives of Tangoras. They have been
remarkably
attentive to him during his imprisonment, and
are now going, doubtless, to take their final leave of
him.
We could distinctly see what was passing from
the tavern window. They approached the prison,
knocked at the door, and the jailer permitted them
to enter. I expressed a desire to see the
unfortunate
old chief; and my communicative friend, who
by the way was the village schoolmaster, promised
to gain me admittance to his cell on the following
morning, as it was then near the hour of closing the
doors for the night. In a few minutes the Indian
women again appeared. They looked towards the
gallows tree, and spoke to each other. As they
passed beneath the window of the inn, I perceived
that their countenances were much more placid than
they were before they entered the prison.
The stillness of the evening was now broken by
the sound of a distant drum, which gradually
became
more distinct. In an instant the whole of the
villagers were in the street gazing anxiously in the
direction whence the sound proceeded; and even
the sluggish savage felt sufficient interest, to arise
from his recumbent posture. While expectation
was on tip-toe, a corps of military appeared
winding
around the base of the mountain that
terminated
the prospect on the eastern side of the
village
.
A troop of ragged urchins ran delighted to
meet them. The soldiers had been sent for to a
neighbouring town, to intimidate the savages from
interfering with the execution of the laws.
I arose at day-break the following morning, and
on descending to the bar-room, found the
schoolmaster
already there, waiting to conduct me to the
prison. It was a delightful morning in spring. As
we walked forth, the birds were singing joyously,
the green grass sparkled with dew, the morning air
was refreshing, and laden with fragrance from the
foliage of the surrounding forest. A number of
Indians were standing beneath the gallows tree,
with their faces towards the east; their heads were
bent in sorrow, and they preserved unbroken silence
as we passed by them. The wives of Tangoras
were among the number. The sun had not yet
appeared
above the eastern horizon as we entered the
prison.
We were conducted by the jailer to the
apartment
in which the old chief was confined. We
found him standing in the centre of the cell, with
his eyes raised to a small grated window through
which the gray light of morning was stealing. His
mind was too deeply engaged with its own
reflections
to notice us as we entered. The jailer accosted
him, but he made no reply, and still kept his eyes
fixed on the same object. The schoolmaster also
spoke to him, but still he appeared unconscious of
our presence. A solitary sunbeam now stole through
the grating, which falling on the face of the old
Indian, relaxed its austerity. Still he moved not.
My companions looked at him, and then upon each
other in astonishment, which was increased by the
low sound of a number of voices joined in song.
The music was varied by occasional bursts of passion
and passages of deep pathos. Tangoras joined the
strain in a low guttural tone, scarcely audible; he
closed his eyes as he sang, and listened to the voices
apparently with deep interest.
What is the meaning of all this? I enquired.
It is the Indian death song, replied the
schoolmaster
,
and they relate in their rude strains the
most daring exploits of their favourite chief.
Tangoras stood motionless for about a quarter of
an hour, during which the song continued. His eyes
remained closed, and his countenance underwent
various changes. The expression indicated pain,
and finally it became so completely distorted as to
prove that he was labouring under intense torture,
though he still continued to mutter the death song.
It was now with the utmost difficulty that he
sustained
himself: he staggered, his knees bent under
VOL. I.9
him, and the next moment he fell to the floor, and
shouted the war whoop as he fell. They heard the
signal from without, and immediately the death song
was changed to a wild burst of exultation. We
approached to support the old chief, who was
struggling
in the agonies of death, but he waived his hand
and forbade us to touch him. We inquired into the
cause of his sudden illness, and he replied with a
smile of triumph, that nature impelled him to die
as a man, while the Christians would have taught
him to die as a dog.
The old Roman virtueconsistent to the last!
exclaimed the schoolmaster.
The dying Indian writhed on the floor, and
suddenly
turning on his back, threw out his gigantic
limbs, and lay stretched at full length. His broad
chest heaved, his teeth were clenched, his hands
closed, his eyes turned upwards, and a slight
quivering
ran through his whole frame. The song of
exultation still continued without. There was now
a gentle knock at the outer door, and the jailer
left us to attend to it. In a few minutes he
returned
,
accompanied by the wives of Tangoras. They
looked upon him as he lay upon the floor, and then
exchanged glances with each other. The struggle
was over; the body was now motionless. They bent
down beside it, covered their faces, and having
remained
in this posture a few moments, arose and left
the prison in silence. The song of exultation
ceased
as the jailer closed the door after them. As I
returned to the inn, I expressed astonishment at the
cause of his sudden death.
The cause is plain enough, replied the
schoolmaster
.
The women who visited him last evening,
left a dose of poison with him. It is evident that
the plan was preconcerted.
About an hour afterwards, we beheld the dejected
Indians slowly ascending the mountain, bearing the
remains of the old chief to a spot where they might
repose without longer being trampled on by the
justice of the pale faces.
THE
OLD STORY.
In multis juris nostri articulis deterior est conditio
feminarum
quam masculorum.
Papinianus
.
They
buried themselves in the wilderness;
withdrew
from the scornful gaze of their fellow
creatures
,
to hold communion with their sorrows. A
river, in its primitive wildness, rolled before their
humble habitation, while behind it frowned a lofty
mountain, in all the rugged majesty of nature. The
few who traversed its mazes, in pursuit of game,
were as uncouth as the bear that dwelt in its caverns,
and the struggle between civilization and a savage
state for mastery rendered them, as it were, an
anomaly
in the human race. But the strides of
civilization
are gigantic, and not to be impeded. A
cluster
of rude cabins already appeared on the margin of
the river; the lofty monarchs of the forest, yielding
to the stroke of the axe, were girdled and suffered to
decay. The green corn sprung up amid their dying
trunks, and the silence of the wilderness was now
broken by the tinkling of the bells, that denoted
where the herd was browsing amidst the luxuriant
natural pasture.
But this was to
them
a sight of sorrow, and not of
joy, for they had felt the scorn of their fellow
mortals
,
and were crushed to the earth by the arbitrary
rules of right and wrong prescribed by graybeards
and schoolmen, even as the oak of the forest, and the
flower that blooms beneath it, are crushed by the
thunderbolt, never again to blossom. They beheld
the inroads of civilization as the traveller along the
sea beach beholds the approaching waves, from which
there is no escape; gradual, yet fearful to look upon,
for they no sooner reach than they destroy.
Theirs
was a communion of spirit, an intellectual
intercourse
,
such as mortals cannot partake of, until the
spirit has been bruised, and the ties of this world
are as powerless as fetters made of the sand of the
sea. They already understood the language of
spirits
,
for it seemed as if their inmost thoughts were
made known without the aid of the corporeal senses.
They seldom spoke, for words were useless; their
thoughts were common to both, and every act and
every look proved the extent of mutual devotion.
The first time I met them in their seclusion, was
on a delightful morning in the month of June. It
was in a grove of sugar trees on the bank of the river,
some distance from their dwelling; the sun was just
rising, and the birds were singing joyously from every
spray. He was slowly leading a fine horse, upon
which the tall sylph-like form of his companion
was seated. She was dressed in neat apparel, and
veiled, though there was little chance of any other
eyes falling on her countenance than his own. True,
there was a time when she would rather have
encountered
death than a look from him, but that time
had passed by, for now it seemed that his presence
was the very fountain of her existence.
She raised her veil to enjoy the passing breeze.
Her countenance was serene and divinely beautiful;
divinely so, for there was much more of heavenly
than earthly beauty in it. Her forehead was high
and polished, and bound round by a plain braid of
hair, as glossy and as dark as the plumage of the
raven. The lustre of her large black eyes was now
feeble, and the cheeks that once vied with the colour
of the rose, were now as pallid as the lily, save that
a deep hectic spot interrupted the perfect whiteness,
but blended not with it. It was the mark that death
had set on her, that he might know his victim.
I had seen her the loveliest among the beautiful;
where all eyes were turned upon her in admiration,
for she shone forth as conspicuously in the multitude
as the evening star in the firmament. But a cloud
had passed over her, and her rays were no longer
seen. And him I also knew, when he moved among
the proudest, and was distinguished wherever he
moved. His person was matchless, his spirit lofty,
and his mind highly cultivated, but unfortunately
those things which have received the highest polish
are the most readily susceptible of tarnish.
He surveyed the surrounding landscape in
silence
for some time, and then turning to his
companion
,
exclaimed, How beautiful is nature! While
contemplating a scene like this, the mind becomes
regenerate, and startles at the sublimity of its own
conceptions. It bursts as the young eagle from the
egg, and though at first it winks at the resistless
stream of light, nature impels it to soar above on
steady wing, and in time it turns not, even though
the forked lightning shivers in its path. More is
to be learnt from the silent musing on the wonders
of creation, than from all the wise saws that
gownsmen
deal from the pulpit. Even the little flower
that springs at your feet smiles for a time, and then
dies in the midst of its fragrance, has its moral; the
joyous stream that gushes from the mountain side,
and leaps from rock to rock down the precipice,
proclaims in its wild liberty a guiding hand; the
feathered songsters, in their various notes, speak of
it; and even their rich and varied plumage bears
silent testimony to the same effect. The great truth
is heard in the hollow moan of the forest, and the
falling rain sets the parched foliage of the silent
trees babbling in praise of the hand that refreshed
9*
them. Then have not we, the choicest of
his
works,
and for whose use all things were made, reason to
to love and adore him? But man, conscious of his
own unworthiness, has clothed his god in terrors.
The rude barbarian, and the most enlightened, alike
study rather to avert his wrath than to gain his love;
and religion is with them rather an impulse of fear,
than the overflowing of gratitude for his mercies.
The gods of different nations have partaken of the
nature of the people who worshipped. Those who
compose the mythology of the ancients are sullied
with all human impurities, and are the slaves of the
worst of human passions; easily excited to wrath, and
readily to be appeased. The fabulous Jove committed
crimes in heaven that earth would revolt from, yet
he was pictured as being powerful, and was adored.
The sacrifices offered to conciliate him were such as
would consign the christian to the worst of perdition,
yet they gained the heathen heaven, if so it may be
called, governed by one pictured less merciful than
man. They copied their paradise from their earthly
pursuits, and peopled it with such beings as would
minister to their earthly desires, revivified in
another
region. Their dream of futurity was an
eternity
of human pleasures, varied to suit the taste of the
dreamer; and thus we find the Goth revelling at the
festive board in the hall of Odin, and the idle
Mahometan
luxuriating in his harem with houries, whose
charms will never fade. The one could imagine
nothing
surpassing an everlasting drinking bout, with
the scull of his foe before him to hold his beverage,
and the other could conceive no heaven where the
grossest of his earthly appetites might not enter.
But with us, Louisa, it is different, for those who
have the mind to enjoy a scene like this we now
contemplate
,
may picture a heaven far beyond the
heathen's
conception.
True, my brother, she replied, with us it is
different; we enjoy light which the heathen did not
enjoy, but that light only serves to render to the
guilty the prospect of the future more terrible.
Not so, my Louisa; it is rather a beacon to those
who have erred. The best of human institutions are
attended with partial evil, and even those of divine
origin, when applied to human affairs, are not
altogether
exempt. Revealed religion is the holy bond
which binds the mass of mankind indissolubly
together
;
break it, and chaos would literally come again.
It adds cheerfulness to the light of heart, and is a
balm to the wounded spirit; yet not unfrequently it
prostrates in the place of comforting, for its
denunciations
alone are heard by many, and its bright
rewards
and promises are considered as extending to
a few of the chosen. Such imagine that heaven can
only be attained by passing through a life of
purgatory
here, and know not that the most grateful
offering
that can be rendered is a cheerful heart and a
pure one. We came not here to mourn in sackcloth
and ashes over the inborn sin of the old Adam, but
rather to rejoice and be grateful for the life that was
given, and render that life a gift to be rejoiced at.
True, we came not to mourn over the inherent
sin, she replied, but the sin that owes its origin to
us, we must answer for.
And hast thou not answered for it, he
exclaimed
,
as few have answered? Has not the atonement
in this world been sufficient without extending to the
next? Such is the variety of human offences, that
gownsmen themselves can scarcely designate those
that are against divine, from such as are merely
infringements
of human laws. Too frequently they are
confounded, and the wrath of the Omnipotent is
heard in the imagination of the offender, for an act
not vicious in itself, but magnified into a crime by
human institutions. It is possible to refine on virtue
until it becomes a vice, and to philosophize on vice
until it assumes the aspect of virtue. You are fading
fast, Louisa, and I know not at what moment a breeze
may come, and for ever nip the flower that I have so
long and tenderly watched over. There was a time
when you were the pride of my heart, and when my
heart was proudest. Nay, weep not at the
recollection
;
for dear to me as you then were, at no moment
of your life were you ever more dear to me than at
the present. But the time is fast approaching, when
that delicate form must mingle with the clods of the
valley, and I become desolate. Still it is in your
power to leave me one reflection that will be to me
as a day star in my wanderings.
My brother, name it.
Die as I would have you. Let me see a smile on
your lips as I close your eyes in death, to satisfy me
that you leave not this world in terror. I know it is
the creed of your sex, that she who keeps her virtue
unsullied may be canonized as a saint, though
begrimed
with a multitude of offences; while she who
is possessed of every heavenly virtue, if guilty of one
offence that proves her a mortal, is immediately
thrown beyond the pale of society, and condemned
as unfit for this world, or that which is to come. But
I would have you die in a more consoling creed than
this.
I will, if I can.
You must. Let me not see you die as you have
lived, without hope.
He led the horse slowly through the maple grove
towards their dwelling, and I returned to the small
settlement, which already assumed the name, though
not much the appearance of a village. Here I
remained
about a week, when intelligence was received
that the female recluse was dead. All voices were
loud in sounding her praise, and the tears that were
shed were those of real sorrow, for often had she
ministered comfort to the sick, and spoke in glowing
terms to the dying of those hopes that she herself
would not venture to indulge.
The time the funeral was to take place, I repaired
to the hermitage with the villagers. The mourner
was alone, seated in front of his house; serious but
not sorrow stricken. As I approached with the rest,
he recognised me, rose, and offered his hand. We
have met on more joyous occasions, he said, but
in this world we cannot expect always to bask in the
sunshine.
True, for the brightest day may be overcast
before
the sun goes down.
And when the storm rages, he added, the
loftiest
oak of the forest is most likely to be torn up and
riven.
He silently led me to the door of the cottage; we
entered, and he ushered me into the room where the
corpse lay incoffined. He uncovered its face.
Look there, he said, you have gazed in
admiration
on that face, in a more brilliant scene than this,
but trust me not a happier. The day of death may
and should be rendered the happiest that life affords.
How purely beautiful she is even in death!
I observed that her countenance was placid, and
that a sweet smile was on her lips. He caught my
hand and pressed it convulsively; tears gushed from
his eyes, and he scarcely articulated, I strove for
years to produce that smile, and have finally
succeeded
.
There is nothing in life half so beautiful or dear
to me as that smile. It came over her lips as last
night she told me that her soul had cast its burthen,
and she died so easy that death froze the impression
there.
He stood gazing at the departed in silence, until
it was time for the funeral to commence moving. It
was composed of about twenty of his neighbours.
We took up the body, and moved on towards the
grave prepared to receive it, which was in a small
cluster of cypress trees, a short distance from their
dwelling. It had been her favourite retreat in the
heat of the summer, and rude benches were here and
there placed from tree to tree. There was no one
to pronounce the impressive dust to dust; but the
open grave, and the mortal remains beside it,
awakened
feelings in the rude minds of the mute
spectators
,
far more eloquent than words could embody.
Eloquence of thought is conferred on a greater
number
than the powers of rhetoric. The mourner stood
at the head of the grave, and with his own hands
assisted
in depositing the remains of all that he loved
on earth. He was as careful in this last duty as if
the senseless clay still retained the functions of
vitality
,
for he still valued the casket, though the
jewel was gone. He scattered a spade full of earth
upon the coffin; it was the signal, and the grave was
speedily closed. During this operation he stood
mute, stifled one convulsive sigh, but shed not a
single tear. Why should he weep, since the weary
was at rest? He returned to the hermitage. I
accompanied
him, and the rustics withdrew to their
respective pursuits. The transition from life to
death is immediate, but not more so than from the
scene of death to the active employments of life, and
both appear to be made with equal unconcern.
You will now return, I trust, said I, to society
again, for the object that occasioned your seclusion
no longer requires your care, and experience must
have taught you that you are not a fit subject for a
hermitage.
You appear to forget, he replied, that I am
a proscribed man, and that I must answer for human
blood unrighteously shed. Remember that he whose
perfidy broke the heart and blighted the fair fame of
her who was with me but yesterday, fell by this hand.
I neither condemn nor defend the act, but as long as
society is organized upon its present principles, in
spite of the cool sophistry of the sluggish in spirit,
and the furious denunciations of the heated in
imagination
,
I would do it again to-morrow, upon
similar
provocation, though with the certainty of being
called forth the next moment to render an account
upon the scaffold.
The magnitude of your injury, I replied, may
obtain a pardon for your offence, even should it not
be already forgotten.
Forgotten! and are you so ignorant of the race
with which you daily mingle, as to suppose it to be
forgotten? True, the remembrance of it may sleep,
but my presence would awaken it in all its primitive
freshness, and with it my poor sister's shame, and a
thousand attending circumstances. Forgotten!
disgrace
is never forgotten while the object lives, and,
like a contagion, it spreads to every member of the
family. Nay, such is the jaundiced eye with which
every thing human is viewed, that more become
conspicuous
from the shame of a relative, than from
their own positive worth, however meritorious. God
spare me from such an order of things. Return!
Never! I must still strike deeper into the wilderness,
where my name will never be mentioned and my
shame never heard.
The following morning the hermitage was
deserted
.
With his rifle on his shoulder, the
broken-hearted
man had already set out on his pilgrimage.
RETRIBUTION.
I long have hunted for thee: and since now
Thou art in the toil, it is in vain to hope
Thou ever shalt break out. Thou dost deserve
The hangman's hook, or to be punished
More majorum
, whipt with rods to death,
Or any way that were more terrible.
The Prophetess
.
Revenge
is as refreshing to the wounded spirit,
as the cool stream from the fountain to the fevered
lips of the dying. And he who has been trodden
on and branded, whose soul has endured the agony
of death without the relief it affords, looks forward
to the hour of retribution, like the delirious wretch,
whose vitals are consumed by a raging fever, and
who expects that a refreshing draught of water will
allay the poignancy of his sufferings. And so it
does; but, for a moment, and again it rages with
redoubled
violence. How beautiful, how sublime is
that preceptthe christian's golden ruleforgive
us our trespasses as we forgive those who trespass
against us! But who would be thus adjudged?
Who is there, that does not hope to meet with more
mercy in his God, than he has shown towards his
fellow man? If there be one so confident in his own
purity, that he will be judged as he has adjudged
othersHeaven hear my prayerhave mercy on
him. We are made up of conflicting passions; and
thrown into a sphere where the mind most richly
endowed, by miracle alone can escape being goaded
to madness. There are those whose souls are as
sensitive as the mimosa plant; who shrink at every
breeze, and are lacerated by a touch; who possess
all that makes the mind lovely and beautiful, when
the current of life flows smoothly onall that makes
it dark and terrible when the tempest threatens.
The germs of vice and virtue are mingled in like
proportions in every mind; and much depends upon
circumstances, whether the one or the other take
root in the soil and flourish. And yet how few can
look with an eye of compassion on the derelictions
of another. One act will constitute a villain, and
call forth the execration of mankindand on the
other hand, the possessor of a thousand virtues
seldom
meets his reward, and sinks into the grave as if
he were of as little worth as the worm that
afterwards
consumes him. The praise and censure of
man are as uncertain and variable as the wind that
blows from the four corners of the earth.
I was born in one of the West India islands. My
parents were in affluent circumstances, and being
an only child and of feeble constitution, their
indulgence
was unlimited. I was a creature of feeling;
sensibly alive to their boundless affection, which
was constantly before my eyesnever absent from
my thought; and at times I felt a fulness of soul in
their presence, beyond my little skill in metaphysics
to account for rationally. There are some whose
feelings are so delicately strung, affections so
harmoniously
attuned, that an act, nay, a look of
kindness
,
even when in the vale of years, will make them
as it were a child again; such are ill calculated for
this rugged world; and I have often fancied when I
came in collision with them, that Providence had
designed them for a purer orb, but chance had thrown
them here.
My boyhood!Oh! that I could blot that bright
period from my memory! I look back through a
VOL. I.10
waste of yearsmy heart sickens at the gloomy path
I have travelledand reverts to the starting place,
when the prospect was as brilliant as a fervid
imagination
could picture; but I have since learnt the
sun may rise in cloudless splendour, yet set amid
the horrors of a tempest.
At the age of twelve, it was my fate to lose both
my parents. Until that day I had never shed a tear
of affliction; but then the torrent rushed upon me
in all its terrors. I felt as if in an instant I had
been whirled through infinity of space to another
sphere. I doubted my identity. At times I could
not reconcile to my mind the possibility of my loss,
the thought of death having never cast a shade over
my vision of the future; and when I awoke to a full
conviction of my situation, in bitterness I called
upon God to relieve me from my load of misery.
My father had an only brother, to whose
protection
he recommended me on his death-bed. I have
still in my memory, the look of my dying father,
when he conjured him to watch over my welfare, as
if I were his child; the earnest expression of
countenance
,
the look of mingled sorrow and affection
that he cast on me at the moment, and the heart
thrilling tone of voice shall never be erased from my
recollection, though things even of yesterday, in my
delirium are now forgotten. My uncle vowed to be
a father to megently drew me closely to his side,
pressed the cold hand of the dying man, and sealed
the compact with the impress of a tear. My father
sank upon the pillow; his eyes were still fixed on
me, but the glazing of death was over them.
I was removed to my uncle's house. He resided
on an extensive plantation, and was what the world
calls a thriving man. He had many slaves under
him, and, as too frequently is the case, was a
tyrannical
master. There are those who imagine the
Creator
was not bountiful enough when he made all things
for the use of man; but one half of the race must be
rendered subservient to the other. In my uncle's
house, resided an orphan girl, the niece of his wife.
She was a year younger than myself, and one of
those exquisite beings which nature in her hours of
prodigality lavishes her richest stores upon. Poor
Virginia! My uncle seldom spoke to her in language
of tenderness; never looked upon her with the eyes
of affection. He was an austere manselfish
wholly
wrapped up in himself, and I never saw him smile,
unless while superintending the chastisement of a
slave. But his smile was like nothing human. It
was a smile of horrid satisfaction, and more painful
to the sufferer than the stripes he inflicted. I
instinctively
avoided him, and poor Virginia was on
the rack whenever obliged to be in his presence.
His wife was a plain woman; a woman of worth
as the world goes, but evidently broken down in
spirit. Her affections had been violently crushed;
no one feeling of her heart finding a corresponding
feeling in him to whom she was unalterably bound;
and if you take woman from her genial world of
sympathy and affection, what is she?
During the first three years after my father's
death, I was sent to the best school the island
afforded
.
My thirst for knowledge was inordinate; it
soon became a ruling passion, for as my mind
enlarged
,
I was aware how little I had attained, and
every new light only served to show the
inexhaustible
store of knowledge that lay before me. Within
my eye's reach, there was enough to engross a life
of study. The sea and the heavens were, however,
the books that I most perused. They filled my mind
with feelings, calculated to weaken the ties which
connected me with this world rather than with
knowledge
.
As I stood upon the beach, and listened to
the mighty roar of waters; saw wave chasing wave
in endless succession, and beheld the progress of the
wind, increased from a gentle zephyr to a tempest,
lashing the waters to fury; as I lay upon the hill at
midnight, and watched the motions of the heavenly
bodies, worlds so distant, that hundreds could be
surveyed at a single glance; I thought of the causes
said to govern them in their motions and phenomena,
and felt that mind was too narrow to conceive them
all.
These thoughts engrossed my mind. Day and
night were devoted to their investigation, and every
new discovery only tended to increase my thirst for
knowledge. I secluded myself from the world, and
my knowledge of mankind did not increase with my
years. Indeed, I knew not even the few who
frequented
my uncle's house; and, as to the world at
large, I had but such an erroneous view as works of
fiction presented. The only being that I thoroughly
knew, was poor Virginia, and with such my fervid
imagination peopled the world. I have since found
the wildness of my error.
From my course of study, natural timidity, and
seldom coming in collision with mankind, I became
as sensitive as the plant that enfolds its leaves if the
wind too rudely kisses it. Thus constituted, it was
torture to be in the presence of my uncle. My
aversion was insurmountable, and increased to such
a degree, that I avoided my meals rather than
encounter
him at the table. Every sense was alive to
him. The sound of his most distant step was
familiar
to my ear, and I imagined that even the breeze
that passed over him indicated his approach. The
severity of his conduct towards Virginia, tended to
increase my aversion, and to add to the warmth of
the interest I entertained for that neglected one.
She soon became sensible of my feelings and
estimated
them. O God! what agony had I escaped if
that martyr had been to me as heartless as the rest
of the world. But the generous mind is not so
severely
stricken by its own sorrows, as by the
afflictions
of her with whom its tenderest thoughts repose.
This crushed me. My own burthen, alas! I could
have borne; or, like the fabled Sisyphus, would daily
have resumed; but to behold the sufferings of her I
loved, the patient, the pious resignation to her cruel
fate, drove me frantic. In my agony I arraigned
the justice of Heaven, cursed mankind, and
imprecated
curses on my own head; but that was
needless
,
for they had fallen thickly, and blighted as they
fell.
Virginia and myself were privately married. From
that moment my views of the world were changed.
I felt myself a beggar; and, when too late, I became
sensible of the madness of blighting her hopes by
joining her fate with his whose prospects were so
gloomy. I had assumed the character of her
protector
,
and was unable even to protect myself. Her
presence had hitherto been to me as the star to the
tempest-tost mariner; but now there was nothing on
earth occasioned such agony as her presence. And
why was this? My love was as pure as that which
angels entertain, and as boundless and as ardent too.
Every good feeling of my heart reposed in her,
unadulterated
,
for there was not that being on earth to
dispute her hold upon my affections. She had created
in my mind an ideal world, too brilliant for mortals
to inhabit, and as I looked around to find those to
people it, she alone appeared worthy. My dream
was wild with ecstacy; but oh! the awakening was
terrible.
We continued under my uncle's roof, the
circumstance
of our marriage still remaining a secret. The
time, however, soon arrived, when it became
necessary
for me to divulge what had transpired. My
uncle assumed anger, calling me pauper, and
ridiculed
my presumption in taking upon myself the
support of a family. He taunted me, and even in
the agony of the moment I beheld the sarcastic smile
upon his lip. My brain was in a whirl; nothing
was distinct, and every passion was goaded to frenzy,
yet I did not smite him, for the image of my poor
Virginia crossed my mind, and I resolved to
humble
myself in the dust for her sake. I thought of
her forlorn condition, and wept in the agony of the
moment. He ridiculed my tears. There was a
fiend-like smile of irony on his lipsall reflection
vanishedthe savage was awaked, and I sprang
upon him. We fell prostrate to the earth together;
what followed I know not, but when I came to my
10*
reason, I found that his household had assembled,
and I was in the custody of his slaves. That night
Virginia and myself were thrust from his doors.
I had heard of the wealth of my father, and that
his property had come into my uncle's hands, but
as to the value or extent of this property, I had no
evidence. I called upon him to make restitution
he treated the claim with contemptcalled me a
pennyless vagrant, who had repaid his protection
with ingratitude, and commanded me never to show
my face in his presence again.
I returned to the house where Virginia awaited
in anxious suspense the result of my errand. As I
entered, she hastened to meet me; there was a ray
of hope crossed her lovely countenance, which in
an instant was extinguished, for my sad looks
realized
her worst fears before my lips were opened. I
pressed her to my bosom and wept in silence. She
vainly endeavoured to sooth my anguish, but the
appalling future had taken possession of my soul,
and I could not bear up against it.
I resorted to the law for redress; hopeless resort!
for justice is so tardy in her movements that she
suffers the hour to pass when she might serve,
beyond
which nothing is left for her but to bestow a
gorgeous monument on him she made a pauper.
More suffer by the law than those who offend against
it; and more frequently the innocent than the guilty
suffer.
My uncle, exasperated at the steps I had taken,
brought a suit against me for supporting Virginia
and myself during our minority. I was destitute
of moneyof consequence, destitute of friends, and
was consigned to prison for want of the necessary
bail. Virginia followed me there, and we remained
together during the day, and at night she left me.
She found that shelter in the cabin of a slave which
her uncle's roof denied her. His name was
Gambia
,
a man of feeling superior to his station.
Virginia
had ministered to the wants of his wife, when
on her sick bed, and by her care did much towards
restoring her. The poor fellow's gratitude knew
no bounds. He laboured night and day to increase
her comforts; and solicited all, where there was the
remotest hope of success, to interfere for my
liberation
.
Day passed after day, and week succeeded week,
and I seemed to be forgotten by all the world but
Virginia and the slave. The sun had scarcely risen
before she was at my prison door, and at night he
came to escort her to his lonely dwelling. Health
had forsaken me, and the disease of my body had
affected my mind. At times madness took
possession
of my brain, and my actual sufferings were
forgotten
,
for then I dreamt of revenge, and I have
laughed at the bloody picture painted in such vivid
colours that it appeared palpable to the touch, until
the vaults re-echoed with the frightful sounds that
passed my lips, and startled my wandering senses
back to reason. And then I would ruminate upon
my dreadful condition, until my fears that I should
become mad, nearly drove me so. The rush of
thought would come like a deluge on me: still
growing
wilder and more hurried, and all this time I was
sensible; my feelings were alive to my situation, and
with the vain hope to stem the torrent, I would cling
to some rational idea, like a drowning man to a straw
but it proved no more than suchthe one still
clenches fast to the frail reed in the agonized grasp
of death, and I clung to my idea in the wildest rush
of madness.
Thus passed my solitary nights. I had been
imprisoned
for some months, and Virginia, even when
sickness should have occasioned her absence, would
not suffer one day to pass over without visiting me.
I beheld her wasting frame, and conjured her not
thus unnecessarily to expose her health. Still she
came, though the task was as much as, in her feeble
state, she could accomplish. She knew the influence
of her presence over me, and ran every hazard rather
than forsake me at such a time. The day, however,
arrived when she came not. My mind was filled
with apprehensions, and I awaited anxiously for the
evening, when the appearance of Gambia would
explain
the cause. The evening arrived, yet brought
not Gambia with it. I passed a sleepless night of
dreadful suspense, and looked for the first streak of
morning with as much impatience as if it were to
restore me to liberty. It came, and still I received
no tidings of Virginia. My suspense now increased
to agony. Time never passed so heavily as on that
day. Mental suffering consists more in the
apprehension
of ill, than in the ill itself, however great its
magnitude.
I thought night would never arrive, and yet I
dreaded its approach. I was on the eve of some
important change; what I knew not, but it is the
weakness of human nature to fear that any change,
however desperate our condition, may be for the
worse. I had fancied myself beyond the reach of
fate to sink me lower, and yet I feared to learn what
was about to be developed.
As I beheld the last ray of the setting sun fade
away in the west, the raging fever of my mind
increased
,
and I cried A little longer, yet stay a
little longer. I felt like one who sees the
lightning's
flash, and expects the bolt to crush him.
There was no mistaking my feelings; they foretold
ill, but what it was I could not imagine. When I
thought of my abject state, I laughed in derision at
my fears, and the bare walls re-echoed my laugh; I
startled at the frantic sound, and my fears came over
me with redoubled vigour.
My prison was now enveloped in darkness. The
hour, I felt, was near at hand, and I seated myself
upon my bed of straw, and struggled to be calm. I
endeavoured to fix my wandering mind on some
rational
subject; but it was impossible; the most
frantic
ideas were constantly obtruding, and I thought
these rational too, until startled by the wildness of
my imaginings.
A step was now heard in the entry which led to
my prison; a flash of light crossed the wall, which
was immediately succeeded by the rattling of keys
at my door. I sat motionless. The jailer entered;
he spoke, but I heard him not, for I looked for those
whom I imagined accompanied him. I looked in
vainhe was alone. I fell backwards on the bed.
When I revived, I found myself supported by the
jailer, who was chafing my temples with water. I
inquired for Virginia and Gambia. Be comforted,
he replied; Your imprisonment is at an end. I
looked at him with astonishment, and thought,
indeed
,
that my sorrows had at length turned my brain.
He continued, showing a paper, here is my
warrant
to set you at liberty, and I assure you I am as
glad to see it as you can be. I laughed
frantically
.
I knew not what he meant. Could it be
derision
?
What friend had I on earth to intercede
for me? I knew of none. And if there were such,
why was not Virginia or Gambia the first to
communicate
the happy tidings to me. These thoughts
passed through my brain like lightning, and made
me wilder. The jailer bade me rise and follow him,
and I did so as submissively as if I had been his
slave. He led through the windings of the entrance
into the open air. I looked around with wonder,
and my bosom expanded to the fresh breeze. He
shook me by the hand, said God bless you, and
returned to the prison. I was alone. The cool night
breeze refreshed my burning temples; I saw the
stars above me, and heard the constant roar of the
distant ocean. I laughed aloud for joy; and,
conscious
that I was free, darted off wildly, fearing
that I might again be imprisoned. I hurried on
with the swiftness of the deer. Madness gave me
speed, for at every sound I imagined my
persecutors
were in pursuit of me. I had but one hope,
which was to reach Gambia's hut, and remain
concealed
until danger should pass by.
I reached the hut breathless with fear. The door
was closed, and a light feebly glimmered through
the casement of the window. The wind rustled
among the sugar-cane; every pore in my frame
seemed to be endowed with the faculty of hearing,
and every sense was strained to that exquisite
acuteness
as to approach agony. I was as timid as the
hunted hare, or the fawn whose dam has been
stricken; and I imagined the noise proceeded from
my pursuers. That thought was madness. Shall
I be overtaken; dragged back to my loathsome
prison
,
without having satisfied my doubtswithout
having seen Virginia? I summoned all my strength,
and dashed my body against the door of the hut: it
yielded to the pressure, and I fell insensible on the
floor. I heard a shriek of terror as I fell.
How long I lay in this condition, I know not.
When I revived, the hut was deserted. The light
was still burning; and, as I arose, I perceived there
was much blood upon the floor. My face was wet,
and, on feeling it, I discovered a gash in my
forehead
,
from which the blood was profusely flowing.
When the mind is wounded the body feels no pain.
I stood erect, and called on Virginia, but no answer
was returned; I called on Gambia with all my
strength; and as the echo of my voice died away,
nothing was heard but the wind that rustled through
the cane-brake, and the monotonous roar of the
ocean.
My perplexities increased. It was surely
Gambia's
hut I was in. I had stood on the same spot
repeatedly: it was the place where Virginia had
found shelter, and yet she was not there, and there
was no one to guide me to her. I had been liberated
by some unknown friend. Who was this friend,
and how was this friendship purchased? We were
as destitute as the pauper who lives on common
charity; yet Virginia was the loveliest of God's
creaturesA thought rushed through my brain
like molten lead, and I felt as if it seared its vitality
in the passage. I shrieked with anguish, then cursed
myself for the guilty doubt.
There was a small apartment adjoining that in
which I stood; the door was open, and the room was
quite dark. It was this apartment she had told me
she occupied. I raised the light to enter the room,
with the hope of discovering there some trace of my
wife. I entered; all was silent. In one corner of
the room lay a mass of something. I raised the light
and discovered a coarse bed lying on the floor. I
drew near to it; there was some one in it who stirred
not; I listened, but heard no sound of breathing.
The light fell upon the features of the person; they
were motionless and pale as ashes; I stooped and
placed my hand upon the forehead; it was cold and
polished as marble. How long I remained in this
position I know not; my mind was wandering. At
length consciousness returned. I removed the
covering
from the bosom of the corpse in the
excitement
of the moment, and beheld a new born infant
reposing there, whose life had been as brief as the
light of a falling star that approaches earth for an
instant, and again is caught in heaven. I shrieked
the name of
Virginia
and fell upon the body.
When I was restored to consciousness, I found
myself supported by Gambia, and his wife was
standing at a short distance from me. She shrunk
back as I fixed my eyes on her, for there was
madness
in my glance, and my face was covered with
blood. The kind souls did what they could to soothe
my feelings.
I learned that Virginia had died the evening
preceding
,
in giving birth to her infant. The child soon
followed its mother. Gambia then left the cabin to
effect my release. He had, heretofore, solicited all,
where there was the remotest prospect of success,
but in vain. There was one hope still left.
Several
years before, he had saved a youth from
drowning
;
the son of a wealthy planter, who had now
arrived at man's estate. The circumstance, until
that moment, had escaped the generous mind of the
slave. He resolved to apply to him, though he lived
at the other extremity of the island. He started
travelled all night, and the request was no sooner
made than complied with by the young planter.
The application reminded him of the benevolent
spirit to which he was indebted for his life.
Gambia
had not yet returned from his journey when I
abruptly broke into his cabin, where his wife, being
alone with a dead body, had her superstitious fears
awakened, and fled in terror on my entrance.
I was now alone in the world. All that was dear
to me remained to be consigned to the earth. My
thoughts and feelings at that moment partook of the
wildness and rapidity of a being who inhabits a lesser
globe than this, and is whirled through space with
tenfold the velocity. Thought succeeded thought
with the quickness and brilliancy of lightninga
flash came, and all was darkness; no impression
remained save onemy duty to the earthly remains
of my wife and child. I had no claim upon
mankind
,
and I considered myself accountable to no one
for my actions.
I commanded the slave and his wife to follow me
into the little garden attached to the cabin. They
did sothe woman bearing a lantern. We
proceeded
in silence to the extremity, and stopped beneath
the branches of a luxuriant plantain. This, I
cried, is a peaceful spot, and here we will dig the
grave. They made no reply, but Gambia
withdrew
,
and immediately returned with tools for the
purpose. We commenced our labour, which was
speedily performed, and not a word was spoken.
We returned to the cabin. My mind was as
restless
as the whirlwind. I looked around to find
something
to supply the place of a coffin, and beheld a
long chest which belonged to the woman. I
motioned
to her to empty it, which she did. I then
raised the body of my wife, and deposited it in the
chest. The infant I placed upon her bosom, and
knelt beside them, but wept not. My eyes ached
to burst, and were as dry as bone, and there was a
fulness about my heart that almost prevented
respiration
.
I wished to weep, for I felt that I should
find relief in a flood of tears; but it was impossible.
I heard the woman sob aloud, and beheld the silent
grief of Gambia, then again turned to gaze on the
inanimate clay before me. I could have gazed for
ever.
With a desperate energy I closed the lid of the
chest, and rose from my knees. I motioned to
Gambia
to take hold of one end of the chest; I raised the
other, and we moved towards the grave; the deep
silence only broken by the stifled sobs of the
woman
,
who followed with the light. The chest was
gently deposited, and we filled the earth upon it.
Still not a word passed the lips of either; but the
features of the slaves denoted their deep affliction,
and their eyes were fixed on me. As to myself, I
was insensible. There is a point beyond which the
ills of this world cannot reach us, and I had already
arrived at it. Those who have nothing to hope, have
nothing to fear, and my last hope was buried. When
the grave was closed, I was astonished at the
wonderful
change my mind had undergone; a transition
from an ungovernable tempest to a dead calm. I
felt that she whose sufferings had driven me to
madness
,
was at rest; the thought crushed me to the
earth, yet there was a melancholy satisfaction in it.
I threw my feverish body upon the bed from which
I had just taken Virginia, where I remained until
morning; but, whether I slept or watched I know
not, for sleeping and awake, the same dreams
constantly
flitted through my mind.
The morning broke in splendour. The sun, when
just heaving up from the joyous ocean, beheld me
standing by the grave of Virginia. I looked upon
the emerald surface of the sea; and the frothy
pinnacles
of the waves, as white as flakes of snow,
were tinged with streaks of gold by the beams of
the sun. The morning breeze came fresh from the
face of the water. There was not a cloud in the
sky, and the atmosphere was so pellucid, that I
imagined
my sight could penetrate farther than was
permitted to mortal vision. The birds sang joyously;
the trees, the flowers, and vines sent forth their
odours, and there was a freshness in nature beyond
what I had ever experienced until that moment.
VOL. I.11
These things were mine, I cried, and I was
formed to enjoy them as few enjoy! My eyes fell
upon the fresh earth beneath my feet, and I felt my
desolation.
Vengeance, vengeance! I cried, upon the fell
destroyer. While I have life, I will pursue him
with deadly hate. Powerful as he is, I will work
his downfall. We cannot breathe the same
atmosphere
in peace, until my vengeance is satisfied.
Through life I will be as an adder in his sight,
and even in death he shall not escape me. It was
but the threat of an impotent boy in his delirium.
Time rolled on; vengeance was my dream, but
the power of executing it was beyond my grasp.
Besides, the course to be pursued was still
undefined
.
Shall I murder him? My blood curdled
at the thought. Still vengeance was never absent
from my mind.
About a fortnight after the death of Virginia, as
the sun was setting, I wandered near the dwelling
house of my uncle. I beheld at a distance an
assemblage
of slaves in the yard, and on approaching,
discovered
that some one was undergoing the
punishment
of the lash. I could readily discern the tall
figure of the merciless master, and that the scourge
was in his own hand. As I drew nigh, I met a slave,
who informed me that Gambia was suffering
chastisement
for having effected my liberation from
prison
,
and subsequently harbouring me. I rushed to
the spot, my mind was in a whirlwind of passion.
I saw the bleeding body of the generous slaveand
he suffered for my sake! I saw the blood-stained
scourge in the upraised hand of the inflexible
monster
,
ready to inflict another wound. Ferocity was
in his countenance; his thin lips were compressed;
his teeth clenched; his face pale with rage, and every
nerve was braced with hellish determination; but
before the blow was given, I sprang upon him and
planted a knife in his bosom. He fell at my feet,
and the blood spouted forth from the wound.
The almost exhausted slave raised his languid
head. A momentary smile of satisfaction crossed
his countenance as he beheld his tyrant prostrate,
but it was succeeded by deep dejection when he
saw by whom the blow was given.
Oh! master, he cried, why did you do this?
You will now suffer much, but poor Gambia will
not suffer less for it. I know you are the slave's
friend; but the poor slave has no friend if his master
is his enemy.
He sank exhausted and was carried away. My
uncle was removed into the house; but not until he
had given orders to have me secured. I was
conducted
back to my prison, charged with an attempt
to murder. The sudden change in my condition
gave me but little uneasiness, for place and
circumstances
were now indifferent to me.
Towards the evening of the following day, I
learned
from the jailer that my uncle's wound was by no
means dangerous, and that Gambia had since died
of the severe stripes he had received. I cursed all
human laws which extended protection to such a
monster as my uncle, and arraigned the wisdom of
Heaven in giving him existence. Blind mortal!
Neither the ways of man nor of God were longer
to be insulted.
He was arraigned and tried for murder. The
proud man appeared in court, as if no law beyond
his own will could reach him. He considered the
charge as idle: he had but taken the life of his own
property, and what had the law to do with this, since
he alone was the loser? But he learned that the
law protects the life of a slave, though at the same
time it deprives him of all that makes life valuable.
He was convicted and sentenced to be executed.
When I heard this, the first thought that occurred
to me was, that he had escaped my vengeance.
There are injuries which few are willing that the
law should redress, and mine were of that
description
.
I thirsted for vengeance more ardently as the
probability of attaining it diminished. Could I die
in peace without it? He was imprisoned in the cell
adjoining mine; the partition was thin, and as he
paced the room the familiar sound of his footsteps
awakened recollections that had slumbered in my
mind from early youth. I listened night and day
to that sound, for it was joy to know that my enemy
was near me, though I could not reach him. Still
I had sworn he should not escape me, and what may
not man accomplish when his mind is resolved?
The day appointed for his execution arrived. The
sun arose in all its splendour before the eyes of the
prisoner; but those eyes were to be closed in
eternal
darkness before that sun should withdraw its
light from the earth. My brain was wild as I arose
from my feverish couch in expectation of the
approaching
hour. I had passed a sleepless night; for
when exhausted nature sank into momentary
oblivion
,
the image of my wife passed before me, and
then came the lacerated form of the murdered
Gambia
,
who shouted aloud, Awake, awake, he will
escape your vengeance!
At the dead of night I listened to the hurried
tread of the prisoner; I heard him sigh, and the
walls of my cell re-echoed with frantic laughter;
he paused for a moment, and then resumed his walk.
My prison door was unbarred in the morning, and I
was led forth by the jailer.
The crowd assembled early before the prison,
eagerly anticipating the execution as if it had been
a harmless amusement, instead of an awful
punishment
;
and many were in the crowd who begrudged
the prisoner the few remaining moments of life; not
that they execrated him for his offence, but that the
appalling spectacle was delayed.
A fearful shriek was now heard to proceed from
the prison, which for a moment completely silenced
the hum of the crowd. The cause was soon divined.
He is parting from his wife, murmured several,
their voices softened by the thought of so
melancholy
a parting. The information ran rapidly through
the crowd. All eyes were turned towards the prison
door, whence a second shriek was heard, more
heart-piercing
than the former, and the prisoner appeared
a moment afterwards, clad in white, and guarded.
His cheeks were pale and hollow with sickness, but
the fierce glance of his deep black eye was rather
heightened than diminished. His attenuated form
was erect, his step firm, and his countenance
immovable
,
as he descended from the prison and took
his seat in the cart which was in waiting to bear him
to the gallows. The clergyman, and the hangman,
masked in his impenetrable disguise, sat beside him.
He who was to terminate the affairs of this world,
and he who was to usher into the world to come,
were there.
The concourse moved slowly on, while hymns
were chanted for the salvation of the soul of the
sinner; but he did not join his voice in the holy
anthem. He was the same obdurate man to the last;
changed in appearance, it is true, but not by the
terrors of approaching death; not by a
consciousness
of hopeless anguish inflicted on the wife of
his bosom, but from a sense of degradation. He
was proud, overbearing, tyrannical, and was now
held up to the gaze of the slaves he had trampled
on; and he felt that they had reason to rejoice in his
downfall. His features were pale and haggard, but
even while he moved on there was a proud smile of
scorn about his thin lips, and a savage glare in his
eye, as it fell upon the dark train that followed him
to the gallows.
The clergyman besought him to meet his death in
a different spiritwith fear and trembling; with
meekness and contrition: but the proud man turned
from the exhortation with disdain. The hymn that
ascended from those who surrounded us, sounded
in his ears like a song of triumph from his enemies,
which was chanted only to fill the measure of his
shame. His looks expressed this sentiment, and
the clergyman was not ignorant of what was passing
in his mind.
Bend your obdurate heart, said the pious man;
11*
forgive your enemies, and pray to be forgiven as
you forgive. Meet your fate as He met his who
died that all mankind might live. Bethink you of
your manifold transgressions, and while there is
time left to you, blot out the deep stain from your
soul, with the purifying tear of repentance.
Leave me to my own thoughts; you trouble me,
said the prisoner, without turning his face towards
the other.
This is not the spirit in which a Christian should
appear before his God.
But such as he should maintain before his fellow
man, returned the other in a decided tone, but
without moving his head.
Remember you have an awful account to
render
Right, we all have; so adjust your own, and
leave mine, of which you can know nothing, to
myself.
I know but little, it is true, but that little makes
me tremble. The prisoner made no reply, for he
was apparently occupied in deep thought.
Think of Virginia, I exclaimed, who was
martyred in the very wantonness of your cruelty.
He started from his meditations, and shrunk as if
an adder had stung him. His eyes were turned upon
me, but my squalid habiliments defied their
penetration
,
and grief and madness had completely changed
the tones of my voice. He did not recognise me.
Think, continued the clergyman, of your
inhumanity
to the poor slave for doing an act which
God will recompense with life eternal; though in
the blindness of passion you thought it merited death
in this world. Think of the wife of your bosom,
whose heart is broken by your pride, cruelty, and
consequent abasement. Revert to the race you have
run from the commencement of your career, that
your obdurate heart may be awakened to conviction
of your awful state. You have passed through life,
as if life and death had been at your disposal. You
have trod the earth as if it had been the work of
thine own hand, without reflecting that thou art as
a worm compared to Him who made all things.
Reflect, repent, and die not as the fool dieth. Thy
life has been painful to the sight of man; let not
thy death be offensive in the eye of God. Still
the stern and pallid countenance of the convict
betrayed
no emotion.
Think, I cried, of the nephew you have
robbed
,
and persecuted to madness, with the unsparing
hatred of a fiend. Think of your promise to your
dying brother to protect and love.
My grief had imparted an unearthly sound to my
voice, and it seemed as if I partook in some degree
of the powers of ventriloquism. I beheld his whole
form shudder, and he gazed around to discover from
whom the voice proceeded. His search was
fruitless
.
He rallied his mental energies and maintained
an obdurate silence.
Having arrived beneath the gallows, the
clergyman
resumed his entreaties to awake the better
feelings
of the sinful man; earnest prayers were offered
for his sake by numbers who knelt around, and the
pure sea-breeze, as it passed over them, wafted the
melody of hymns to heaven. Still he stood erect
as a statue among them: as pale as marble, as
senseless
,
and as immovable. I should have wept as I
beheld him thus, had he not crushed my affections
and dried the very fountain of my tears; but I thought
of Virginia, of Gambia, and a curse from my lips
ascended with the prayers of those who had not
felt his tyranny. The thought strengthened me to
fulfil my purpose. I had sworn he should not escape
my vengeance, and the last moment we should be
together in this world was at hand.
The religious service ceased. There was a
death-like
stillness in the crowd. I was on the platform
with the criminal, and yet he knew me not, though
I frequently touched his person, and his eyes were
often fixed on me. Still he knew that it was one
who hated. The cord was secured over the gallows
the knot adjusted beneath his ear. My hand
adjusted
it! and in the act I breathed the name of
Virginia. Though senseless as a monumental image,
he became as nerveless as the new born babe. I
moved to his front in order to draw the cap over his
eyes. I paused for a moment to behold his agitation,
and then drew the mask from my own face. He
shrieked my name and staggered back. I shouted
Retribution!
and, laughing frantically, leaped from
the platform. His eyes were fixed on me. I thought
they implored my mercy; but I continued to laugh
like a maniac, and seizing an axe at hand, with one
blow knocked away the frail support of the platform:
he saw the motionI heard the crash, and the shriek
from the crowdthen all was darkness, and I fell
insensible on the ground.
At my trial I was acquitted on the plea of
insanity
.
When my uncle's papers were examined,
sufficient evidence was discovered to establish my
claim to the possessions left by my father. I was
now a man of affluence; but what is wealth to the
broken hearted? It cannot recall the deed of
yesterday
,
or bribe the grave to yield to life its tenant.
MADNESS.
Mad as the sea and wind, when both contend
Which is the mightier.
Hamlet
.
Huic ego vulgum
Errori similem cunctum insanire docebo.
Horace, Sat. III
.
The
light of reason has elevated man
immeasurably
above the rest of God's creatures, and when
enjoyed even to the extent allowable, it assumes the
aspect of a godlike attribute, and the mind, no longer
circumscribed by the narrow limits that imprison
the body, threads the universe. It delves the earth
to the centre, and the caverns of the ocean are
searched. The sun, the moon, and the stars are
traversed
,
and even the sacred vaults of heaven are
approached
by the mercurial spirit. The mind,
framed
to enjoy such research, bears within itself an
exhaustless
fountain of delight. It soars beyond this
world, and the realities of life cannot wound it.
Though reason elevates man above the rest of the
animal kingdom, yet, when deprived of it, he
becomes
more abject than the humblest of creatures.
There is nothing so powerfully calculated to shock
our natures as the scene exhibited in a receptacle of
maniacs. Death, the end of all things, is not to be
compared with it, for that is natural; but to witness
the annihilation of mind, while the body still retains
its functions, is a sight that cannot be reconciled to
our feelings. It is literally death in the midst of
life, and death of the better part.
Some years ago I entered a receptacle of this
description
,
to gratify my curiosity, but time has been
unable to efface the impression which it made upon
me, and the scene stands pictured in my memory as
one of the few, fearfully impressive, which occur in
the equable life of an ordinary man.
I entered the yard, common to such as were
harmless
in their aberrations. Each appeared to be
absorbed
with his own reflections, and the train of
thought was indicated by the movements of the body.
Here might be seen one whose steps were hurried,
and his gesticulation wild; and there another, whose
movements were regular and measured; his brows
knit, and his head bent to his bosom, over which his
arms were folded.
I moved through the crowd until my attention
was arrested by a gray haired man on his knees,
making figures in the sand. He was intent in
calculation
.
His visage was small, and fox-like. His
eyes were deep set and twinkling; his nose pointed
and thin; his chin projected, and his mouth receded.
Every line of his countenance denoted avarice. He
did not notice our approach until the keeper
accosted
him.
Well, Jamieson, what are you about?
Casting up the amount of my property, he
replied
,
without raising his head. A moment and I
have done.Ten and eight are eighteen, and two
are twenty. There it is as clear as day light.
Twenty
thousand, every copper of it. And not a sixpence
yields me less than twelve per cent. Ha! ha! ha!
I may laugh at the world now, I think.
And at your heirs, too, Jamieson, said the
keeper.
Hang them for ungrateful hounds, exclaimed
the miser, they would have clapped me in a
madhouse
for having dropped a dollar in the poor-box,
after listening to a charity sermon. They
pronounced
me mad, and unfit to take care of my wealth.
They wished to become my stewards; the devil
thank them. But the dogs had reason. A hard
round dollar in the charity-box, was a symptom to
be sure, but then look there, twenty thousand at
twelve per cent! Could they have done better as
the times go, mad as they pronounce me? He
smiled and chuckled in a satisfied tone at the idea
of his imaginary possessions, and as I left him I
involuntarily
exclaimed, Wherein does the
happiness
of this deluded wretch differ from that of the
miser who worships his hoard of gold in secret.
Their joys are equally imaginary, and he who dreams
that he is worth thousands, provided the dream be
never broken, is in fact as wealthy as he who is
possessed
of thousands and spends his life in dreaming
over his possessions. How many maniacs of this
description do we daily see, who are not only
permitted
to run at large, but who are pronounced to
be in the full possession of their mental faculties!
My attention was now attracted by a young man
reciting Homer in the original. The musical
numbers
flowed from his tongue with eloquence, his
countenance was animated and his gesticulation
impassioned
.
When he concluded the passage, he
exclaimed
,
Well, that is poetry, and will remain so,
let them say of my epic what they please.
Your epic? I exclaimed.
Yes; they pronounced me mad for having
written
a poem that the critics had neither taste to relish
nor sense to comprehend. If this is to be the fate
of all authors, who experience similar condemnation,
let them convert the whole world at once into a
bedlam
your
prison houses will be too small to hold us.
And who is there to draw the line between insanity
and reason. If my imagination be so vigorous as to
soar beyond the reach of those who cannot dissolve
the influence of this grovelling world, which draws
them back with magnetic power, must I needs be
mad!If their waxen wings fail them in their
attempt
to follow me through untravelled regions of
light and glory, and while I keep on with steady
wing and eagle eye, they, for their temerity, share
the fate of Icarusfor this may they pronounce me
mad! And yet it is so.But who is there to draw
the line! Sophocles, in his age, was accused of being
insane by his heartless sons; but when before his
judges he produced his last tragedy, and asked if a
madman could write such verses, he was
dismissed
with fresh honours, and his sons were punished as
madmen for making the accusation. Were I now to
write an dipus Colonus, such is the revolution
that taste in literature has undergone, that the critics
would pronounce it conclusive evidence of
incurable
insanity. The line between madness and
reason
changes with the age. I have lived a century
before my time, and posterity will enjoy the epic
that has consigned its author to bedlam. How
many authors do we see at large labouring under
similar delusion!
At a short distance from the poet was a painter,
busily engaged in his art. We approached him, and
the keeper enquired of him what he was about.
Drawing a map of the moon, was the reply.
And what do you mean by that palace upon which
you have bestowed so much care?
The residence of the man in the moon, to be
sure.
Is the drawing accurate?
Ay; even to the smoke that you see ascending
from the chimney. Behold, I have laid down, with
precision, all the rivers, oceans, mountains and
wilderness
;
and I will stake my reputation that the
picture is as faithful as many of the representations
of the globe we inhabit. Not being prepared to
dispute the point with the maniac, I passed on and
he resumed his labour.
He worked with intense earnestness, but in the
world we daily see hundreds as busily employed,
and to as little purpose.
The next we came to was an astronomer, looking
through a telescope. What, Lawson, will you
never have done with your astronomical researches?
said the keeper to him.
Never, until death puts a period to them. Had
I been created at the time that the wondrous fabric
was first put in motion; when each sphere rung forth
its first faint note as it slowly moved on its axle,
and had I studied daily until the present hour, still
the knowledge I might have acquired, compared with
that beyond the grasp of the human mind, would
have been as the acorn compared with the towering
oak of the forest.
And what has been the result of your
researches
?
Inexplicable confusion. I perceive that space
is illimitable, and
that
thought alone, is beyond the
utmost stretch of the human mind to reconcile with
things that are bounded and circumscribed. There
is nothing in nature that comes in comparison with
this phenomenon. I have thought of it until my
brain became as bewildered as that of the tenant of
an hospital. The keeper smiled at the
comparison
,
and the maniac proceededI have been told
that the planets maintain their position by gravity
and attraction; that the atmosphere becomes lighter
and more rarified as you recede from earth, and that,
of consequence, the globes poised in this pure
element
must be of lighter consistency than that we
inhabit. One visionary tells me that such an orb is
composed of matter as light as water, another orb
of weightier consistency, and that the animal
kingdom
every where is adapted to the planet on which
it is created. So that where water prevails the
tritons
and the mermaids, which in this sphere exist
only in the poet's brain, have their functions of
vitality. Other and the most remote of the heavenly
bodies are nothing more than dense atmosphere, and
these are inhabited by birds; that space is filled by
fluctuating nebul, which are drawn together by
attraction, and thus the work of creation is
incessantly
going on, and will continue until time shall
VOL. I.12
be no more. That the comets are orbs of
bituminous
matter, which, becoming ignited, burn on for
ages, until extinguished for want of fuel, and, as
their gravity and attraction undergo constant change,
their course is erratic and uncontrolled by the
surrounding
atmosphere. I have read until I became
like a ship in the midst of the ocean, without
compass
or polar star to guide it, and then the
philosophers
pronounced me mad and expelled me from
their fraternity. If they were to deal thus with all
mad philosophers, their number would soon be
reduced
to a chosen few.
I now directed my steps towards a maniac, who,
from an elevation, was addressing about a dozen
auditors, who appeared to listen to him with
attention
.
His head was gray and bare; his countenance
animated, his gesticulation wild, and he spoke with
a degree of vehemence that imparted a
corresponding
excitement to the minds of his auditors.
The world is mad; I look abroad, and whatever
my eye falls upon, goes to establish the truth of my
position. Behold yon hoary headed father hoarding
his wealth for his thankless child; depriving himself
of proper sustenance to add another mite to the
mountain that he has already accumulated. A
little
longer and we shall see tears of joy shed upon
the old man's grave; the mountain of wealth levelled
with the valley; the stream that was formed drop
by drop rush out in torrents. And yet the world
pronounces the dotard full of wisdom and prudence.
The world is mad! the world is mad! wildly
shouted the crowd around him. The preacher
continued
.
Behold that pallid and emaciated being
by the midnight lamp. The sun rises, sets, and rises
again, and still we find him in the same position,
consuming his life, even as the lamp is consumed
that stands beside him. The main object of life is
neglected, and the joys that the world presents are
spurned as things unworthy of notice. His whole
soul is absorbed with one idea, but one wishthat
succeeding ages may know that he existed, and to
accomplish this, he renders that existence a burthen,
heavier than that the fabled Atlas has to bear. The
world will tell us he is a model of human wisdom;
but if this be wisdom, why build walls to confine
lunatics? Who is there so frantic among us as to
sacrifice every enjoyment of life, with the vain hope
of attaining that, which, when attained, he will be
insensible to, and incapable of enjoying! The world
is mad, since wisdom itself is madness.
The world is mad! the world is mad! shouted
forth his auditors, and the exclamation was re-echoed
from different parts of the yard.
Behold that young mother, watching by the
cradle that contains her infant child. It is
midnight
,
and not a soul is near her. She bends over
him, gazes on his dimpled cheeks, and kisses his
ruby lips, while tears of anguish flow from her eyes,
languid for want of sleep. It is midnight, and her
head has not yet reposed upon her pillow. She has
trimmed the lamp to guide the stray one to his home,
but it is useless, for the morning sun will rise before
he leaves the scene of his heartless debauchery. And
yet she clings with the fervency of pure affection to
him who has deserted her and her little babe, who
has trodden on her heart, and leaves her to want,
suffering, and shame. It is written, `If thine eye
offend thee, pluck it out,' and though he is dearer
to her than her eyes, why tamper with a diseased
member, that is incurable, and, if not lopped off,
must bring her to an untimely grave. The scene is
changed.Behold her now. She is still alone in
her chamber. Her face is bent down to her lap and
buried in her hands. She is still weeping. What
is it that lies stretched on the bed beside her? It is
the bud of beauty that lately she sprinkled with her
tears, now as pale as the lily of the valley, and as
senseless as the clod of the valley too. Weep not,
thou stricken one, for no refreshing shower will call
the blossom forth again. It is dead, and she mourns
her loss in the bitterness of soulbut wherefore
should she weep? The child has gone to bliss; it
would have been reared in misery and shame; it has
died unspotted and in innocence, and yet she mourns
that it was not reserved for a life of pollution and a
death of guilt. She is mad, for rather should her
lips pour forth the song of rejoicing that the
innocent
has been removed, before it entered upon the
guilty path of its father, or tasted of the bitter cup
that its mother had quaffed to the very dregs. But
say that fortune had strewed its path with flowers,
its course had been as unruffled as the sunny stream,
that seeks the waste of waters, and its death, the
death of the righteous. What then? Is there any
enjoyment in life to compensate for the misery even
the most prosperous are doomed to endure; any
knowledge that will repay for a knowledge of the
human race!Blessed are ye who die in ignorance
of your fellow mortals, since the good that flows
from the purer sources of the human heart is but as
a drop, compared with the streams poured forth by
the corrupted fountains; and ye who are saved from
this knowledge are as the husbandman who enjoys
the harvest without having toiled in the sun. And
yet they who have escaped from a scene of
selfishness
and ingratitude, who are removed from a state
of persecution and suffering, whose spirits return to
His presence as pure and unspotted as when he
formed them, are mourned as though they had lost
instead of having gained a world. The world is
mad! the world is mad! The preacher ceased, and
his auditors shouted forth his last words. They
were re-echoed from distant parts of the yard; and
even in the cells, amid the clanking of chains, might
be heard the exclamation, The world is mad! the
world is mad! I hurried away, glad to escape
from the wild scene to the bustle of society; a change
from one scene of madness to another. I have since
often reflected on the words of the maniac, and am
more than half inclined to believe that I heard the
plain truth spoken within the walls of bedlam.
THE
SEA VOYAGE.
Messmates hear a brother sailor
Sing the dangers of the sea.
Early
in the autumn of 1820, I sailed from the
port of Philadelphia for Havre, in a French
merchantman
,
commanded by a little native of
Gascony
,
who had studied philosophy, not in the calm
and shady groves of the academy, but in a world of
turmoil and trouble. The ancients may boast of
the patience and fortitude of Socrates, in the hour
of death, and prate about the abstinence of Diogenes
in his tub; but to my mind, he who patiently lives
on through scenes of trial and suffering, exhibits
more philosophy by half than he who laughs at the
terrors of death, or flies from the world, prostrates
the dignity of his nature, and confines his ambition
within the narrow compass of a tub. The little
Gascon called himself a philosopher, and boasted of
having read the ethics of Seneca for the fiftieth time;
but that philosophy which is acquired by having the
sensibilities blunted with continued buffetting, does
not maintain such absolute dominion over the mind,
but that it may be shaken from its purpose. So it
was with the little captain, who would storm like a
Hector at the sailors, and expatiate on the blessings
of forbearance in the same breath.
12*
Among the passengers there were two particularly
calculated to produce an impression on the mind of
the spectator. The one was a young man apparently
about twenty-five years of age, tall of stature and
handsomely formed. His countenance was pale,
impressive, and full of manly vigour; his forehead
high and polished; but his deep-set hazel eyes were
overshaded by bushy brows, which gave a forbidding
expression to his countenance. He kept aloof from
the passengers. The other was a female about the
same age, lovely in her appearance, and fascinating
in her manners. They were accompanied by a
little girl, scarcely five years old, whose striking
resemblance to the lady was sufficient to satisfy the
most careless observer that they were parent and
child.
On board a ship our social feelings are naturally
called into action, and even the most distant and
reserved will at times relax from their austerity; for
when thus shut out from the world, it is that we feel
how essential we are to the happiness of each other.
But the deep melancholy that hung upon the brow
of Campbell, which was the name of the young man
just alluded to, protected him from intrusion on his
privacy: he seldom spoke to any one but his wife; to
his child his lips were never opened.
By the time we had been a week at sea, the
business
of each passenger was known to the others; and
for want of more interesting subjects of
conversation
the circumstances of our several lives were
related
from our childhood to the hour of speaking.
Campbell not only refused to take part in our
conversation
,
but seldom attended to what was going
forward. He would frequently quit his meals
abruptly
,
and pace the deck in evident agitation, which
he in vain laboured to conceal. Mrs. Campbell, like
a faithful mirror, invariably reflected the gloom of
her husband's countenance; still she conversed freely
and with animation; and occasionally a melancholy
smile would play around her lips, which was as
evanescent as the electric fluid that for a moment
gleams through the clouds which obscure the face
of the heavens, passes away, and leaves all dark
again.
The mysterious conduct of Campbell gave rise
to numberless conjectures, none of which, however,
accounted for it satisfactorily. My curiosity was
wrought up to the highest pitch, and I applied to
the little Gascon, who boasted much of his
knowledge
of mankind, for some information on the
subject.
He is melancholique, said the captain, at the
same time placing the fore-finger of his right hand
with much precision alongside of his thin
proboscis
:He
is melancholique.
That is evident, captain, but what does his
melancholy
arise from?
Ah, ha! dat is de question for one philosophe
to resolve.
Then, sir, it is worthy of your investigation, I
replied.
I have investigate, monsieur, and parbleu, I have
dive at de bottom. He goes to France, pour sa
sante, mais, he is consumptif, and he may go au
diable to the bottom, before he get to France. He is
no philosophe, and this makes him melancholique.
Very satisfactorily and rationally accounted for,
I exclaimed.
Ah! ha! monsieur, I have study the operation
of de human mind.
He concluded with an emphatic rap on the top
of a huge snuff box, ornamented with a picture of
Napoleon, and, shrugging his narrow shoulders,
strutted away with an air which he designed should
add not a little to the dignity of his appearance.
Campbell was in the constant habit of leaving his
berth early and retiring to it late. Every morning
he was seen leaning on the side of the vessel, gazing
on the sun bursting from his watery bed, and in the
evening he was in the same position, with his wife
beside him, contemplating the glorious orb sinking
beneath the surface of the deep. I frequently
watched
him while at his evening meditations, until his
cheeks were bedewed with tears, and on stating the
fact to the captain, he called it womanish weakness,
and ascribed it to his not being a philosopher. A
single page of Boetheus, he said, would prove a
radical
cure in the present case.
Campbell had a favourite dog that never left the
side of his master, for the faithful animal appeared
to be conscious of the dejected state of his mind,
and of the necessity of affection to soothe his
feelings
.
We had been about two weeks at sea, and
yet there was no visible change in the appearance or
health of the invalid. He still continued his
meditations
night and morning, by the vessel's side.
One moonlight night, after all the passengers had
retired to their berths, he still remained in his usual
place, with his dog lying at his feet. The porpoise
showed his black back above the waves, in the
moonbeams
,
and the voracious shark swiftly followed in
the wake of the ship. Mrs. Campbell, with her
child, approached the spot where he stood, wrapped
in admiration of the beauty of the scene. There
was not a cloud to obscure the heavens, and the sea
was but slightly ruffled by the breeze which impelled
the vessel rapidly onward. She stood beside him,
resting on his arm, and looking anxiously on his
countenance, which was raised upward, and was
glowing with unusual animation.
Oh! God! he ejaculated, who can contemplate
such a night as this, and all the wondrous works that
now present themselves, and deny thy existence
and thy omnipotence! A scene like this, Louisa,
must make the innocent heart overflow with
boundless
love and gratitude for his bounty to mankind.
And the guilty! she involuntarily murmured.
To shrink with horror from its own
unworthiness
!
She turned pale and trembled as he fixed his eyes
upon her. They remained silent, for it did not
require
the motion of lips or tongue to communicate
to each other what was at that moment passing in
their minds. He fervently pressed her to his bosom,
and his swelling heart told far more than his voice
could utter. She smiled upon him through her
tears, and again turned to expatiate on the beauties
of creation.
The vessel glided rapidly forward, and her track
was marked by the waves, that seemed to wanton in
the moonlight. Suddenly the ship rolled, and the
favourite dog that had been standing at his master's
feet, fell overboard. Campbell's first impulse was
to leap into the ocean to save him. His wife caught
him by the arm time enough to prevent the desperate
leap. He stood gazing in agony upon the faithful
animal, who, struggling in the water, made a feeble
attempt to swim after the ship. Distress was
pictured
in the countenance of the dog, as the vessel
rapidly receded from him. His struggle was but
short, for while yet in sight of those upon deck, a
fearful yell denoted his fate. The shark that had
followed the vessel for hours in pursuit of prey,
received him in his ravenous jaws; disappeared
for a few moments, and then was seen again
following
in the track of the ship. Campbell
remained
silent for some time, and his countenance
denoted
the deepest distress. At length he broke
silence, and turning to his wife said, with a
melancholy
smile:
Louisa, do not smile at my superstition, but I
feel as if my voyage in this life will terminate before
my voyage across the Atlantic.
She endeavoured to dispel the melancholy idea
that had taken possession of his mind.
You may call it, he said, weakness, defect in
education, vulgar prejudice, what you will; but
surely life and death are not so widely separated,
but that there may be some cord in this complicated
system which shrinks instinctively at the approach
of dissolution, and gives warning that the enemy, or
as I should term it, the friend, is at hand. Is the
mind so slavishly bound to, and dependent on, this
corporeal frame, that
it
, which is to live to eternity,
can receive no intelligence, no light, but through
the senses and organs of that body which will perish
in a day, and be forgotten in its kindred dust? He
paused, and taking her hand, proceeded: If the
mind be not thus absolutely dependant on the
outward
senses for intelligence, I now foretell a speedy
close to my feverish existence.
She expostulated against the weakness of
permitting
the loss of a favourite dog thus deeply to
affect his mind.
He was but a dog, 'tis true; but I, Louisa, could
`better have spared a better friend'if I possess
such. He was the means of awaking my mind from
its present gloomy state, to scenes of happier days.
He has been my constant companion for ten years.
We have climbed the mountain height together, where
the air was pure and the heart beat freely,
unoppressed
by the contaminated atmosphere that
encircles
the haunts of man. Whole days we have
wandered
over the wild mountains, when the circling
flight of the eagle, as he ascended to a purer region,
yielded inexpressible delight to my young heart.
When the cawing of the raven, perched and
rocking
on the topmost branch of some blighted pine
hanging over the precipice, was a sight to arrest
attention;when I shouted with joyous heart to
fright him from his secure seat, and he in very
mockery mingled his
cawings
with the echo
returned
by the surrounding hills. The sight of my poor
dog served to recall those days of my boyhood and
innocence; then have I not, indeed, bitter cause to
deplore his loss?
As the night was far advanced they retired to
rest, but the haggard and woe-worn features of
Campbell, the following morning, proved that rest
had been a stranger to his pillow. The death of his
dog was severely felt by him, and his mind was
strongly imbued with the belief that his own death
was near at hand. The superstitions which in his
youth gave an air of romance to life, and were
cherished
on that account until they became a part of
his nature, still maintained their dominion over his
mind undiminished, and nothing could persuade him
from the belief, that he had received a natural, or
supernatural indication that it was time for him to
set his house in order. The mystical cord has
been touched, he said, there is no mistaking the
note; there is no mistaking my feelings. The day
passed, and I remarked that his countenance
appeared
more serene than usual.
The evening was calm and the golden beams of
the setting sun were dancing upon the green bosom
of the heaving ocean. Campbell and his wife were
upon deck as usual, enjoying the scene, and it
seemed
as if the delight he experienced at that time
compensated
for the load of misery he had entailed upon
himself. His eyes glanced rapidly from the heavens
to the sea, and from the sea to the heavens, and as
the tints in the sky and upon the water varied, as
the sun slowly descended, he pointed out the change
and richness of colouring to his wife, who leaned on
his arm and seemed to find more charms in his
animated
countenance, than in the beauties of the
scene. They were happier on that evening than
they had been at any time since we left the capes
of the Delaware; happier than at any moment
afterwards
.
About sunset the helmsman described a vessel in
distress about ten miles distant. As we approached,
it proved to be a wreck in a most melancholy
condition
.
Several dead bodies were seen on the deck,
and lashed to the windlass was an emaciated being,
that scarcely had sufficient strength left to prove
that life was still remaining, in the midst of death
and desolation. We hove to, and our long boat was
hastily lowered into the sea and manned with sturdy
oarsmen. I went on board accompanied by the
captain, and we rowed towards the wreck. It
presented
such a spectacle of horror, that even the
little Gascon, with all his philosophy, shrugged his
shoulders and shuddered as he beheld it. The deck
was strewed with the fragments of human bodies,
some bearing evident marks of having been
mutilated
to supply food for the survivors. In the
forecastle
lay two bodies; that of a female, and of a
young man. They were literally locked in death's
cold embrace, for their arms were entwined around
each other, and being stiffened in death, it was
impossible
to separate them. This proved they had
not been many hours dead. The only living being
on board was the emaciated wretch bound to the
windlass. He was hardly conscious that we had
come to his rescue. He was released and placed
gently in the boat, but such was his melancholy
condition
,
that the exertion had well nigh snapped the
feeble thread of expiring nature. After examining
the wreck, and finding nothing of value, we returned
to our ship.
As we approached the ship, Campbell and his wife
were still in the same position as when we put off
for the wreck; gazing with intense interest on the
almost lifeless being that lay in the boat, supported
by the captain and myself. We were hoisted on
board and the stranger was removed and placed on
a settee in the forecastle. The passengers and crew
eagerly came forward to behold the shipwrecked
man, and among the rest Campbell and his wife.
They rivetted their eyes upon his emaciated
countenance
;
their gaze was intense, and it appeared as
if the haggard being before them awakened bitter
recollections, for their cheeks changed colour, and
they turned towards each other a look pregnant with
meaning, mingled with agony; and yet the poor
wretch who appeared to be on the very verge of life,
was so emaciated, and so altered by what he had
endured
,
that scarcely the outline of his former self
could have been remaining. He cast his feeble
glance upon the crowd around him; at length his
eyes rested on the receding forms of Campbell and
his wife, and beamed with a ray of recognitionshe
remained immovable, fascinated to the spot by his
gaze. The sailor placed his scrawny hand upon his
forehead, as if to protect his feeble eyeballs from the
glare of light: but he still gazed upon her, and after
remaining a few moments in this position, a ghastly
smile separated his thin lips.The expression was
horrible.She shrieked, fainted, and was carried to
the cabin. None present could divine the real cause
of her sudden illness. The little Frenchman
attributed
it solely to the want of philosophy, which in
his opinion was the universal cause of evil: others
supposed that her feelings were overcome by
beholding
a fellow mortal in so deplorable a condition: but
I had seen enough to satisfy me that this was not
the first time the stranger and the mysterious beings
had met.
The shipwrecked man was supported to a berth,
medical assistance applied to, and every necessary,
that his helpless situation required to promote his
speedy recovery, was administered.
The melancholy and reserve of Campbell
increased
from the hour the stranger was rescued from the
wreck. He appeared to shrink from the gaze of the
meanest on board, and his visits upon deck became
less frequent, seldom making his appearance there
till after nightfall, when there was no one to disturb
his meditations, or dive into the secret workings of
his heart. Even the presence of his wife, who had
heretofore possessed the power to soothe his most
turbulent
feelings, now served only to increase his
agony. His child was carefully kept from his sight;
the presence of the little innocent was
insupportable
.
Every practicable attention was bestowed on the
shipwrecked man, who gradually recovered strength,
and in a few days was pronounced out of danger, by
the physician, though his emaciated and woe-worn
appearance rather indicated a tenant of the grave,
than a being of this world. The captain was
attentive
in his visits to the hammock of the sick man,
and constantly administered with the medicinals of
the physician, a page from his favourite Boetheus or
Seneca. The fact was, the captain, though he
boasted
of being invulnerable to the sharpest shaft of
fortune
,
VOL. I.13
had not philosophy sufficient to protect him
from feeling acutely for the sufferings of others.
Though ever ready to bear himself all the evils
that fate could heap upon him, he felt concerned if
but a slight breeze passed over others, whose minds
he imagined were not as strongly fortified by
philosophy
as his own. He learnt from the sick sailor,
that he was the captain of a merchantman which had
sailed from Gibraltar for New-York, about a month
before; that when ten days out, in a rough sea, the
vessel was met by a heavy squall and capsized.
Several of the passengers were washed overboard
and perished, and when the ship righted, there was
so much water in the hold and cabin, that the
provisions
could not be reached without much difficulty,
and the bread and water were rendered unfit for
use. Starvation threatened them; the survivors were
accordingly placed on allowance from the first. As
they had lost their rudder in the gale, and the spars
and rigging had been carried overboard, they were
tossed about at the mercy of the winds and waves.
He had beheld his crew and passengers die, amid
the horrors of starvation, one by one, and the last
who survived, had been driven in the agony of
hunger
,
to appease the cries of nature, with the dead
bodies of their fellow creatures. All this he beheld,
and still clung to his wretched life with as much
eagerness as if surrounded by all its pleasures and
allurements.At length he was the sole survivor,
and his lamp of life was but faintly flickering in the
socket; the deck of the vessel was constantly
washed
by the waves, and as a protection against being
swept overboard, he secured himself to the windlass,
there patiently to await the dispensation of
Him
who
giveth and taketh away. He had been in this
situation
two days when we providentially rescued him
from impending destruction.
Mrs. Campbell was now seldom seen. The ray
of animation that occasionally dispelled the gloom
from her lovely countenance had vanished, and the
moments of cheerfulness that she at times formerly
enjoyed, had now entirely deserted her. She was
confined almost entirely to her cabin, and sickness
was assigned as the cause.
We had experienced for several days in
succession
nearly a dead calm. Campbell had heretofore
admired and enjoyed this state of the elements, for
what is better calculated to raise the contemplative
mind from earthly matters than to behold in an
autumn
evening a cloudless sky reflected on the glassy
surface of the slumbering ocean? But now the dead
calm was torture to his restless spirit. He prayed
for motion, and his impatience was betrayed in every
action. His eyes were wild and wandering, and his
movements abrupt and hurried. He inquired of the
oldest seamen from which quarter of the compass
might be expected the approach of the next tempest,
and to that quarter were his eyes constantly
directed
,
where every ascending cloud appeared to bring
a fresh hope to his desolate heart.
At length the long looked for storm arose in all
its grandeur. Volumes of dense clouds, regularly
and gradually ascended like formidable armies
preparing
for battle. The winds that had been pent up,
now burst forth, and the roaring waters heaved with
a convulsive motion. The spell was broke that had
harmonized creation, and discord now prevailed.
The appearance of Campbell became visibly
changed
.
His countenance was animated; there was a
smile of terrible, but undefined meaning upon his
lips; his eyes glanced wildly from the sea to the
heavens, and he traversed the deck with a rapidity
of step that excited the wonder of all who beheld
him. Our vessel was soon prepared to encounter
the worst, but as the wind blew steadily from one
quarter, and the sea was not running dangerously
high, we felt no apprehension for our safety.The
sky was completely overcast, and the rain
descended
in torrents. Campbell still remained upon deck
after all the passengers and crew, excepting those
upon watch, had retired to rest. No persuasion
could induce him to go below; and to the entreaties
of his wife and the captain, he replied: It is the
only joyful hour I have experienced since I came on
board; I beseech you not to interrupt it.
They left him and he seated himself in the most
retired part of the ship, to brood upon his feelings.
I had retired to my berth, but I found it
impossible
to close my eyes, for the raging waters made
such an awful coil as they dashed against the sides
of the ship, and gave rise to reflections, that would
have kept me awake even had my mind been
fortified
with the philosophy of the little Captain. After
tossing in my bed for about two hours, until the
fever of my mind was communicated to my body, I
imagined I heard a piercing shriek proceeding from
the deck. It was immediately followed by a groan.
I leaped from my bed and rushed to the gangway.
I met the captain at the foot of the stairs, who had
been awakened by the same noise. On seeing me
he exclaimed: Mon Dieu! le melancholique
gentlehomme
!
and ascended as rapidly as his
diminutive
legs could carry him. I followed; and we
hurried
towards the place where we had left Campbell
the preceding evening.
Lights were speedily brought, and lying on the
deck we beheld Campbell weltering in his blood. I
raised himthe wound was in his bosom, and
bleeding
profusely. Good God! I exclaimed, who
has done this?
The Tempest Fiend, he answered. We had
a long and fearful struggle; but, thank God, it is
over. I proved unequal to the combat, and he has
marked me for the caverns of the deep. He
laughed
hysterically, and big drops of perspiration burst
from his pale forehead. I called for assistance to
carry him below.
No, no, he cried, let me die here. I shall be
called for before the morrow's sun rises, for the
spirits of the water are preparing my abode in their
coral caves. Let me rest here until they come for
me.
The captain demanded of the sailors who were
on watch an explanation of this mysterious and
melancholy
occurrence. They stated, that during the
intervals of the storm they had heard voices, but
conceived them to be nothing more than the ravings
of Campbell. One man, however, protested that
immediately after the shriek, a vivid flash of
lightning
afforded him a momentary and indistinct view
of a figure gliding down the gangway of the
forecastle
.
Suspicion immediately fell on the
shipwrecked
stranger, for adversity is too frequently
considered by the prosperous superior to no action,
however atrocious. The physician vouched for the
innocence of his patient, declaring it physically
impossible
that he could stir from his hammock. He
pronounced him in a fair way to recover, but as yet
incapable of moving. And then what motive,
said he, could possibly exist in the bosom of a man,
himself apparently on the verge of eternity,
sufficient
to excite exhausted nature, to the performance
of the act of a fiend?
Campbell was carried below, and after his wound
was staunched, was left alone with his wife, the
presence
of any other person being painful to him. We
then entered the place where the sick sailor lay, and
on beholding his enfeebled condition, readily
admitted
that we did him injustice by the suspicion we
had entertained. But as we were about to leave
him, I imagined I espied a speck of blood on the
covering of the bed. One of his hands hung over
the side of the hammock; the light fell upon it, and
betrayed that it also was stained with blood.
Conviction
flashed on the minds of all present, and I
hastily exclaimed, behold the murderer! He
shrunk not at the charge, but a smile of derision
illumined his ghastly countenance. He kept his
keen eye fixed upon us; it was lighted up with a
fiendish glare, and added an expression to his
lengthened
and emaciated visage, which was painful to
behold, and yet the spectator had scarcely power
to turn from it. He faintly said, with a scornful
laugh, I a murderer!
13*
Impossible! exclaimed the physician; the poor
wretch is incapable of leaving his hammock, much
less to contend with a man in the vigour of life.
I drew the cover from his bed; it was stained in
many places. Our suspicions were strengthened,
and yet the sick man betrayed no signs of guilt or
fear, but silently pointing to his left arm, explained
the mystery. His physician had bled him the day
preceding, to allay a raging fever: the bandage had
been removed, and the orifice was bleeding afresh.
I shrunk abashed at the preposterous charge I had
made, and, after endeavouring to appease his injured
feelings, withdrew and left him to the care of the
physician. His eyes followed me, and I felt relieved
when I had escaped from their glare.
I retired to my berth, and endeavoured to sleep,
but my mind had become so feverish by the
dreadful
occurrences of the night, that I tossed about for
several hours in a painful state of restlessness. At
length I fell into a slumber, but it was a slumber
more dreadful than my waking contemplations; for
the ghastly face of the seaman was seen wherever I
turned my eyes. It assumed various expressions,
and was blended in my imagination with the figure
of the murdered Campbell, producing a succession
of scenes and shapes that would have driven the
waking imagination to frenzy. I arose early and
hastened on deck, happy to escape to a scene of life
and bustle, from the solitary horrors of the night.
The storm still continued, and the appearances
indicated
that it would do so for some days.
Mrs. Campbell watched by the bedside of her
husband during the night, in a state of agony that
can be more readily conceived than described; for
the surgeon, on examining the wound, had
pronounced
a speedy death inevitable. When the
earthly ties which bind the pure to the innocent are
violently severed, the pang sustained by the
survivor
is too frequently almost insupportable,
although
the bright promise of meeting hereafter may
cast a ray of comfort around the heart of the mourner;
what then must the guilty feel, who are bound by
ties that cannot exist in heaven, and which, when
broken here, leave the torn heart without a hope
remaining
!
The mournful visage of Mrs. Campbell,
as she clasped the hand of the dying man, was
painful
to behold, for even the most careless observer
could discover utter hopelessness written there.
The surgeon, on interrogating Campbell
respecting
the manner in which the wound was inflicted,
was led to believe that the unhappy and mysterious
man had fallen the victim of his own hand, and the
deep rooted melancholy that had obtained
possession
of his mind and actions, rendered it highly
probable
that this supposition was correct. When first
carried below, after his wound had been staunched,
he turned to his wife and said in a tone scarcely
audible, Behold my prediction verified; you
treated
lightly my superstitious feelings; but I had a
prescience that I should never tread on earth again.
The violence of the storm every hour increased,
and towards noon all hands were aloft, busily
engaged
among the rigging, preparing to encounter a
tempest that threatened our destruction. In the
midst of the bustle the captain was summoned
below
,
as it was said Campbell was dead, and his wife
was dying. On entering the cabin Mrs. Campbell
was discovered lying on the bed in a swoon, beside
the lifeless body of her husband. The melancholy
expression of Campbell's countenance still remained
fixed in death; but there was a serenity about it
which spoke more of hope than despair, though
every line plainly indicated deep rooted
wretchedness
.
Mrs. Campbell was gently removed from the
body around which she clung in the agony of grief.
It was a scene calculated to awaken the
sympathies
of all present, and even the philosophical
Frenchman
,
`though all unused to the melting mood,'
opened
the sluices of his heart, and his time-beaten cheek
was bedewed with a tear, though for years it had
been moistened alone by the sea or the tempest. He
caught my eye, and understood what was passing in
my mind; he wiped his tears away, and in vain
endeavoured
to assume the philosopher again. As we
turned from the disconsolate woman, the captain
muttered to himself,
oui, oui, je suis philosophe,
mais, je suis homme
. I replied, that being a
man, it was impossible that philosophy should
deaden
the feelings to a scene of that description. I
can bear, said he, like Seneca or Diogenes,
whatever
burden may be cast on my own shoulders, but
not the afflictions that are visited on the heads of
others. I grasped his hand; he understood the
pressure, and returned it.
The storm continued with unabated fury, and as
night approached, it was deemed expedient to
consign
the remains of Campbell to a watery grave.
Preparations were accordingly made, and the body
was literally torn from the agonizing embrace of the
disconsolate wife, and wrapped in sailcloth to receive
the last human rites. It was now night when the
corpse was placed upon deck. The captain, the
passengers and such of the crew as were not engaged,
stood around it. Becoming sorrow was depicted in
every countenance. Torches were brought and I
read a brief service before consigning the body to
the waves. Having performed this duty, Mrs.
Campbell
was gently raised from the corpse, over which
she had knelt during the service, and two sailors
taking hold of it by the head and feet, committed it
to the sea. The heart broken widow swooned. The
solemn plunge was distinctly heard, and immediately
followed by a fiend-like laugh. On turning to
discover
whence this ill-timed merriment proceeded, we
beheld amongst the crowd, the ghastly visage of the
shipwrecked man. The clothing from his bed was
wrapped around him, and his features were horribly
distorted. He still laughed hysterically, and as the
light of the torches rested on the dark surface of an
ascending billow, and disclosed where the unhappy
Campbell floated in his winding sheet, the sailor
pointed at it and shouted with laughter. We were
all struck with amazement; but on securing him we
discovered that he had become a maniac. The cause
remained a mystery, but the physician ascribed it to
the agitation his mind must have undergone at being
innocently charged with murder, and to having
exposed
himself to the night breeze, whilst under the
influence of burning fever. He considered the
explanation
both learned and natural, and as no one on
board was profound or bold enough to contradict a
man whose business it was to deal out life and death
at pleasure, his opinion was taken, as we usually
take physic, without examination, and consequently
received full as much credit as it deserved.
Day after day passed on, and still the contending
elements threatened us with destruction. Our ship
had become materially crippled by the violence and
obstinacy of the storm; alarm began to be felt by
all on board, and even the philosophical captain at
length betrayed some apprehensions for our safety.
The sails and rigging were torn away piece by piece;
the masts were splintered, and finally there was little
left but the hulk of the beautiful ship which had a
few days before sailed so proudly over the waves.
To add to our distress, on trying the pumps we
found that there were four feet water in the hold.
The alarm of all on board increased, and I could
perceive by the lengthened physiognomy of the
captain
that he had never stood more in need of his
philosophy than at that moment. He however still
stormed at the sailors to urge them to exertion, and
calmly quoted Seneca to satisfy himself of the vanity
of life.
The sailors laboured night and day at the pumps
to keep us afloat. We had been driven in this
manner
,
at the mercy of the waves for about a week,
every day the leak increasing, but as the wind was
favourable, and we constantly sailed in nearly the
same direction, we still hoped to reach some haven
in safety. On the tenth day when even the most
sanguine began to despair, our drooping spirits were
revived by the sight of land. The sea was running
high and we rapidly approached the coast, but our
feelings of joy at the prospect of being rescued from
a watery grave, were now changed to those of
terror
,
for the helmsman had lost all control over the
ship, and there were breakers ahead, upon which she
must inevitably strike and go to pieces. The
captain
foresaw the danger and ordered the long boat to
be got in readiness. He then awaited patiently the
moment that should decide our fate. The interval
was truly awful, and as I stood gazing on the coast
now so near us, I felt that death in the midst of the
dreary waste of waters would not have been so
terrible
as in the sight of the haunts of men and a place
of safety. All were assembled on deck: we drew
near to the spot where the furious waves were
lashed
into foam: every eye was fixed upon it, and each
held his breath in dreadful suspense, as the wreck
was borne aloft by the irresistible surf prepared to
dash it upon the pointed rocks indistinctly seen in
the chasm beneath. The vessel struck, which was
denoted by a shriek of terror. The long boat was
hastily lowered, and we got on board as speedily as
practicable. The little captain even in this
extremity
displayed the influence of the precepts of
Seneca and Boetheus on his mind; he was the last
to leave the ship, though the fury of the waves
threatened every moment to dash her to pieces.
The boat pushed off from the wreck; it was well
manned, and in a few minutes we were beyond the
danger of the breakers. Our eyes were still turned
towards the ship which was labouring to pass the
shelving rock, when suddenly two figures appeared
on board. Our hearts sunk within us, and each
anxiously looked around to see if his friends were
with us. A voice near me, scarcely articulate with
grief, sobbed, O! my mother, my dear mother!
I turned and beheld Mrs. Campbell's child in the
arms of the boatswain. Those left behind proved
to be the maniac and the unhappy female, Mrs.
Campbell. The captain ordered the boats to put
back, and we endeavoured to approach the wreck,
but in vain. The safety of those in the boats obliged
up to desist, and with heavy hearts we turned round
the prow towards the shore. The child continued
to cry, My mother, my dear mother! Oh! take me
back to my mother, while the rough boatswain, as
he endeavoured to soothe her, mingled his tears with
hers.
The figures on the wreck appeared unconcerned
at their approaching fate. Mrs. Campbell was seen
kneeling at the feet of the maniac, who stood in the
attitude of devotion. He placed his hand on her
head, and raised his eyes as if asking forgiveness
for her sins. He bent forward, and touched her
forehead with his lips. She arose and fell upon his
bosom. He gave her one agonized embrace; her
slender form lay upon his left arm, and his right
was raised towards heaven. The ship was thrown
violently on the breakers, went to pieces, and the
objects of our solicitude disappeared amid the waves.
We reached the shore in safety, and soon learnt
that we were on the coast of Spain. We found
shelter
in the cottages of the peasants, and the
succeeding
day, as the sailors were searching the strand for
whatever might be washed ashore from the wreck,
they found the bodies of Mrs. Campbell and the
maniac, locked in each other's embrace; and as death
had united those who in life had been parted, we did
not break the mortal bond, but consigned them to
the same grave. The sorrow of the destitute orphan
child touched the best feelings of the roughest
seaman's
heart, and the little Gascon lifted the mourner
in his arms, as the earth was heaped on the mortal
remains of her parents, and soothingly said: Poor
unfortunate, you shall never want while I have aught
to give. He had a widowed sister at Havre,
under
whose protection he designed to place her. On
inquiring how she had escaped from the wreck, the
boatswain stated that a few moments before the
vessel
struck, the maniac had rushed upon deck, placed
her in his arms, and conjured him to save her life.
He immediately disappeared in the bustle and
confusion
that prevailed. He had doubtless gone
below
,
resolved to remain there and sink with the ship,
as the actual ills of this life were to him more
appaling
than the untried sufferings of the life to come.
The Spanish peasants planted a rude cross over
their grave to denote the spot where the shipwrecked
strangers lie, and a wandering monk sanctified it,
and offered up an orison that their sleep might be
undisturbed.
After their interment the physician informed us
that he had some matters of interest to
communicate
,
which had been related to him in confidence
by the shipwrecked sailor, at a time when, as he
said, he had abandoned all hopes of safety, and he
wished to relieve his mind from the weight of secret
guilt.
I committed his relation to paper, said the
physician
,
as it fell from his lips, but can convey no
idea of the impassioned strain in which it was
delivered
.
His death exonerates me from secrecy, for
neither the dead nor the living will be wronged by
what is contained in this paper. Saying which, he
handed me a scroll containing the following:
Campbell was long my friend; my earliest and
dearest friend; but for several years past we have
been as bitter foes as ever walked the earth for each
other's torment. His vengeful and hated image
even now is before me; his dying groan rings through
my brain, and his bloody corpse presents itself
whichever
way I turn as it appeared on that dreadful night
when it was consigned to the waters. I see it now
as when it rose upon the dark billow that bore it
forever from the sight of all mankind;all but me!
I loved him as a brother, but like a villain I wronged
him. Yes, mine was the first breach of confidence;
I inflicted the first injury, and now the accumulation
of guilt and suffering rests on my devoted head. He
loved the poor, guilty and broken hearted female
who now survives him. She then was innocent, and
I thought her rather a being of Heaven than of earth.
He made his love known to me, but regardless of
the voice of friendship and of honour, by the basest
insinuations, I supplanted him in her affections. It
matters not what arts I used; they were those of a
demon, and proved but too successful. The
unsuspecting
innocent maid discarded him who deserved
her, and placed her hopes on a wretch defiled with
duplicity and baseness. We were married.
Campbell
disappeared, and from that moment until we
met on board this ship, I neither saw nor heard of
him. I knew he was an enthusiast, but ill calculated
to encounter the disappointments of this world, and
I supposed that an early grave had closed over his
sorrows. The thought, horrible as it was, allayed
the poignancy of my feelings. My business
necessarily
drew me from home for months together.
Campbell and my lost Louisa must have met during
my absence, when my villany became divulged, and
was seen by them, no doubt, in its blackest colours.
If so, who can blame them if in a moment of frenzy
they spurned aside the miscreant who stood between
them and happiness. The immaculate and unspotted
may condemn without a tear, but even I, though they
have sunk me to the lowest depth of human
wretchedness
,
cannot curse them.
I pass over my life until the fatal time when I
was rescued from impending death and brought on
board of this ship. Oh! that I had undergone the
most poignant sufferings that death can inflict before
I had been rescued to perform the terrible deed I
have done, and live in this agony! The spark of
life was nearly extinct; I was insensible to what
was passing around me, and when the ray of intellect
broke on my darkened imagination, the first objects
that presented themselves to my view, were
Campbell
and my wife! The shock had nearly
accomplished
the work that privation and the waves had
left unfinished. The fatal truth rushed like a torrent
on my mind; my bosom was rent with contending
passions; my brain ached, and a veil of obscurity
overclouded my reason. While lying in my
hammock
,
I occasionally caught a glimpse of my
innocent
child while at play: my heart revolted from it,
VOL. I.14
and I viewed it with the same abhorrence that I
should a young viper. Once the feelings of a father
came over me; the mother's guilt was forgotten; and
I called the little innocent to me to receive her
father's
dying blessing. I called her by name; she
raised her lovely face to ascertain whence the sound
proceededher mother's smile was on her lips, and
that changed my blessing to a curse. I would at
that moment have given the universe had she not
resembled her guilty mother.
My shame and wreck of happiness now engrossed
all my thoughts. Sleeping and waking, Campbell
and my wife stood before me. In vain I sought for
rest; they still pursued me, and there was no fleeing
from them. My mind, enfeebled by sickness and
anxiety, sunk beneath the conflict. I became
deranged
.
The night that Campbell received his
death-wound
,
you may remember, I was seized with a
raging fever. It imparted a preternatural strength
to my exhausted frame: my mind was burning too
with revenge;images the most horrible presented
themselves and goaded me to madness. I had a
sailor's knife in my hammock. I seized it and arose.
My tread was firm. I stifled a convulsive laugh, as
my bloody intent came across my imagination. I
stole softly to the gangway, and my heart throbbed
audibly with a fiendish joy as I hurried upon deck.
I paused for a moment; the raging of the storm was
in unison with my feelings, and its coolness gave
my frame new vigour. A flash of lightning showed
me where my victim sat. I rushed upon him, and
uttered my name; he sank upon the deck beneath
me, but soon regained his self-possession. The
struggle
was in silence; we both felt that it was for life
and vengeance, and I strained every nerve to hurl
him into the sea; my strength was unequal to the
task. The conflict now became desperate, and I
was near being vanquished, when I drew the knife
and buried it in his bosom. He sunk at my feet; I
see him now; I still hear the sound of his body as it
fell upon the deck, and the shriek he gave as I
stabbed him. Every sense and feeling is engrossed
in these; I hear naught besidesee nothing but his
bleeding form; it has pursued me until reason
abandoned
her station. I became a maniac, and the
image was more distinct and terrible. I cannot fly
from it; I feel it will pursue me until the shadows
of death shut out the scenes of this life for ever; and
then, Oh God! I fear that the impression is so
indelibly
fixed in my soul, that in the life to come I
shall seek for rest in vain!
Here ended the physician's manuscript. Having
read it to the captain, he observed, that philosophy
is a cure for most evils which Providence inflicts
upon man, but it is of no avail in cases like the
present
,
where the sufferer himself is the sole cause of
the evil he endures.
After having saved as much from the wreck as
practicable, we proceeded to Cadiz, and thence took
shipping to Havre. The little philosopher, as he
took a last view of the wreck of his favourite vessel,
said with a sigh, behold all that is left to me after
forty years toil and danger! I now am old and
pennyless
;
but he whose mind is not to be shaken by
the vicissitudes of fortune, needs not her golden
smiles to make him happy. He kissed the child,
leisurely wiped his spectacles, took the Seneca from
his pocket, and in a few moments his irreparable
loss and the dangers he had just escaped were alike
forgotten.
THE
LEPER'S CONFESSION.
And the Leper in whom the plague is, his clothes shall be
rent, and his head bare, and he shall put a covering upon his
upper lip, and shall cry, unclean, unclean.All the days
wherein the plague shall be in him he shall be defiled; he is
unclean: he shall dwell alone; without the camp shall his
habitation be.
Leviticus
.
The
curse of heaven is one me.
[3]
[3]
Rhotaris, king of the Lombards, published an edict against
lepers, by which they were considered dead in law, and
enjoined
not to come near to sound persons, but to apprize them
of their approach, by making a noise with a wooden clapper.
So early as the eighth century, St. Othmar, in Germany, and
St. Nicholas de Corbie, in France, instituted leprous houses,
which had already been numerously established in Italy. King
Pepin, in 757, and Charles the Great, 789, issued ordinances,
by which the marriages of lepers were dissolved, and their
association with the healthy prohibited. In fact, a person
afflicted with this disease, was treated as a dead body,
funeral
obsequies were performed, and masses said, for the
benefit
of his soul.
It has pursued
me from my birth, and will adhere to me until this
body is mingled with its primitive dust. I brought
it into the world with me, and there is no human
skill can tear it off. It has turned the whole human
race against me. My father fled when he first
beheld
me, and my mother, even while her heart
yearned
to press me to her breast, snatched her nipple
from my boncless gums, and put me aside with
horror
.
The natural channels leading to the heart, have
been closed up against me. I have been shut out
from communion with mankind. My affections have
been crushed, and weeds have sprung up from the
soil where flowers would have blossomed. All have
fled before me as from a living pestilence, and in
my turn I have fled from all, even as Cain fled,
fearing
an enemy in all he met.
I was reared alone, as if I partook not of the
privileges
of my nature in common with the rest of my
race. I had been taught to feel that even the air I
breathed was upon the sufferance of those who were
but mortals like myself. My heart was frozen in
the first budding of its affections. My parents were
but parents in name, and my brothers and sisters
feared to acknowledge the ties of kindred with me.
The cup I drank from was marked and no one
touched
it, and even the house dog was driven from the
trencher that held my food; not for my sake but in
pity to the dog. The days of my boyhood were
passed in solitude, and at night, I have laid myself
down in my solitary hiding place, as the dog crawls
to his kennel, and wept until the morning.
I left my father's house, for what was my father's
house to me more than any other spot on earth. So
far from finding my affliction soothed, by being near
those whom nature bade me love, their aversion
caused me to feel, in the utmost poignancy, the
severity
of my fate. I was goaded to madness, for my
feelings were daily crushed under foot as heedlessly
as the flowers that spring in the valley. My father's
house became hell to me, and I left it, for I felt that
even a lazar house, compared to it, would have been
heaven.
I had attained the age of manhood when I went
forth into the world. I sought a distant clime where
both my person and name were unknown, and I
changed my name, lest that might possibly lead to
14*
my identity. The marks of my fatal disease were
now concealed beneath my clothing, and I mingled
with mankind no longer a proscribed wretch, but
felt like another being and rose from the earth
regenerate
.
My heart was joyous and leaped at the
sound of the glad voices of my fellow mortals. I
admired the beauties that nature presented on all
sides, as though they had been made for my
enjoyment
,
and while I contemplated them, I ceased to
remember that my hopes of happiness had been
blighted never to put forth again.
In the enthusiasm of the moment I exclaimed,
this world must last forever. It is too beautiful a
creation to have been made to be destroyed. As it
was centuries ago it is at the present time; and as
it is now it will remain through myriads of unborn
ages. No external objects have heretofore
influenced
its course, nor have internal commotions
affected
in the slightest degree its movements. Its
velocity is the same; its weight neither diminished
nor increased, for we bring nothing into the world
and nothing can we take out of it. Man in his pride
may build, heap mountain upon mountain, until his
works bear the same proportion to his hand, as the
extended coral reef to the little insect that framed
it, and still with all his toil he cannot add as much
as the weight of a feather to the weight of the world.
He may change the features of the works of nature,
but the power of creation to the minutest degree is
denied him. The influence of other spheres upon
this globe is the same as when the Almighty hand
first set the countless orbs in motion. Night
follows
day, and the various seasons still succeed each
other in the order that it was first decreed. The
earth has undergone no change in its products, for
those plants that were indigenous still remain so,
and those that were exotics ages ago will not yet
spring spontaneously from the soil. The seed must
first be scattered.
Thus I reasoned to convince myself that the world
must last forever, and I wished it might be so, but
experience soon taught me, that had the extent of
its duration been pronounced, no matter how brief,
it must have exceeded far the measure of my joys.
I mingled with the world, as I have said, and
appeared
to enjoy what was passing, but like the felon
who has escaped from prison, I lived in daily terror
of detection. I watched the progress of my disease,
and had it been the brand of a convict, I could not
have contemplated it with greater horror. I lived
in constant dread lest it should seize upon my face
and hands, and render concealment longer
impossible
.
If the indelible brand of guilt had been stampt
upon me, I might have collected sufficient fortitude
to brave the odium, for there is a recklessness too
frequently attendant upon crime, which renders the
offender insensible to the insults of the world,
having
forfeited its fair opinionbut I was innocent; I
was persecuted for a misfortune in which I had no
agency, and which was beyond my power to remedy,
and the consciousness of this innocence, so far from
imparting strength, weighed like a millstone on me,
and my mind had not sufficient energy to cast it off.
I suffered I knew not wherefore, but it was the will
of heaven, and there was no relief.
I had now been so long in the habit of
contemplating
myself, and viewing my associates with the
eye of suspicion, that I became contracted in my
feelings, and lived for myself alone. How desolate is
the human heart when it meets with no object upon
which it can repose! it becomes the sepulchre of its
better feelings, and as they decay, weeds and nettles
spring up as about the monumental stone that marks
the spot where beauty moulders.
My existence might be compared to the dream of
a delirious wretch labouring under a raging fever.
Nothing appeared in its true colours, and shadows
struck as deep terror to my soul as their substance.
A change came over me, and instead of admiring
the glorious works that had awakened me to new
life, I sickened at the sight and closed my eyes upon
them. But winter came, and it was spring to my
soul as I beheld the trees stripped of their foliage,
the streams locked in icy fetters, the earth sterile
and covered with snow, and nature in her hour of
adversity. There was no music in my ear like the
hollow moan of the tempest as it swelled like a dirge
over the ruin it had made. Such was my state of
mind when I met with one as beautiful as the
embodying
of a poet's dream, and pure as the lily that
grows in the shade and dies untarnished by the rays
of the sun. She was one of those that nature at
intervals
throws among us as it were to give a clue to
the imagination of the beholder, to form some idea
of the celestial beings who inhabit a purer orb than
this. I loved her and was beloved. Her whole soul
reposed in me in perfect confidence, and my
feelings
for her were such as I imagined could never
have sprung from my desolate heart.
Months passed away and our love for each other
increased daily. The bliss of being near her more
than compensated for all my sufferings, for I now
felt that there was something worth living for, and
while that remained, I should be invulnerable to all
calamity. While indulging in this dream, one who
was acquainted with me in my boyhood, passed me
in the street. There had never been the slightest
congeniality of feeling subsisting between us. I had
always instinctively avoided him, and he suffered no
opportunity to escape of showing his aversion for
me. The affections of early life oftentimes are
destroyed
as flowers overrun by weeds: they fade, and
die, and never spring up again. Not so our dislikes.
That which was but a seed in childhood, takes deep
root in the genial soil, and is nourished by the very
essence of our nature, until, in after life, we behold
it standing forth as the oak of the forest, resisting
all shocks and casting a deep shade over all that
comes within its influence. At least, it has been so
with me. He gazed at me as he passed as if he
retained
an indistinct recollection of having seen me
before. I was paralyzed at the sight of him. The
sudden appearance of a tenant of the grave could
not have filled me with such terror. I turned away,
in hopes he would not know me, and he passed on.
I hurried home more dead than alive, and hastily
locked the door after me, still doubting my safety.
Days elapsed before I ventured abroad. My fears
and absence from her I loved, rendered my solitude
insupportable. I dared not explain to her the cause
of my strange conductshe was surrounded by
admirers
,
worshipped by the favourites of the world,
and every breath of air that approached her was
laden with the aspirations of devoted hearts. I was
fully aware of this, and I knew how delicate a plant
is loveit droops and dies in the shade, and my
heart sunk within me at the thought that my
apparent
neglect might estrange her feelings from me. I
reproached myself with cowardice, for happiness
was within my grasp and yet I had not the courage
to be any thing but wretched. I again summoned
my resolution, felt prepared to encounter the worst,
and with an unfaltering step I left my place of
concealment
.
It was night as I approached the dwelling of the
only being I cared to see. As I came in front of
the house I beheld it illuminated and heard the sounds
of revelry within. My fears again rushed on my
mind and I hesitated whether to enter or return.
Coward, I exclaimed, what death can equal a
life of constant dread! I paused but for a moment
on the threshold, and entered. The apartment was
filled with light hearts and smiling faces; I looked
around, passing with indifference many a brilliant
beauty, until my anxious eyes fell upon the
sylph-like
figure of my beloved. Sadness was seated on
her pale brow, but no sooner did she discover me,
than a gentle blush tinged her lily white cheeks, and
she hastened to where I stood. Her hand trembled
as she placed it in mine, and the colour of her cheek
became of a deeper die, as she bade me welcome.
The faded brow, the blush, the trembling hand, spoke
too plainly what I scarcely dared to hope, and such
was the ecstacy of my feelings, that it appeared to
me as if the happiness of an entire life was
concentrated
in that single moment.
O, woman! thou best and loveliest work of the
master hand! Thou art to the human race as the
sun to the universe. Darkness is dissipated by thy
presence, and virtues that otherwise would run to
weeds in the rude heart of man are drawn forth and
fostered, until they blossom and bear fruit, in the
sunshine of thy countenance. In his youth, thou
art more beautiful to him than the wonders of
paradise
were to the new created Adam; and when in
the vale of life, weary and wayworn, still he turns
to thee to cheer him on his journey. He looks back,
and his heart confesses that his purest and most
cherished joys sprung from thee; he looks forward,
and though the view presents nothing but darkness
and gloom, and the weight of the world be on him,
thou smilest, and he rises renovate, like the aged
son beneath the magic influence of the daughter
of etes.
The joy I experienced on our meeting might be
compared to the vivid flash of lightning that
precedes
the roll of the thunder; it was as brilliant and
as fleeting. As I looked through the assemblage, I
beheld the being whom most I dreaded, and whom
most I hatedhe who had passed me in the street
a few days before. His eyes were fixed upon me;
my first impulse was to fly, but I had not the power:
my head sunk upon my bosom, and I remained silent
and motionless, while he approached and accosted
me by name. A name that I had not heard for years,
and one that I trusted had been forgotten. Every
earthly hope withered at the sound.
He no sooner left me than I withdrew to conceal
my confusion. The sudden change that had come
over me escaped the notice of all but one, and she
followed me to learn the cause. I hurried out of
the house in silence, and still she followed,
beseeching
me to explain my mysterious conduct. Still I
hurried on with the feelings of a felon who has
escaped from prison, and hears the cry of his
pursuers
.
At length I paused beneath the portico of a
chapel, and we concealed ourselves in the deep shade
of its columns. I trembled as I took her by the
hand.
For mercy's sake, she exclaimed, what means
this agitation?
The time has come, beloved one, when we must
part.
Must part!
Yes, forever.
She faintly repeated, Forever! and her languid
head fell upon my bosom.
I am a proscribed wretcha burden on the face
of the earththere is no resting place for my foot
hereI must continue to be the persecuted of men,
until I find a refuge in the narrow confines of the
grave.
And wherefore should we part? If grief is your
lot, so much the greater need of one to share it with
you.
I pressed her yielding form to my bosom, and my
heart was too full to speak until relieved by a flood
of tears.
Thou devoted one, thou art incapable of
estimating
the sacrifice thou wouldst make for me. I
am an isolated being; hopeless, cut off from
communion
with mankind. Return to thy friends, where
thou wilt be happy, and leave me to my fate.
She faintly exclaimed, Happy, while you are
wretched! O, impossible!
Thou art the only object in life that is dear to
me, but pause ere you take a step that indissolubly
links your fate with mine. Remember, the world
is a fearful world for the feeble to encounter.
It is too late for me to think of that now.
What, wouldst thou leave friends, kindred,
homeall for me?
All, all for thee.
How brilliant is the dream of youth, when the
soul is first awakened by the aspirations of love.
We are then as our first parents were before the
fall, breathing the very atmosphere of heaven,
holding
communion with angels, and fearlessly
approaching
the Creator himself. It is, however, a feeling
that we enjoy but once, and for a moment only; it
passes away like a flash of lightning that is
succeeded
by darkness, and no power can revive it,
unless, indeed, it be revived in heaven.
From that hour she became mine. Let not those
who adjudge me condemn my selfishness, unless
they possess the fortitude to have acted otherwise.
She was the only treasure I had ever possessed, and
I viewed her as an offering from heaven, that it would
have been suicidal to have rejectedI could not have
survived her loss.
That night we travelled towards a neighbouring
city. She hung upon my arm, and spoke cheerfully,
drawing a thousand bright pictures of future
happiness
,
that it would have required a thousand lives
to have realized, and we were to enjoy the whole in
oneSuch is the magic pencil with which young
love paints! The night was beautiful, clad in the
glory of her countless stars. Even the vegetable
world appeared to be endued with animal life, and
to inhale the refreshing breezes. The lofty trees
stood forth like the giants of the earth, and seemed
as though they were slumbering in the moonlight,
and so awfully calm was nature, that I almost
fancied
I heard their respiration. It was a calm that
foretold the coming storm.
We lived in a secluded spot, obscurely and
unknown
.
Apprehension of being discovered subsided,
as days and weeks passed away, and we neither saw
nor heard of any one to molest us. I obtained
employment
,
and a new view of life burst upon me as
I reflected that by my labour she was supported,
who had deserted the world for me. It stimulated
me to constant exertion; my mind became more
cheerful, and I daily experienced how delicious that
coarse bread is which is made with the sweat of the
brow. What are all the heartless enjoyments of
the more prosperous compared to this! They rove
from pleasure to pleasure, gathering sweets, until
the luscious hoard palls upon the appetite, and then
turn away nauseated, and arrogantly pronounce the
choicest blessings that the Creator has bestowed, all
vanity. I had but one drop of sweet mingled in my
cup of bitter; it was a potent drop, for it made me
delirious with joy. I revelled in it, and I was
thankful
.
Man was not made for a round of pleasure,
for pleasures soon become toils, and of the most
irksome
kind when there is no obstacle to be
surmounted
,
nothing to stimulate to exertion, and the mind
lies inactive. This state is literally death of the
better part of man, and that which is endued with
vitality is nothing more than the sepulchre of the
spiritcorruption lies within. How dare such hope
for pleasure, and impiously complain when they do
not attain it?As well might the dead hope for
pleasure
in the grave.
The fountain of all pure delight is a virtuous
mind, and he who possesses that, with a taste to
admire
the wondrous works that present themselves,
from the minute flower, and the insect of
complicated
formation, and all things that intervene
between
them, and the myriads of unexplored worlds,
that shine forth so gloriously in the firmament,
until
he becomes so engrossed with admiration, that
he dare, with becoming awe, approach that heaven,
above all heavens of the poets' inventionthat man
may bid defiance to the accumulated sorrows of this
world; they may fall upon him, press him to the
earth for a time, but they cannot crush him! Come
what may, that man cannot be otherwise than happy.
So I once thought, for I studied to convince
myself
that it was so, and I would fain think so still,
but, alas! it requires but a slight jar to destroy the
harmony of the most carefully attuned instrument,
and nothing but grating discord proceeds from it
afterwards.
I had been blessed with the society of my wife
for more than six monthsas I look back to that
period, it seems to have been scarcely as many days.
VOL. I.15
One evening, the labour of the day being over earlier
than usual, as I was returning to my home full of
joy, in crossing a public square, I again encountered
the man who had recognised me before. I
endeavoured
to evade him, he followed, I turned into
obscure
streets and increased my speed, without
venturing
to look behind as I hurried on. The dusk of
the evening was gradually increasing, and I trusted
that, and the circuitous route I had pursued, would
protect me from his vigilance. I did not go directly
home, but wandered about until it became quite
dark, for I was aware that my wife was more the
object of his pursuit than myself. I had learnt since
our marriage, that he was attached to her, and was
to become her husband with her father's consent,
and I dreaded to betray the place of her
concealment
.
I entered the house exhausted with fatigue and
anxiety. I told my wife whom I had encountered,
and the measures I had taken to evade him. She
endeavoured to quiet my fears, but they increased
as I perceived to what an extent her own were
awakened. We spoke not long before we concluded
to fly the city, and without loss of time, lest by
possibility
my steps might have been traced. All places
were alike to us, provided we were together, for
with the human race we acknowledged not even the
slender ties of fellowship.
An hour had scarcely elapsed before all was in
readiness for our flight. I put out the light, and
we hoped to have escaped unperceived, but as I
opened the street door, I beheld several persons
standing in front of my house. I recoiled and closed
the door, and as I did so, some one knocked and
attempted to open it. I resisted, and in an instant
it was burst open, and they rushed in and seized me.
I demanded the reason of the outrage, and a voice
exclaimed, He is a leper. I recognised the voice,
I turned towards the person who spoke, and beheld
my persecutor. My faculties both physical and
mental
were prostrated.
As they led me away, my wife attempted to
follow
,
but they forced us asunder. He who had
betrayed
me took charge of her, and I was lodged in
a room the windows of which were grated, and the
door secured so that it was impossible to escape.
My feelings during that night I may not attempt to
describe, for they rushed upon me with the rapidity
of lightning, until my brain was in a whirl.
Nothing
was distinct. One thought, however, operated
as a nucleus around which all gathered in fearful
arraymy wife was in the power of my worst enemy
in the power of one who loved her, and the
marriage
ties between us were dissolved forever.
That night appeared as an age, and I thought day
would never break. I wished for it, and yet looked
forward to it with undefined terror. At length it
came, and as I heard the busy hum of the world
around me, I longed for the death-like stillness of
night again.
In the course of the morning, a priest clothed in
his surplice and stole, repaired with the cross to the
place where I was confined. He began by
exhorting
me to bear, in a spirit of resignation and
patience
,
the incurable affliction with which God had
stricken me!It is easier to offer consolation than
to receive it!He then besprinkled me with holy
water, and when he supposed my mind sufficiently
prepared for the appalling ceremony that awaited me,
he conducted me to the church, and on the way the
same verses were sung as at burials. There I was
divested of my ordinary clothing, and a black habit,
prepared for the purpose, was put on me. The
priest now commanded me to fall on my knees before
the altar, between two trestles, and I remained in
that position while mass was said. It was the same
as is performed for the dead. The mass being over,
I was again sprinkled with holy water, the
libera
was sung, and I was conducted to the hut prepared
for my reception. When we had arrived there, the
priest again exhorted and consoled me, and finished
by throwing a shovel full of earth on my feet. I
was then as one of the dead in the eyes of the world,
and, indeed, I had but little more consciousness of
what was passing than one of the dead, although,
during the whole ceremony, my hated enemy was
malignantly looking on.
The hut was small, and furnished with a bed, a
vessel for water, a chest, a table, a lamp and a few
other necessaries. I was presented with a cowl, a
tunic, and a long robe, a little cask, a rattle, a stick,
and a girdle of copper. Before the priest left me,
he interdicted me from appearing in public without
my leper's habit and with naked feet, from going
into churches, mills, or where bread was cooking;
from washing my hands and clothes in the wells and
brooks; from touching any commodity at market,
except with a stick, in order to point out the article
I wished to purchase. I was farther enjoined not
to draw water but with a proper vessel; never to
reply to the questions of any one who might meet
me on the road if the wind blew towards him; never
to touch children, nor to give them any thing which
I had touched; never to appear in public meetings,
and never to eat or drink with any but lepers. I
felt myself literally one of the dead in the midst of
the living.
I was now informed that the marriage ties between
myself and wife were dissolved, that she was free
to make another choice, but that we could never
come together again. She had been removed to her
father's house, and strictly watched, lest our
correspondence
should be renewed. Although I seldom
stirred abroad from my living grave, few matters of
import occurred to that being, without speedily
reaching my ears. Scarcely a month had elapsed
before I heard that my hated rival had renewed his
overtures. I knew her father to be tyrannical, and
I was aware of the influence he maintained over her
delicate mind, now enfeebled by a constant
succession
of anxiety and suffering. I felt that she was
still my wife in the eye of heaven, though man had
parted us.
Another month elapsed, during which time that
thought was as a burning coal upon my mind day
and night. It could neither be kindled to a flame,
nor could it be quenched, but there it lay unchanged
and unchangeable. I endeavoured to excite my
feelings
to madness, in hopes of gaining relief, but it was
impossible. I had been humbled, my soul had been
prostrated, and the dull feeling of despair kept it
grovelling in the earth.
The next intelligence I received was, that I was
likely to become a father. Under different
circumstances
that would have been joyful tidings, but now
I was thankful only because it procrastinated the
fate that awaited my wife. In due time the child
was born, and I learnt the time and place fixed for
his baptism. I repaired to the spot to see him; as I
drew nigh, I perceived that a few servants of the
household had already assembled; I sounded my
rattle to forewarn them that a leper approached;
they started at the sound, and commanded me to
come no nearer. I dared not do otherwise than obey.
The priest soon afterwards appeared, and a nurse
followed carrying the infant. The ceremony took
place, but they did not baptize him in the font of
holy water, for he was the child of a leper, and they
dreaded lest the little innocent should poison the
whole font, and turn into a curse that which had
been made holy by the word of the priest. They
then took the water in which he had been baptized,
and threw it into a lonely place where nothing living
would be likely to come near it, for they supposed
even the water to be infectious. All this while I
stood at a distance looking on, and when I saw them
about to depart, I besought them to bring the child
to me, that I might kiss and bless it for the first and
last time. My prayer was denied, and I was
commanded
not to come nearer. As they withdrew, I
stood gazing at them until they were out of sight,
and then retraced my steps to my hovel, conscious
that the last tie between myself and the living was
broken.
15*
Several months elapsed, when a report reached
me that the day was fixed for the nuptials of my
wife with my detested rival. I received a letter
from her, beseeching me to save her, as she was
heart broken, and that, in her forlorn and dependent
state, she doubted her fortitude to resist the severity
of her father, by any other means thau seeking a
refuge in the grave. I was not long in determining
upon what course to pursue, as my choice lay
between
her death and his who had entailed such a
load of wretchedness upon me. That night I left
my hovel, and by daybreak the following morning,
I was within sight of the city where she resided.
I was resting by the way side before the sun had
risen above the horizon, when I heard the distant
sound of merry voices and the clattering of horses'
hoofs approaching, and immediately a party
appeared
with hawks and hounds on the way to the field.
They drew nigh to where I was seated, and the
silent air was disturbed by their merriment. Joy
and sorrow are distant, and yet we constantly find
them breathing the same atmosphere!As they
passed on, I perceived that my wife was of the
party, but how changed from what she was when I
first beheld her! She was faded, but still beautiful
to me, even more beautiful than ever, but it was not
the beauty that belongs to this world. He who had
poisoned the very fountain of her lifethe detested
cause of her premature decay, rode beside her.
They passed without perceiving me, and I rose and
followed them at a distance.
I have ever believed that good and evil are
mingled
in like proportions in the human heart, and that
he whose virtues call forth the admiration of the
world, is equally capable of rousing its indignation
by his vices, if circumstances call them into action.
I fully believed myself virtuousI was sensible of
its beauties, and I studied to be so, and yet I glided
into the stream of vice as naturally as if it had been
my element, and was hurried along with a wilder
sense of delight than ever I had experienced in the
cause of virtue. That feeling, however, was of short
duration.
I kept my eye upon my rival, who pursued the
chase like an eager sportsman, and I followed in his
track unperceived. He soon became separated from
the party; I watched his courseit led him to an
entangled woodI knew the spot that he must pass,
for I had myself hunted on the same ground, and
there I stationed myself to await his coming. I had
not waited long before he appeared.
As soon as he perceived me, he cried out, Wretch,
why did you not give the alarm to warn me that
pestilence
was at hand?
I will give it now, I replied, and approached
him.
Stand off! have you no fear of punishment?
None on earth. I still advanced.
Villain, another step nigher, and I strike you to
my feet. He raised his rapier, which was
sheathed
,
as if he would put his threat in execution.
Not so, I replied, Another step nigher, and
I strike
you
to my feet. The blow followed upon
the word, my knife was buried to the haft in his
bosom
,
and my enemy lay prostrate on the earth. I
drew the knife from the wound, the blood spouted
after it, he uttered a deep groan, and the next
moment
ceased to breathe. I stood for a moment over
the inanimate body, and then returned to my home,
unobserved, well satisfied with what I had done.
Several weeks after this, as I was sitting in front
of my hut, towards evening, I beheld a female
approaching
.
Her step was slow and tottering, and
she was accompanied by another bearing an infant
child. As they drew nigh, I recognised my wife.
I hastened to her, and she sunk exhausted in my
arms. When she revived, I asked to know to what
happy occurrence I was indebted for this unlooked
for interview. She faintly replied, The leprosy
has restored the leper's wife to his bosom; they can
now no longer keep us asunder. Another look
convinced me that the fatal disease was on her.
The agony of that moment exceeded all that I had
hitherto experienced.
I took my child in my arms, and kissed him for
the first time, and his mother's face brightened as
she beheld me caressing him, though there was
pestilence
and death in the kiss. There is no feeling
more pure and holy, than that which a young mother
enjoys, when she beholds a beloved husband caressing
her offspring. We then moved on to my hut in
silence, as mourners approach the grave.
Day after day, I marked the progress of the
disease
on my wife. Her frame had wasted away, and
there was no longer the slightest trace of beauty
remaining
in that once angelic countenance. Her
mind had sunk beneath the weight that had been
heaped upon it, and had been literally crushed; a
total change had taken place, and every thing
denoted
that the fountain of life had been poisoned.
Still she bore all with resignation, and never a word
of complaint passed her lips. There was one
subject
that I desired to speak of to her, and yet dreaded
to do soI mean the murderfor it is a relief to
the guilty to impart a knowledge of their crimes to
others. She never alluded to it by word or look,
and I had not the fortitude to do it.
She died as gently as a lamp goes out for want of
oil. It took place at midnight. I was watching
beside the bed; she called to me to kiss her, and
as I did so, she sighed, and her soul winged its way
to heaven from her lips. The next morning, I sent
for a priest, and according to the custom she was
buried in the hovel. I stood beside the grave
destined
to receive the only good I ever possessed on
earth, and I helped to close it without shedding a
single tear. Before a week had elapsed, my child
found a resting place on the bosom of its angel
mother
,
and I was again alone.
Suspicion arose of my being guilty of the murder.
I was apprehended, accused, and threatened with
the rack unless I confessed. A strange mode that
of testing the truth by the strength of a man's nerves
and joints. But the threat was useless; I confessed
my guilt, for they cannot be more desirous of taking
my life than I am to part with it. I am now in
prison
to answer for the offence. In making this
confession
and reviewing my past life, I have been led
to analyze my feelings until I believe I thoroughly
understand my heart, and judging from that, I have
irresistibly arrived at the conclusion, that the
decress
of heaven, and the laws of man, have rendered
many wretched and guilty whose minds were framed
to enjoy, to the fullest extent, the various works of
nature, and who would otherwise have passed as
harmless as the new born infant to the grave.
THE
FIRST BORN.
A LITTLE charity for the love of heaven, to keep
a sinner from starving! exclaimed a hollow voice,
as a gay party approached Paris, on the evening of
a fine day in autumn. They turned at the sound,
and beheld a squalid object, seated by the way-side;
but, as they were intent on pleasure, they did not
wish their path to be impeded by misery. The appeal
was repeated. One alone checked his horse, and
the others rode off, carelessly exclaiming, Well,
Antoine must be our almoner.
The mendicant, who was dressed in the habit of a
Franciscan, remained seated. He was large of
stature
,
but emaciated. His hair was bleached, and
hung over his shoulders; and his piercing black eyes
still retained the fire of youth, perhaps heightened
in fierceness by slight mental hallucination. His
countenance, which was commanding, must have
been in his youth uncommonly beautiful; but now
was haggard, and its expression was such as could
not fail to produce an effect on the most resolute
spectator.
At a short distance from the old man stood a
figure, very little more than half his height, deformed
and shocking to look upon. His head was
unnaturally
large, his hair matted, his eyes deep set and
of different hues, and his face made but a distant
approach to the human countenance. His back and
chest protruded, forming a misshapen mass, and his
legs were dwindled to a size apparently unequal to
the burthen they had to support. This singular
figure gazed vacantly at the young man as he threw
a coin at the feet of the beggar.
The blessings of heaven be on you, exclaimed
the mendicant, and preserve you from my abject
condition. Receive the alms, my son, that are freely
given, and bless the charitable hand that bestows
them.
The deformed approached to pick up the coin, and
as he caught hold of Antoine's garment with his
scrawny hand, and ejaculated, God reward you!
the flesh of the young man shrunk as if some toad
or loathsome reptile had touched him. He recoiled,
and the motion, slight as it was, did not escape the
penetrating eye of the father. Yes, murmured
the old man, its influence is universal. It even
frightens compassion from the heart of the
charitable
;
but since it failed not to corrupt nature in the
bosom of a parent, why should I longer question or
limit the extent of its power?
What mean you? said Antoine; your words
import more than I comprehend.
I mean that heaven may make the heart perfect;
and yet, if the body be deformed, all will revolt
from the object, as though it were not entitled to the
common privileges of our race. The warped mind
is discovered by few, but the crooked form is
palpable
to the dullest vision; and while defect is
viewed by the mass with insurmountable prejudice,
what is there in this world to compensate for the
irremediable curse! My poor boy, thou hast felt it
in its most refined poignancy; but thou art avenged,
for of all my race thou hast lived to be my only
solace in age and suffering.
He fell in tears on the neck of the deformed, who
stood gazing around vacantly, and insensible to the
caresses of the other. Antoine threw down a five
franc piece, and dashing his spurs into the flanks of
his horse, darted off in pursuit of his companions.
The beggar having picked up the alms, slowly moved
towards Paris, and his son trotted doggedly in the
same path behind him.
The following day the beggar and his son were
seen wandering about the streets of Paris. They
paused in front of a palace, and knocked at the gate.
It was opened.
A little charity, for the love of heaven, to keep
a sinner from starving.
Begone! cried a menial, and closed the gate in
his face. The old man staggered, clasped his hands,
and raising his eyes towards heaven, exclaimed, If
such has always been the reception of the beggar at
this gate, I have no cause to murmur! He turned
down the street, and had proceeded but a few paces
when Antoine met him.
How now, old man, has your appeal been in vain
at the gate of a palace?
It has.
As the fault attaches itself to me, enter, and I
will repair it.
They went into the palace together, and, passing
through a spacious hall, came to a library. As they
entered the room, the old man became violently
agitated
,
tottered and fell to the floor. Antoine
hastened
to raise him; while the deformed stood gazing
vacantly, without even a sufficient degree of instinct
to impel him to assist his parent.
What is the meaning of this? cried Antoine, as
he supported him to a chair.
Need I assign any other cause than age and
suffering
?
was the feeble reply.
Not if your deportment and aspect did not
betray
that you were at one time superior to your
present
condition.
If that be all, they betray but little, for it were
impossible to be inferior to what I am. But you are
right, continued the mendicant; abject as I now
appear, the blood that runs debased through these
veins, flowed from a noble race of ancestry. There
was a time when I prided myself more upon the fame
of my progenitors than my own deserts. I was proud
of the worth of those connected with me. The world
contains many such, who possess no other earthly
claim to consideration; and absurd as this
pretension
may appear, its validity is almost universally
admitted, and its claimant suffered to pass without
scrutiny. How often do we see the guilt of a son
lost in the blaze of his father's virtue; and, on the
other hand, how frequently is the virtue of the son
neglected in consequence of the odium attached to
his parent's name!
Fruitless and vain is all human calculation, for
mysterious are the ways of Providence, and the
secrets that are divulged to-day, afford no clue by
which we may predict what will transpire to-morrow.
Many calculate as if there were no other world than
this, and as if life in this world were eternal. It
was on this principle I acted, at a time when every
thing was mine that makes life worth possessing;
and when I considered death as my only enemy. How
different are my views now, while I possess nothing
save that which renders life miserable, and look
forward to death as my only friend!
This is my first born; the heir to my family name
and honours. He was ushered into the world when
my dream of pride was as boundless and wild as
that of Lucifer. I looked upon the world as having
been made for my use, and thought that God did
me injustice, when his decrees came in collision with
my wishes. I had a keen relish for all that was
beautiful in the external, and my eye turned with
disgust from whatever did not come up to the
standard
in my imagination. Thus organized, though
the delight I enjoyed at times was exquisite, the
pain I felt on other occasions more than
counterbalanced
the pleasure.
In making choice of the partner of my fate, the
object I selected was divinely beautiful. My heart
swelled with pride as I presented her to the world
as mine. Surrounded with wealth and splendour;
VOL. I.16
with a name, as I imagined, as proud as recorded
history could produce; possessed of every thing that
tended to pamper my pride, and conscious of nothing
that might humble the arrogance of my feelings, how
shall I describe my joy when I first learnt that I
should soon become a father. I loved the child
unborn, for it was then the child of my imagination,
and as perfect an object as my imagination could
create. My galleries were decorated with the labours
of Italian artists; and from their groups of cupids I
selected the most perfect form, to which I gave in
my mind a face in miniature resembling that of my
wife. `Such must be my child,' I exclaimed in the
enthusiasm of the moment, and I again blessed it.
But when its first feeble wail was heard, while
expectation
was at the highest, to have a misshapen
mass placed in my hands, to see even the midwife
recoil as she presented itGod, forgive me!the
idle blessing had scarcely passed my lips, before my
heart conceived a malediction. My pride was
prostrate
,
and I turned with horror from the innocent
being that had humbled me.
Years passed away, and my wife bore me three
more sons. They were models of beauty, and my
heart yearned to receive them; but this one daily
grew more revolting. I wished him removed to give
place to a younger brother. I would have
stigmatized
him as an idiot, and incapable of supporting
the honours of the family; but his mind was a gem
that daily became more brilliant; and in the
wickedness
of my heart, I deplored that God had not,
made him as deformed in mind as in body. I kept
him aloof from me, and he drooped like a flower in
the shade, though I imagined that, like the rank
weed, he would have grown more poisonous in the
absence of sunshine.
My second boy now approached the age of seven.
His beautiful image is even at this day present to my
sight, though at times, objects coarse and palpable
to the touch, are to my dim vision imperceptible.
Still I see him in all the roseate beauty of health,
and as he was when emaciated and faded in death.
He died on the seventh anniversary of his birth; and
as we committed his remains to the grave, I felt as
if my heart was buried with him. My younger boys
still grew in health and beauty, and I turned to them
for consolation. But this poor unfortunate was still
neglected, for even affliction had not softened my
heart towards him.
Before my third son had completed his seventh
year, the bloom on his cheek also faded. He was
the image of his departed brother; and as the disease
advanced, the resemblance became more striking.
Every look awakened in my memory recollections
of my lost boy, and served to strengthen the
conviction
that another soon must follow. My fears
were prophetic. He had no sooner completed his
seventh year, than the flower was cropped. It would
be in vain to attempt to describe my feelings, as I
beheld his delicate frame stretched cold and
senseless
before me. I felt that a judgment of heaven
was on me, but still my heart was not softened
towards my first born.
My youngest child was remaining. He was
beautiful, even more so than his brother, and the
loss of them served to increase my affection for him.
My whole heart now reposed in him undivided. This
neglected one beheld my partiality, repined in secret, but uttered no complaint. He devoted his days to
study; his progress was great and his taste refined,
but nothing could obliterate the impression my mind
had received on first beholding him.
My only surviving hope had now nearly
completed
the age that had proved fatal to his brothers.
I watched him with feverish anxiety day and night,
for the belief that he was doomed to a similar fate,
had taken absolute possession of my mind. The
slightest change in his appearance did not escape
me. As the aniversary of his birth drew nigh, his
health became evidently affected; and as each day
succeeded another, there was a striking change for
the worse. I did not dare longer to hope, for his
fate was to me as plain as though I had seen it
written
in letters of fire on the face of heaven. The
dreaded day arrived, and he was still living. It was
a bright morning in spring; he looked out on the
clear blue sky as he reposed in his bed and his
countenance
became more animated. He was free from
pain, and spoke more cheerfully than he had done
for a month before. The hopes of his anxious
mother revived as she listened to him; but I felt that
the immutable decree had gone forth, and must be
fulfilled. The evening approached, and my boy was
still among the living. He spoke cheerfully, and
talked of what he would do when well enough to
leave his bed. He asked for his books and toys, and
they were placed upon the bed beside him. He
played with them, and was delighted with a toy
while on the brink of eternity. As the sun went
down his cheerfulness vanished. Night closed in,
and, as I gazed upon my boy, I wished that the sun
might never rise again, for I knew that he would
never see its beams again in this world. He was
now as white as the sheets that he lay upon. His
respiration was thick and tremulous; his eyes, that
once sparkled with animation, were dim; he no
longer spoke, and seemed to be insensible to what
was passing around him. I watched him for hours,
and at length perceived, by the rattling in his throat
and the motions of his body, that the crisis was at
hand. He struggled and writhed, but was too
feeble
for the dreadful crisis. His little bosom
fluttered
,
and scarcely a breath passed his parched lips. I
bent over him to change his position. His eye
glanced at minea momentary glance of
recognition
.
As I raised him, he threw his arms about my
neck, stretched his little limbs, sighed `Father!' and
his head fell upon my bosom. Life was extinct.
As I removed the body from my neck to the bed,
I exclaimed, in the words of the prophet, `He hath
bent his bow, and set me as a mark for the arrow.'
I tore my hair, blasphemed, and arraigned the
justice
of Providence; but at that moment my first born
entered the chamber. His countenance was filled
with grief. I had heretofore looked upon him with
disgust, but now it was impossible to avert my gaze.
His features were the same, but there was a benign
expression about them that made its way irresistibly
to my heart; and, for the first time, the thought
occurred
`Even
as thou hast dealt with thy son, hath
thy Father in heaven dealt with thee.' A
thunderbolt
could not have shocked me as did that thought.
Man may rise superior to the persecution of this
world, may despise the combination of the whole
human race to crush him, may scoff at obloquy,
and gather strength in the midst of oppression, if his
mind be imbued with implicit confidence in the
justice
of the ways of Providence; but let the giant of
the earth stand forth in all his strength, while fame
proclaims his greatness, until the arched skies
re-echo
,
and the subjugated world rises with heart and
hand to sustain him; still, if the thought enter his
mind that he is condemned of heaven, his props
become
as a blade of grass, and he falls even as a blade
of grass before the scythe of the mower, and, like
it, withers in the midst of sunshine.
From that hour my heart underwent a change
towards my first born. Instead of feeling disgust
in his presence, I could not bear him to be absent
from my sight. As he gradually developed the
resources
of his mind, I was astonished at the extent
and variety of his acquirements. Even in my
maturity
I shrunk from intellectual competition with the
boy. He became cheerful, affectionate, and fond of
being near me. His whole time was devoted to the
cultivation of his mind; and, as if by intuition, he
acquired science after science. I looked upon him
as a prodigy, and the aged and learned delighted to
praise and assist him in his studies. Once my shame,
he now became my pride; and, while I marked his
progress, I felt that heaven was impartial in its
dispensations
.
External beauty had been denied him,
but that of the mind far more than compensated for
this defect. I was now happy in having such a son;
16*
but `Who hath hardened himself against Him, and
hath prospered.'
The revolution now broke out with the blind
fury of the enraged lion goaded in the arena. I was
known to be an inflexible partisan of the unhappy
king. My pride was proverbial, and my name was
abhorrent to the ears of the populace. I was among
the earliest victims they had marked for destruction.
It was about the close of the day that they
assembled
before my palace. The evening was as calm
and beautiful as this. I was in my library with my
wife and boy, who was reading to us; and, as I looked
out upon the setting sun, until that moment I had
never experienced so full and vivid a sense of the
brilliant scene. What sight is there in nature to be
compared with the setting sun! As I gazed, a new
pulse was awakened in my heart, that throbbed with
ecstacy at the wonders of creation. I turned to my
boy, whose eyes were fixed on the illumined horizon,
and they were filled with tears of delight, such as
few mortals are permitted to enjoy.
A noise was heard in the hall. My name was
repeated, and a few moments afterwards the door of
the library was burst open, and the ruffians rushed
in. Their leader was a wretch whom I had been
the means of bringing to public punishment, for an
offence against the laws. He no sooner beheld me,
than he checked the fury of his followers, and
exclaimed
,
`Be this act of vengeance exclusively mine!'
He aimed a blow at me with his drawn sword; but,
before it fell, my boy ran between us and received it
on his head. He fell senseless at my feet. The
monster again raised his sword, and, as it descended,
my wife rushed forward, and the next instant was
prostrate on the body of my son. I was roused to
desperation at the sight; and, seizing a heavy chair,
aimed a blow at the ruffian, and rushed into the
midst of his followers. They fled in amazement to
the hall, and I followed as fearlessly as the eagle in
pursuit of a flock of sparrows. All sense of danger
vanished; my reasoning faculties were absorbed; the
animal was goaded to fury; and even instinct had
lost its influence. I kept them at bay for some time:
at length I received a blow from behind; I fell to the
floor, and I know not what followed.
When I revived it was quite dark, and all was
silent. I strove to get upon my feet, but I had been
beaten and wounded, and found it impossible to
sustain
myself. I sank exhausted in a stream of blood.
The clock in the hall now struck eleven. Unable
to walk, I dragged my wounded body along the floor
towards the library. The door was open, and the
moon shone calmly into the windows. My mind
was on the rack to know the fate of my wife and
child. As I crawled over the threshold of the door,
I beheld a mass lying in the middle of the room.
The light of the moon fell but feebly on it, and my
vision was too dim to catch the outline. As I moved
towards it, I heard the distant roar of the infuriated
mob. In an agony I drew nigh to the object, and
discovered it to be the bodies of my wife and son.
The sight nerved my mind with desperation, and
imparted
renewed strength to my wounded and
exhausted
frame. I turned their faces upwards; the
light of the moon fell on them. They were ghastly.
I gazed on them but for a moment, when, throwing
my arms around the body of my wife, I raised her
and stood erect. Her head fell upon my shoulder.
I removed the bloody hair that hung over her face,
and kissed her cheek. It was as white and as cold
as marble. The touch chilled me to the heart; my
strength failed me, and I sunk to the floor beneath
the weight of the body.
I had not remained long in this situation, when
I heard footsteps in the hall, and immediately after
I perceived a figure stealing past the door. `The
work of plunder has already begun,' I cried. A
second
figure followed, and then I heard the sound of
my massive family plate, as they threw it into a
basket
.
The sound drew me back into the world again.
I shouted, and they fled, leaving the treasure. What
a sordid fool is man! I felt a sense of joy that my
dross had not yet been taken from me, although I
would freely have given the wealth of Peru, again to
enjoy the feelings that were mine when I gazed upon
the setting of the sun.
I kept my eye turned towards the hall, and as I
heard the street door close after the plunderers, I
perceived a feeble flash of light, and then a man
appeared
at the door, bearing a dark lantern. He was
wrapped in a cloak; and as he held the light at
arm's length, so as to throw it into the room, he
looked about cautiously until his eyes fell upon the
spot where I was lying. He approached, and
wretched
as I was, the love of life was still strong within
me, and I trembled for the miserable remnant of my
existence. My fears were idle. It was a faithful
domestic, who having fled with the rest when the
mob broke into my palace, now came to learn the
fate of his master.
He raised me from the floor, and after placing
me in a chair, turned to the bodies. As I before
said, the vital spark was extinct in my wife, but my
son gave signs of returning animation. I directed
the servant what applications to make in order to
revive
him. The means were at hand, and in a short
time my poor boy opened his eyes again; but, instead
of the light of intelligence, a wild glare now beamed
from them. Had they remained closed forever, dear
as he was to me, I might have been happy.
The servant carried him to a place of
concealment
,
which was an obscure house, where a friend of
the faithful fellow resided. I remained where he
had seated me, unable to move. He left the lantern
on the floor, near the body of my wife. The stream
of light fell upon her countenance, while every other
object in the room was obscurely seen. This was
fearfully distinct. My eyes were riveted upon it. It
was impossible to avert my gaze; and I sat
motionless
as a statue. The flickering of the lamp created
a change in the fixed expression of her face, and the
muscles seemed to be in action. Such was my state
of mind, that I could scarcely breathe. My sight
was dim, and I bent forward to satisfy myself that
there was still reason to hope. I imagined that I
saw her lips separate, and heard a sigh proceed from
them. Her dress seemed to move, my eye-balls
ached with straining, a smile was now on her ashy
lips, she raised her hand, beckoned me, her eyes
opened, she arose, and stood erect before me. `She
lives! thank God she lives!' I cried, and fell
backwards
in the chair. I heard a voice as I fell.
The joyful delusion was soon dissipated. My
servant was now standing beside me: I turned a
hasty glance towards the body, but it was silent and
motionless, and precisely as when the servant left
me. He supported me to the house where he had
carried my son, and again returned to the palace for
the body of my wife, that we might perform the last
sad offices over it with becoming decency. But he
was too late. My palace was surrounded by the
mob, and he could not enter.
I passed a night of sleepless agony, raving for
the body of my wife. Breathless as it was, it was
still the dearest object to my heart that the world
contained. About day-break I heard an uproar in
the street; I arose, and looked out of the window.
The mob was passing with carts, into which were
thrown the bodies of those who had been slaughtered
the night preceding. The heartless demons laughed
and sung as they moved on; and even those who
were mounted among the dead to drive the carts,
joined in the horrid glee. In the last there was the
body of a female lying above the rest. I was struck
with her apparel; I had seen it before. Her face
was turned upwards, as if looking for the spot to
which the spirit had ascended; and as the cart passed
immediately beneath the window where I stood, I
recognised the features of my wife. How can I
describe my feelings at that moment! The power
of motion forsook me; and it seemed as if the
circulation
of the blood had been checked, and
respiration
suspended. My ideas were confused, and
my mind was not yet awakened to a full sense of
its misery, though it laboured with a consciousness
that no situation in life could be more awful than
that in which I stood. True, the stab had been
given, but what is the pain which accompanies the
stab, compared with the sufferings which follow and
poison the very fountain of existence! I continued
to gaze after the carts, breathless and motionless as
a statue. They drove along the extended street at
a rapid gait. I saw them lash their horses, and the
morning breeze brought to my ear their demoniac
songs of merriment. Still I gazed after them, for
there was one object that engrossed the whole
faculties
of my soul. I saw it move up and down in the
hindmost cart, as the driver urged his horse rapidly
forward. At length they turned down another street
and disappeared. The spell was now broken, and
I fell senseless to the floor. Well did the man of
woe exclaim, `What is man that thou dost magnify
him!' since the fairest works of God's hand, in this
world, moulder and mingle their dust with the basest
things of his creation.
In a few weeks my son was restored to health,
but the light of reason was extinguished. We left
our hiding place, disguised ourselves, and
commenced
our wanderings. I determined to leave
France, with the hope that a change of scene would
create a change in my feelings. There was some
relief to be obtained from constant action. We
walked to Harve, without stopping at a human
habitation
,
and took passage on board of the first
vessel
we discovered lying in port, without even
inquiring
its destination, for it was the same thing to
me, so that it bore me from France. Two days we
remained in port; I was wretched and restless; but
on the morning of the third we weighed anchor, and
my stricken heart leaped with joy as I beheld the
land of my birth receding from my view. For a
moment I felt as though I had cut the bond asunder
that bound me to my load of accumulated misery.
Among the passengers were a father and his
daughter. She was not more than sixteen, and as
beautiful as any thing of earthly mould is permitted
to be. The morning was fair, the ship sailed gaily,
and those two remained seated on the deck, apart
from the rest, reading, and at times singing lively
French airs, which she accompanied with the guitar.
Every look of the father betrayed that she was the
pride of his heart, and that the measure of his
happiness
was full. What earthly tie is there so pure
and powerful as that which subsists between a father
and a lovely daughter! I continued to gaze upon
them, and my whole soul entered into the feelings
of that father. I then looked at my poor idiot boy
and contrasted them with my own.
The day passed away, and, as the sun went down,
the gathering clouds in the west foretold the coming
tempest. The sea, which had sported through the
live-long day as a harmless child, now raged as a
maniac who had just broke his bonds asunder. All
was speedily prepared to enable us to weather the
storm. I stood upon the deck as night closed in,
and as I looked abroad upon the waste of waters,
my soul rejoiced as if a new world had just been
created for it to traverse. I had wished for action,
and there was a world of furious and unceasing
motion
around me. I was fit to live alone in tempest
and gloom.
For hours did the winds and waters contend for
our destruction. Every plank in the ship was
strained
,
and the stoutest heart among the crew was
dismayed
.
I held my boy by the hand and felt no
terror
,
for I had nothing to lose. I descended to the
cabin, and, among others, beheld that father and his
child, whose lives gave so fair a promise in the
morning
,
he on his knees, praying, and she, almost
senseless
,
hanging around his neck. The sight smote me
to the heart; and, as I beheld the misery that
encompassed
me, I felt, as did the prophet on his
voyage
to Nineveh, that I was the cause of all. I
hastened
on deck, and in his words exclaimed`Take
me up and cast me forth into the sea; so shall the
sea be calm unto you; for I know that for my sake
this great tempest is upon you.' So fully was I
impressed
with the truth of what I spoke, that I would
have leaped overboard had not the sailors laid hold
of me and restrained me.
The ship laboured through the night, groaning
like some mightly creature at the point of
dissolution
.
The sea rushed through the crevices on all
sides, and on trying the pumps, we discovered three
feet of water in the hold. The ship was now
unmanageable
,
floating like a dead mass upon the
surface
of the sea. All this time the gloom of night
was around us, and unseen danger is always more
appalling to our nature than that which we behold
approaching. Many on that night endured the pangs
of death a thousand fold, and still are living.
All hands were driven on deck, for the sea had
taken possession below. Among the rest were that
father and his child. His countenance was calm;
resignation was depicted there: while the fair being
who clung to him looked as if death had already
more than half performed his office. They stood
mute; not a word escaped their lips, which was
strangely contrasted with the confusion and uproar
that prevailed. As the morning approached, a heavy
sea heaved the vessel on her side, and the sweeping
surge passed over her. A wild shriek of terror
mingled
with the roar of the waters; and when we had
sufficiently recovered, we beheld that the father and
his daughter had been washed overboard. I looked
out on the rising billow, and there they were
ascending
,
locked in the embrace of each other. They
attained the summit, and in a moment descended
into the chasm on the other side. The waves
propelled
us forward, and again I saw the bodies rise.
It was but a momentary view, and they disappeared
from mortal eyes for ever. The sight struck all on
board dumb, while each anxiously looked among the
crowd to discover who had perished. All had
escaped
save those two. There were among us those
who did not fear to die; there were among us those
who wished for death; and yet these were passed
by, and the happiest, those to whom life was as a
cloudless day in spring, alone were selected to perish.
And why was this? Let the most favoured and
self-sufficient
that treads the earth answer me, and think
upon himself.
The sea bore the wreck onward, and after a lapse
of several hours we found ourselves in sight of
Calais
.
A signal was hoisted, and shortly afterwards
we beheld the wreckers coming to our relief. We
were landed in safety, and the wreckers returned to
save what property they could from the wreck.
While I stood upon the quay and beheld them, one
thought engrossed my mind. Why was it that, of
all of us, that father and his daughter only perished?
Years of humiliation and suffering have elapsed
since that time. I have asked bread from those
whose tables groaned beneath the luxuries of the
earth, and been denied; and, half famished, I have
appealed to the wretch who lives on common charity,
and he has divided his last crust with me. I have
stood in my rags before those who have sat down at
my table, and whose hearts my hospitality has
lightened
,
and they would not know me; and I have
supplicated
for food at my own gate, and been driven
thence by the pampered menial. Oh God! I fear
that I am not the first who has met with similar
treatment, even while I reposed within, surrounded
by every luxury. If so, I bend before the justice of
thy decree.
Driven from your own gate! when? cried
Antoine
.
This day. Within the last hour.
You astonish me! Where?
Here! from the gate of this palace.
Ha! are you the Count ?
Yes, I am he; and if you doubt the truth of
what I say, tear up the carpet, and here, here in this
spot, you will find the blood of my wife still red
upon the floor. He stood erect and stamped upon
the spot.
The deformed was busy in examining minutely
VOL. I.17
every part of the room. A gleam of recognition
crossed his countenance, as he stood in front of the
window facing the west, and gazed upon the setting
sun. He fixed upon the same spot, and assumed the
same position in which he stood years before. His
father watched his movements. The young man
pressed his hand upon his eyes, drew a deep sigh,
and scarcely articulated, How sublime and
beautiful
!
How blest are they who, after a brilliant
career
,
can, like thee, thus calmly and unclouded
retire
from this world.
And a thousand times more blest are they, my
boy, who thus descend, conscious that like him they
will rise again with renewed strength and
undiminished
splendour.
The young man gave a vacant smile as he looked
towards his father, but returned no answer. That
smile froze the hope that was budding in the father's
bosom.
Come, my son, cried the old man, it is time
to resume our wanderings. He made a hasty
approach
towards the door, and the deformed slowly
and mechanically followed without raising his head.
Stay, cried Antoine, here let your
wanderings
terminate.
How mean you?
For the sake of that unfortunate, your days shall
close in comfort. He was a friend to me in my
boyhood
,
when I had few friends. I was of mean birth,
but he overlooked the distinction that society had
raised between us. His acquirements were
extensive
.
I became his pupil; and while he strove to
scatter the seeds of knowledge in my mind, I could
not remain insensible to the virtues of his heart, and
I trust that the impression then made is not yet
obliterated
.
Even as thou sowest shalt thou reap, cried the
father, embracing his son. The mendicant gladly
accepted the hospitable offer; and closed his days,
surrounded by every comfort that wealth could
procure
;
and as he contemplated the scenes of his past
life, he felt that countless blessings may be heaped
upon man, and yet a single dispensation, which may
not accord with his wishes, too frequently embitters
life, and perverts every grateful feeling, though that
dispensation may have been designed as a blessing of
the greatest magnitude, and would have proved such,
had not his erring nature defeated the views of an
all-wise Providence.
END OF VOL. I.